Cerebellopontine angle lipoma in a teenager.
Abnormal differentiation of human papillomavirus-induced laryngeal papillomas.
Cisplatin-fluorouracil interaction in a squamous cell carcinoma xenograft.
HLA class I and class II antigen expression on squamous cell carcinoma of the head and neck.
Computed tomography of metastatic cervical lymph nodes. A clinical, computed tomographic, pathologic correlative study.
Pseudocyst of the auricle. Case report and world literature review
Multiple intracranial mucoceles associated with phaeohyphomycosis of the paranasal sinuses.
Osteoma of the middle ear. Report of a case.
Transoesophageal echocardiography improves the diagnostic value of cardiac ultrasound in patients with carcinoid heart disease.
Skin exudate levels of interleukin 6, interleukin 1 and other cytokines in mycosis fungoides.
Invasive migration of epidemic Kaposi's sarcoma cells in vitro.
Lymphokine-activated killer (LAK) cell activity in B and T chronic lymphoid leukemia: defective LAK generation and reduced susceptibility of the leukemic cells to allogeneic and autologous LAK effectors.
Distinct characteristics of lymphokine-activated killer (LAK) cells derived from patients with B-cell chronic lymphocytic leukemia (B-CLL). A factor in B-CLL serum promotes natural killer cell-like LAK cell growth.
A new monoclonal antibody (CH-F42) recognizes a CD7- subset of normal T lymphocytes and circulating malignant cells in adult T-cell lymphoma-leukemia and Sezary syndrome.
Characterization of a factor-dependent acute leukemia cell line with translocation (3;3)(q21;q26).
Expression of transcobalamin II receptors by human leukemia K562 and HL-60 cells.
Genotypic characterization of centrocytic lymphoma: frequent rearrangement of the chromosome 11 bcl-1 locus.
Biology and clinical significance of cytogenetic abnormalities in childhood acute lymphoblastic leukemia.
Effects of recombinant human interleukin-3 on human hematopoietic progenitor and precursor cells in vivo.
The pharmacokinetics of plasminogen activator inhibitor-1 in the rabbit.
Trisomy 13: a new recurring chromosome abnormality in acute leukemia.
Abnormalities of the long arm of chromosome 6 in childhood acute lymphoblastic leukemia.
The role of cellular maturation in neutrophil heterogeneity.
Early detection of gastric cancer
Renal carcinoma in a solitary kidney.
Cell cycling in bladder carcinoma determined by monoclonal antibody Ki67.
Superficial bladder cancer in patients under 40 years of age. Efficacy of topical prophylaxis.
Pathological classification and follow-up of prostatic lesions initially diagnosed as "suspicious of malignancy".
Papillary cystic neoplasm of the pancreas: radiological and pathological characteristics in 11 cases.
CA72-4: a new tumour marker for gastric cancer.
Failure of nutritional recovery after total gastrectomy.
Treatment of adenocarcinoma of the cardia with synchronous chemotherapy and radiotherapy.
Manometric evaluation of jejunal limb after total gastrectomy and Roux-Orr anastomosis for gastric cancer.
Primary hepatic malignancy: the role of liver transplantation.
Intraoperative ultrasonography and the detection of liver metastases in patients with colorectal cancer.
The effect of the gastrin receptor antagonist proglumide on survival in gastric carcinoma.
Induction chemotherapy with a new regimen alternating cisplatin, fluorouracil with mitomycin, hydroxyurea and bleomycin in carcinomas of nasopharynx or other sites of the head and neck region.
Treatment of patients with isolated axillary nodal metastases from an occult primary carcinoma consistent with breast origin.
Cancer chemotherapy after solid organ transplantation.
Autopsy-documented cure of multiple myeloma 14 years after M2 chemotherapy.
Pulmonary metastases from ameloblastoma of the mandible treated with cisplatin, adriamycin, and cyclophosphamide.
Prospective evaluation of radiologically directed fine-needle aspiration biopsy of nonpalpable breast lesions.
Sacral plexus injury after radiotherapy for carcinoma of cervix.
Relationship of 4F2 antigen with local growth and metastatic potential of squamous cell carcinoma of the larynx.
Tumor-antigen 4. Its immunohistochemical distribution and tissue and serum concentrations in squamous cell carcinoma of the lung and esophagus.
Myocarditis or acute myocardial infarction associated with interleukin-2 therapy for cancer.
Postoperative active specific immunization in colorectal cancer patients with virus-modified autologous tumor-cell vaccine. First clinical results with tumor-cell vaccines modified with live but avirulent Newcastle disease virus [published erratum appears in Cancer 1991 Apr 15;67(8):2124]
Acute T-cell leukemia/lymphoma mimicking Hodgkin's disease with secondary HTLV I seroconversion.
Immunohistochemical studies on the main entrance-route of CA19-9 into the peripheral venous blood of gastric cancer patients. Correlation with CA19-9 levels in peripheral and portal blood.
Colonic polyamine content and ornithine decarboxylase activity as markers for adenomas.
Establishment of an erythroid cell line (JK-1) that spontaneously differentiates to red cells.
Regional differences in the intranodal distribution of tumor cells.
Flow cytometric DNA analysis of parathyroid tumors. Implication of aneuploidy for pathologic and biologic classification.
Brush cytology in the diagnosis of colonic neoplasms.
Soft tissue sarcoma with additional anaplastic components. A clinicopathologic and immunohistochemical study of 27 cases.
Continuing care for cancer pain relief with oral morphine solution. One-year experience in a regional cancer center.
Clinical prognostic factors in patients with posterior uveal malignant melanoma.
Mammographic screening of women with increased risk of breast cancer.
Survival of premenopausal women with metastatic breast cancer. Long-term follow-up of Eastern Cooperative Group and Cancer and Leukemia Group B studies.
Analysis of bladder carcinoma by subsite. Cystoscopic location may have prognostic value.
The management of pseudomyxoma peritonei.
Chondrosarcoma of bone in children.
Cancer mortality in a higher-income black population in New York State. Comparison with rates in the United States as a whole.
Immunocytochemical estrogen and progestin receptor assays in breast cancer with monoclonal antibodies. Histopathologic, demographic, and biochemical correlations and relationship to endocrine response and survival.
Teniposide (VM-26) and continuous infusion cytosine arabinoside for initial induction failure in childhood acute lymphoblastic leukemia. A Pediatric Oncology Group pilot study.
Association of disease-free survival and percent of ideal dose in adjuvant breast chemotherapy.
Doxorubicin for unresectable hepatocellular carcinoma. A prospective study on the addition of verapamil.
A phase I trial of cisplatin in hypertonic saline and escalating doses of 5-fluorouracil by continuous intravenous infusion in patients with advanced malignancies.
Treatment of advanced squamous cell carcinoma of the skin with cisplatin, 5-fluorouracil, and bleomycin.
Effect of intraarterial versus intravenous cisplatin in addition to systemic doxorubicin, high-dose methotrexate, and ifosfamide on histologic tumor response in osteosarcoma (study COSS-86).
Topographic classification, clinical characteristics, and diagnostic delay of cancer of the larynx/hypopharynx in Torino, Italy.
Long-term follow-up of 24 patients undergoing radical resection for ampullary carcinoma, 1953 to 1988.
Radiographic microcalcification and parenchymal patterns as indicators of histologic "high-risk" benign breast disease.
Human papillomavirus type 16 associated with oral squamous carcinoma in a cardiac transplant recipient.
Expression of Ki-1 antigen (CD30) in mesenchymal tumors.
Immunophenotypes in "classical" B-cell chronic lymphocytic leukemia. Correlation with normal cellular counterpart and clinical findings.
Significance of blasts in low-cell-count cerebrospinal fluid specimens from children with acute lymphoblastic leukemia.
Prognostic implication of ecto-5'-nucleotidase activity in acute lymphoblastic leukemia.
Sex hormone receptors in human thyroid tissues.
Lewis system alterations in gastric carcinogenesis.
Comparison of DNA content in gastric cancer cells between primary lesions and lymph node metastases.
A clinical and flow cytometric analysis of patients with nasopharyngeal cancer.
Mucinous adenocarcinoma of the submandibular gland.
The use of flow cytometry for the prognosis of stage II adjuvant treated breast cancer patients.
Immunocytochemical characterization of lung tumors in fine-needle aspiration. The use of cytokeratin monoclonal antibodies for the differential diagnosis of squamous cell carcinoma and adenocarcinoma.
Comparison of the conventional method of lymph node staging with a comprehensive fat-clearing method for gastric adenocarcinoma.
Neuropeptide Y and neuron-specific enolase levels in benign and malignant pheochromocytomas.
Flow cytometric DNA-ploidy analysis of synchronously occurring multiple malignant tumors of the female genital tract.
The relationship between bone morphogenetic protein and neoplastic bone diseases.
A newly established human osteosarcoma cell line with osteoblastic properties.
Combined laminoplasty and posterolateral fusion for spinal canal surgery in children and adolescents.
Oncocytic glomus tumor of the trachea.
Multicentric endobronchial granular cell myoblastoma.
Preoperative radiotherapy in operable rectal cancer.
Relationship between blood plasma prostaglandin E2 and liver and lung metastases in colorectal cancer.
Palliative operations for colorectal cancer.
Rectal bleeding. Patient delay in presentation.
Endosonography of pararectal lymph nodes. In vitro and in vivo evaluation.
Anorectal malignant melanoma in Sweden. Report of 49 patients.
Gastric dysrhythmias following pylorus-preserving pancreaticoduodenectomy. Possible mechanism for early delayed gastric emptying.
Characterization and significance of sulfonylurea receptors.
The effect of metoclopramide on ovarian responsiveness to gonadotropin administration in patients with severe polycystic ovarian syndrome.
Aromatase activity of human granulosa cells in patients with polycystic ovaries treated with dexamethasone.
Pregnancy after in vitro fertilization in a patient with stage I endometrial carcinoma treated with progestins.
Strong association between diabetes and displacement of mouse anti-rat insulinoma cell monoclonal antibody by human serum in vitro.
Pancreatic secretory trypsin inhibitor stimulates the growth of rat pancreatic carcinoma cells.
Immunochemical characterization and quantitative distribution of pancreatic stone protein in sera and pancreatic secretions in pancreatic disorders.
Endoscopic retrograde brush cytology. A new technique.
Resolution of inferior vena cava syndrome after embolization of a hepatic adenoma.
Misdiagnosis of the Zollinger-Ellison syndrome due to hyperlipidemia.
Late recurrence of a hepatocellular carcinoma in a patient with incomplete Alagille syndrome.
Endoscopic ultrasonography for the evaluation of smooth muscle tumors in the upper gastrointestinal tract: an experience with 42 cases.
Endoscopic palliative intubation of the esophagus invaded by lung cancer.
Low diacylglycerol values in colonic adenomas and colorectal cancer.
Adult hepatic fibropolycystic disease presenting as obstructive jaundice.
High grade dysplasia of the gastric mucosa: a marker for gastric carcinoma.
Growth of group A rotaviruses in a human liver cell line.
HBV-DNA sequences in tumor and nontumor tissue in a patient with the fibrolamellar variant of hepatocellular carcinoma.
Prospective study of early detection of hepatocellular carcinoma in patients with cirrhosis.
Diagnostic value of brush cytology in the diagnosis of bile duct carcinoma: a study in 65 patients with bile duct strictures.
Prognostic factors of hepatocellular carcinoma in the west: a multivariate analysis in 206 patients.
Review of hepatic imaging and a problem-oriented approach to liver masses.
A surgical approach to the cervicothoracic spine.
Unusual haemostasis for an unusual tumour. Catastrophic bleeding from a tactile neurofibroma affecting the thoracic vertebrae. Case report.
Left ventricular fibroma: echocardiographic diagnosis and successful surgical excision in three cases.
Deletion of Alu sequences in the fifth c-sis intron in individuals with meningiomas.
Use of monoclonal antibody KP1 for identifying normal and neoplastic human mast cells.
Testicular sex cord stromal tumour with granulosa cell differentiation: detection of steroid hormone receptors as a possible basis for tumour development and therapeutic management.
Upper gastrointestinal pathology in familial adenomatous polyposis: results from a prospective study of 102 patients.
Effect of sample volume on yield of positive blood cultures from adult patients with haematological malignancy.
Activation and inducer subset phenotype of the lymphocytic infiltrate around epidermally derived tumors.
Benign lymphangioendothelioma.
Absence of estrogen receptors in dysplastic nevi and malignant melanoma.
Incidence of cutaneous T cell lymphoma and other rare skin cancers in a defined population.
Cutaneous surgery and the pregnant patient.
Comparison of methods for checking surgical margins.
Years of potential life lost: another indicator of the impact of cutaneous malignant melanoma on society.
Trends in basal cell carcinoma, squamous cell carcinoma, and melanoma of the skin from 1973 through 1987.
Pigmented Bowen's disease arising from pigmented seborrheic keratoses.
The relationship of pemphigus to neoplasia.
Proliferative mass found in the gingiva.
Effect of gastric mucus on the uptake of the carcinogen MNNG by gastric mucosal DNA.
Campylobacter pylori interactions with gastric cell tissue culture.
Pelvic pain: lessons from anatomy and physiology.
Murine monoclonal anti-idiotype antibody as a potential network antigen for human carcinoembryonic antigen.
IL-2-PE40 prevents the development of tumors in mice injected with IL-2 receptor expressing EL4 transfectant tumor cells.
Regulation of HLA class II molecule expressions by IFN-gamma. The signal transduction mechanism in glioblastoma cell lines.
Low doses of IL-4 injected perilymphatically in tumor-bearing mice inhibit the growth of poorly and apparently nonimmunogenic tumors and induce a tumor-specific immune memory.
Endemic Kaposi's sarcoma in human immunodeficiency virus type 1-seronegative persons: demonstration of retrovirus-like particles in cutaneous lesions.
Elevated serum levels of soluble interleukin-2 receptors in small cell lung carcinoma.
Abnormal processing of pro-IGF-II in patients with hepatoma and in some hepatitis B virus antibody-positive asymptomatic individuals.
Central nervous system haemangioblastoma: a clinical and genetic study of 52 cases.
Extradural implantation of sacral anterior root stimulators.
Stiffman syndrome: a rare paraneoplastic disorder?
LDH isoenzymes in cerebrospinal fluid in various brain tumours.
Changes in surgical treatments: the example of hysterectomy versus conization for cervical carcinoma in situ.
Prolonged administration of oral etoposide in patients with relapsed or refractory small-cell lung cancer: a phase II trial.
Intraperitoneal lymphokine-activated killer-cell and interleukin-2 therapy for malignancies limited to the peritoneal cavity.
Therapy of renal cell carcinoma with interleukin-2 and lymphokine-activated killer cells: phase II experience with a hybrid bolus and continuous infusion interleukin-2 regimen.
Interleukin-2 therapy in patients with metastatic malignant melanoma: a phase II study.
Phase I study of interleukin-2 and interferon alfa-2a as outpatient therapy for patients with advanced malignancy.
Multimodal therapy for the management of primary, nonmetastatic Ewing's sarcoma of bone: a long-term follow-up of the First Intergroup study.
Adjunctive surgery after chemotherapy for nonseminomatous germ cell tumors: recommendations for patient selection.
Hepatic venoocclusive disease in autologous bone marrow transplantation of solid tumors and lymphomas.
Bone marrow transplantation for myelodysplasia and secondary acute nonlymphoblastic leukemia.
Response of oral leukoplakia to beta-carotene.
Antagonism of serotonin S3 receptors with ondansetron prevents nausea and emesis induced by cyclophosphamide-containing chemotherapy regimens
Phase I study of repeated cycles of high-dose cyclophosphamide, etoposide, and cisplatin administered without bone marrow transplantation
Pharmacodynamics in cancer therapy.
Surgical treatment of thyrotropin-secreting pituitary adenomas.
Monosomy 22 in rhabdoid or atypical tumors of the brain.
Meningiomas mimicking cerebral schwannoma.
Clonal origin of pituitary adenomas.
Characteristics and biological role of steroid hormone receptors in neuroepithelial tumors
Hormonal dependency of cerebral meningiomas. Part 1: Female sex steroid receptors and their significance as specific markers for adjuvant medical therapy.
Hormonal dependency of cerebral meningiomas. Part 2: In vitro effect of steroids, bromocriptine, and epidermal growth factor on growth of meningiomas.
Fourth ventricular schwannoma. Case report.
Myxomatous cyst of the brachial plexus. Case report.
Intradural epithelial cyst at the craniovertebral junction. Case report.
Lymphocele: the spectrum of scintigraphic findings in lymphoceles associated with renal transplant.
Scintigraphic evaluation of aggressive fibromatosis.
N-[18F]fluoroacetyl-D-glucosamine: a potential agent for cancer diagnosis
Invasive squamous cell carcinoma of the mandible presenting as a chronic osteomyelitis: report of a case.
Detection of human papillomavirus-genomic DNA in oral epithelial dysplasias, oral smokeless tobacco-associated leukoplakias, and epithelial malignancies.
Desmoplastic variant of ameloblastoma: report of a case and review of the literature.
Characterization of the effect of two 4-methyl piperidine derivatives of hemicholinium-3, A-4 and A-5, on choline transport.
Ruptured mature cystic teratoma of the ovary with recurrence in the liver and colon 17 years later. A case report.
Conservative therapy for adnexal torsion. A case report.
Localization of trophoblastic disease with vaginal ultrasonography. A report of two cases.
An unusual manifestation of Paget's disease of bone: spinal epidural hematoma presenting as acute cauda equina syndrome.
Presentation of breast carcinoma as Volkmann's contracture due to skeletal muscle metastases.
Increasing annual incidence of primary malignant brain tumors in the elderly
Methionine dependency of malignant tumors: a possible approach for therapy
Low metastatic potential of clone from murine colon adenocarcinoma 26 increased by transfection of activated c-erbB-2 gene.
New active analogues of vitamin D with low calcemic activity.
Effect of prostaglandin E in multiple experimental models: V. Effect on tumor/host interaction.
Malignant melanoma occurring during pregnancy: a report of the Northern Israel Oncology Center (1968-1988).
Cyclophosphamide and ifosfamide combination as neoadjuvant chemotherapy for locally advanced nonsmall-cell lung cancer: a meta-analytic review.
Renal vein leiomyosarcoma.
Adrenal carcinosarcoma.
Distinguishing malignant mesothelioma from pulmonary adenocarcinoma: an immuno-histochemical approach using a panel of monoclonal antibodies.
Clinicopathological features of elevated lesions of the duodenal bulb.
Utility of surgical margins in the radiotherapeutic management of soft tissue sarcomas.
Acral melanoma: a review of 185 patients with identification of prognostic variables.
Long-term experience with a totally implanted catheter system in cancer patients.
Cutaneous malignant melanoma in Rochester, Minnesota: trends in incidence and survivorship, 1950 through 1985
Diagnosis of corticotropin-producing bronchial carcinoid tumors causing Cushing's syndrome
Adult T-cell leukaemia/lymphoma in Brazil and its relation to HTLV-I
Conservation surgery for glomus jugulare tumors: the value of early diagnosis.
Local control of auricular, periauricular, and external canal cutaneous malignancies with Mohs surgery.
Olfactory neuroblastoma: clinicopathologic and immunohistochemical characterization of four representative cases.
Le Fort I osteotomy approach to the skull base.
Imaging of pharyngeal and laryngeal carcinomas with indium-111-labeled monoclonal anti-CEA antibodies.
Surgical therapy of the eyelids in patients with facial paralysis.
Endoscopic laser surgery for early glottic carcinoma: a clinical and experimental study.
Clinical classification and staging for primary malignancies of the maxillary antrum.
Magnetic resonance in pediatric and adolescent neuroimaging.
Ulcerative colitis and colorectal cancer. A population-based study.
Somatostatin-receptor imaging in the localization of endocrine tumors
The t(15;17) translocation of acute promyelocytic leukaemia fuses the retinoic acid receptor alpha gene to a novel transcribed locus.
Response of the Lambert-Eaton myasthenic syndrome to treatment of associated small-cell lung carcinoma.
Effect of plasmapheresis on serum and CSF autoantibody levels in CNS paraneoplastic syndromes.
Intraoperative radioimmunodetection of ovarian cancer using monoclonal antibody B72.3 and a portable gamma-detecting probe.
Computed tomography-guided fine-needle aspiration of retroperitoneal lymph nodes in gynecologic oncology.
Prognostic factors for outcome of and survival after second-look laparotomy in patients with advanced ovarian carcinoma.
Ovarian metastases are rare in stage I adenocarcinoma of the cervix.
The fallacy of the screening interval for cervical smears.
Cold-knife and laser conization for cervical intraepithelial neoplasia.
Primary invasive carcinoma of the vagina.
Does the treatment of genital condylomata in men decrease the treatment failure rate of cervical dysplasia in the female sexual partner?
Carbon dioxide laser vaporization of diaphragmatic metastases for cytoreduction of ovarian epithelial cancer.
Removal of large symptomatic intrauterine growths by the hysteroscopic resectoscope.
Colposcopic survey of Papanicolaou test-negative cases with hyperkeratosis or parakeratosis.
Detection, prevalence, and prognosis of asymptomatic carcinoma of the cervix.
Window operation: an alternative treatment method for Bartholin gland cysts and abscesses
Vaginal mullerian cyst presenting as an anterior enterocele: a case report.
Contemporary management of a potentially lethal fetal anomaly: a successful perinatal approach to epignathus.
Diabetes insipidus associated with craniopharyngioma in pregnancy.
Capillary hemangioma of the maxilla. A report of two cases in which angiography and embolization were used.
Oral squamous cell carcinoma arising in a patient with long-standing lichen planus. A case report.
Contiguous enlarged dental follicles with histologic features resembling the WHO type of odontogenic fibroma
A dentist's dilemma: nonsurgical endodontic therapy or periapical surgery for teeth with apparent pulpal pathosis and an associated periapical radiolucent lesion.
Interferon activation of latent natural killer cells and alteration in kinetics of target cell lysis: clinical implications for oral precancerous lesions.
Tyrosine-rich crystalloids in a polymorphous low-grade adenocarcinoma.
Periapical lesions of mandibular bone: difficulties in early diagnostics.
Preventing cervical cancer by treating genital warts in men. Why male sex partners need androscopy.
Clinical recognition and evaluation of peptic ulcer disease.
New findings in treatment of colon cancer.
Cloning of the cDNA for human 12-lipoxygenase.
p53 mutations in colorectal cancer.
Transforming growth factor beta stimulates mammary adenocarcinoma cell invasion and metastatic potential.
Loss of heterozygosity on chromosomes 17 and 18 in breast carcinoma: two additional regions identified.
Chemical carcinogenesis: too many rodent carcinogens.
Long-term survival after chest-wall reconstruction with musculocutaneous flaps.
A clinicopathological study of the paraneoplastic neuromuscular syndromes associated with lung cancer.
Oral findings in HIV-infected patients attending a department of internal medicine: the contribution of intraoral examination towards the clinical management of HIV disease
A predominantly adrenaline-secreting phaeochromocytoma.
Cervical lymph node metastasis: assessment of radiologic criteria.
Normal pituitary gland: coronal MR imaging of infundibular tilt.
Gd-HP-DO3A in clinical MR imaging of the brain.
Temporal bone: three-dimensional CT. Part II. Pathologic alterations.
Primary Ewing sarcoma: follow-up with Ga-67 scintigraphy.
Vertebral hemangiomas: fat content as a sign of aggressiveness.
Hypointense renal cell carcinoma: MR imaging with pathologic correlation.
Rectal carcinoma: CT staging with water as contrast medium.
Segmented turboFLASH: method for breath-hold MR imaging of the liver with flexible contrast.
Effect of somatostatin analogue (octreotide) on blood flow to endocrine tumors metastatic to the liver: angiographic evaluation.
Direct interaction of a ligand for the erbB2 oncogene product with the EGF receptor and p185erbB2.
Protection from chemotherapy-induced alopecia in a rat model.
Molecular analysis of acute promyelocytic leukemia breakpoint cluster region on chromosome 17.
Anxiety levels and cancer fear in patients admitted for elective operations.
Acute promyelocytic leukemia: impact of hemorrhagic complications on response to induction chemotherapy and survival.
Carcinoma of the male breast: a review of 41 cases.
Malignant melanoma and pigmented lesions: a diagnostic and management dilemma.
Results of conservative surgery and radiation therapy for breast cancer.
Role of mastectomy in breast cancer.
Selection of breast-preservation therapy for primary invasive breast carcinoma.
Selection of therapy for stage III breast cancer.
Adjuvant chemotherapy of breast cancer.
Adjuvant antiestrogen therapy for breast cancer. Past, present, and future.
Management of local and regional recurrence after mastectomy or breast-conserving treatment.
Reconstruction after mastectomy.
Bilateral breast cancer.
Breast cancer during pregnancy and lactation.
Male breast cancer.
Clinical problems in follow-up of patients after conservative surgery and radiotherapy.
Trends in primary breast cancer management. Where are we going?
Prognostic indicators in invasive breast cancer.
Broad spectrum penicillin as an adequate therapy for acute cholangitis.
Synchronous carcinoma of the colon and rectum.
Congenital dilatation of the bile duct in 100 instances and its relationship with anomalous junction [published erratum appears in Surg Gynecol Obstet 1991 Mar;172(3):246]
Carcinoma of the thyroglossal duct.
Surgical management of islet cell dysmaturation syndrome in young children.
Nonendoscopic percutaneous gastrostomy.
Management of the pregnant patient with carcinoma of the breast.
An unusual epidural, vascular spinal lipoma in a 3-year-old child: a case report and review of the literature.
Neonatal intracranial teratomas.
Spinal extradural cavernous hemangioma.
Prospective evaluation of clinical and pathologic detection of axillary metastases in patients with carcinoma of the breast.
Short-term tamoxifen plus chemotherapy: superior results in node-positive breast cancer.
The diagnosis and definition of hepatic malignancies by use of arterial enhanced computerized tomographic scanning.
Is DNA ploidy of prognostic significance in stage I cutaneous melanoma?
Long-term results of surgical resection of locally advanced colorectal carcinoma.
Local recurrence after curative resection of colorectal adenocarcinoma.
Follicular cell predominance in the cytologic examination of dominant thyroid nodules indicates a sixty percent incidence of neoplasia.
Management of recurrent malignant pleural effusion in the United Kingdom: survey of clinical practice.
Pulmonary disease following intravesical BCG treatment.
Effective ultraviolet irradiation of platelet concentrates in teflon bags.
Management of stage A prostate cancer.
Selection of patients with stage B prostate cancer for radical prostatectomy.
Significance and treatment of positive margins or seminal vesicle invasion after radical prostatectomy.
Prostate-specific antigen for staging prior to surgery and for early detection of recurrence after surgery.
Local failure and related complications after definitive treatment of carcinoma of the prostate by irradiation or surgery.
New concepts in the treatment of stage D1 adenocarcinoma of the prostate.
Low incidence of asymptomatic brain metastases in patients with renal cell carcinoma.
Is urethral sparing at cystectomy a safe procedure?
Neodymium:YAG laser treatment of bladder hemangiomas.
Squamous cell carcinoma antigen (TA-4) in penile carcinoma.
Inverted papilloma of renal pelvis: flexible ureteroscopic diagnosis and treatment.
Improved early detection of recurrence in prostatic carcinoma following hormonal therapy. Combined use of palpation and fine needle aspiration cytology.
Staging of ureteral transitional cell carcinoma by CT and MRI.
Uneventful delivery following series of successive treatments for virilized Cushing syndrome due to adrenocortical carcinoma.
Single polypoid cystitis cystica and glandularis presenting as benign bladder tumor.
Transitional cell carcinomatous meningitis after M-VAC (methotrexate, vinblastine, doxorubicin, and cisplatin) chemotherapy.
Selenium. Nutritional, toxicologic, and clinical aspects
Apocrine mammary carcinoma. A clinicopathologic study of 72 cases.
Characterization of the morphonuclear features and DNA ploidy of typical and atypical carcinoids and small cell carcinomas of the lung.
Merkel cell carcinoma metastatic to the testis.
Bcr/abl recombinant DNA analysis versus karyotype in the diagnosis and therapeutic monitoring of chronic myeloid leukemia.
Free alpha subunit of the pituitary glycoprotein hormones. Measurement in serum and tissue of patients with pituitary tumors.
The use of molecular probes to distinguish new primary tumors from recurrent tumors in gynecologic malignancies.
The frequency of uterine leiomyomas.
Thyroid carcinoma with mixed tall-cell and columnar-cell features.
Anaplastic large cell (Ki-1) lymphoma with histiocytic phenotype simulating carcinoma.
Isolation of measles virus in primary rhesus monkey cells from a child with acute interstitial pneumonia who cytologically had giant-cell pneumonia without a rash.
A diagnostic expert system for colonic lesions.
Estimation of PR and ER by immunocytochemistry in breast cancer. Comparison with radioligand binding methods.
Brake mechanics, asbestos, and disease risk.
Clinical significance of colonic fermentation.
Features distinguishing secondary achalasia from primary achalasia.
The value of push-type jejunal endoscopy in familial adenomatosis coli/Gardner's syndrome.
Comparison of a new immunoassay for determining serum pancreatic isoamylase with two standard techniques.
In vivo evaluation of monopolar versus bipolar electrosurgical polypectomy snares.
Endoscopic ultrasonography in staging rectal cancer.
Hyperplastic gastric polyps associated with persistent Helicobacter pylori infection and active gastritis.
Gallbladder carcinoma producing human chorionic gonadotropin.
Hepatic giant cavernous hemangioma with microangiopathic hemolytic anemia and consumption coagulopathy.
Genitourinary cancer in the elderly.
Prevention of renal disease and conservation of renal function.
Genetics and biology of human ovarian teratomas. I. Cytogenetic analysis and mechanism of origin.
Genetics and biology of human ovarian teratomas. II. Molecular analysis of origin of nondisjunction and gene-centromere mapping of chromosome I markers.
Equal parental origin of chromosome 22 losses in human sporadic meningioma: no evidence for genomic imprinting.
The effect of large uterine fibroids on urinary bladder function and symptoms.
Successful conservative management of primary nonmetastatic cervical choriocarcinoma.
The prognostic significance of CA 125 half-life in patients with ovarian cancer who have received primary chemotherapy after surgical cytoreduction.
Colon cancer in pregnancy with elevated maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein level at presentation.
Spontaneous infarction of placental chorioangioma and associated regression of hydrops fetalis.
Suppression of serum insulin level by diazoxide does not alter serum testosterone or sex hormone-binding globulin levels in healthy, nonobese women.
Collagen metabolism in gynecologic patients: changes in the concentration of the aminoterminal propeptide of type III procollagen in serum.
Autologous antibodies eluted from membrane fragments in human ovarian epithelial neoplastic effusions. III. Cytotoxic potential in vitro and characterization of antigen(s).
The use of in situ hybridization to show human papillomavirus deoxyribonucleic acid in metastatic cancer cells within lymph nodes.
Oral contraceptives and breast cancer.
Vitrectomy retinotomy aspiration biopsy of choroidal tumors
Correlations of acoustic tissue typing of malignant melanoma and histopathologic features as a predictor of death.
Magnetic resonance imaging of radiation optic neuropathy.
Limbal autograft reconstruction after conjunctival squamous cell carcinoma.
An immunohistochemical study of pi class glutathione S-transferase expression in normal human tissue.
Decreased expression of integrin adhesive protein receptors in adenocarcinoma of the breast.
Expression of the human nephron differentiation molecules in renal cell carcinomas.
Initial failure of surgical exploration in patients with primary hyperparathyroidism.
Lymph node metastasis from papillary-follicular thyroid carcinoma in young patients.
Survival discriminants for differentiated thyroid cancer.
Long-term effects of radiotherapy in childhood and adolescence.
Complications of the pectoralis major myocutaneous flap in head and neck reconstruction.
Soft tissue sarcomas of the head and neck in adults.
Multimodality preoperative treatment for advanced stage IV (MO) cancer of the head and neck.
Definitive mandibular replacement using reconstruction plates.
Mandibular reconstruction with composite microvascular tissue transfer.
Reconstruction of mandibular defects in irradiated patients.
Sequential connection of flaps: a logical approach to customized mandibular reconstruction.
Patterns of cervical lymph node metastasis from squamous carcinomas of the upper aerodigestive tract.
Significance of positive margins in oral cavity squamous carcinoma.
Treatment selection for carcinoma of the base of the tongue.
Squamous carcinoma of the posterior pharyngeal wall.
Flow cytometric evaluation of chemosensitive and chemoresistant head and neck tumors.
Lateral temporal bone resections.
Serologic determinants of survival in patients with squamous cell carcinoma of the head and neck.
Efficacy of radical neck dissection for the control of cervical metastasis after radiotherapy for nasopharyngeal carcinoma.
Cervical lymph nodes from an unknown primary tumor in 190 patients.
Delayed reconstruction following Mohs' chemosurgery for skin cancers of the head and neck.
Parascapular free flaps for head and neck reconstruction.
A hepatocellular carcinoma of massive arterioportal shunts without tumor stain treated with CDDP two-route chemotherapy--a case report.
Functional character and augmentation of lymphocytes in regional lymph nodes of patients with lung cancer.
Lung lobe torsion following lobectomy.
Histopathologic study of otitis media in individuals with head and neck tumors.
Histopathologic grading of salivary gland neoplasms: I. Mucoepidermoid carcinomas.
Human central nervous system primitive neuroectodermal tumor expressing nerve growth factor receptors: CHP707m.
A clinical triad to diagnose paraneoplastic retinopathy.
Soluble interleukin-2 receptors in cerebrospinal fluid from individuals with various neurological disorders.
Bactericidal effect of doxycycline associated with lysosomotropic agents on Coxiella burnetii in P388D1 cells.
Histopathologic spectrum of clinically atypical melanocytic nevi. II. Studies of nonfamilial melanoma [published erratum appears in Arch Dermatol 1990 Dec;126(12):1616]
Compound blue nevus: a variant of blue nevus with an additional junctional dendritic component. A clinical, histopathologic, and immunohistochemical study of six cases.
Magnetic resonance imaging in neurological disorders.
Long-term course of patients with persistent hypercalcitoninemia after apparent curative primary surgery for medullary thyroid carcinoma.
Cystic tumors of the pancreas. New clinical, radiologic, and pathologic observations in 67 patients.
Experience with cardiopulmonary bypass and deep hypothermic circulatory arrest in the management of retroperitoneal tumors with large vena caval thrombi.
Surgical therapy in Barrett's esophagus.
Analysis of prognostic factors and clinicopathological staging of thymoma
Surgical treatment of cardiac myxomas: long-term results.
Diagnostic imaging and surgical treatment of dumbbell tumors of the mediastinum.
Coexisting thymic carcinoid tumor and thymoma.
Left superior vena cava: a pitfall in computed tomographic diagnosis with surgical implications.
Resection of the superior vena cava for primary lung cancer: 5 years' survival.
Risk of gastric cancer after gastric surgery for benign disorders.
Morbidity, mortality, and quality of life for patients treated with levothyroxine
Fast and effective treatment of malignant hypercalcemia. Combination of suppositories of calcitonin and a single infusion of 3-amino 1-hydroxypropylidene-1-bisphosphonate.
The technicon H6000 analyzer discriminates chronic lymphocytic leukemia from other B-cell leukemias through automatic assessment of large unstained cells.
Sensitivity and specificity of various morphological features of cervical condylomas. An in situ hybridization study.
Study of preneoplastic changes of liver cells by immunohistochemical and molecular hybridization techniques.
Persistence of mucosal gastric carcinomas for 8 and 6 years in two patients.
Solid and cystic ultimobranchial body remnants in the thyroid.
Mucinous cystadenoma of the lung. A report of two cases with immunohistochemical and ultrastructural analysis.
Tumor of the atrioventricular nodal region. A clinical and immunohistochemical study.
A signet-ring cell carcinoma of the ampulla of Vater.
Pulmonary blastoma with malignant melanoma component.
Neonatal intracranial choriocarcinoma.
Is liver transplantation justified for the treatment of hepatic malignancies?
The impact of microinvasion on axillary node metastases and survival in patients with intraductal breast cancer.
Immediate breast reconstruction following mastectomy is as safe as mastectomy alone.
The operative management of coexisting thyroid and parathyroid disease.
The recalcitrant perineal wound after rectal extirpation. Applications of muscle flap closure.
Failure to detect human T-cell leukemia virus-related sequences in multiple sclerosis blood.
Metastatic carcinoma to the retina. Clinicopathologic findings in two cases.
Cellular immune response toward human articular chondrocytes. T cell reactivities against chondrocyte and fibroblast membranes in destructive joint diseases.
Pseudotumor of the craniocervical junction during long-term hemodialysis.
Atrial fibrillation with cardiac tamponade as the initial manifestation of malignant pericarditis
Platelet norepinephrine and epinephrine concentration in patients with pheochromocytoma.
A risk of malignancy index incorporating CA 125, ultrasound and menopausal status for the accurate preoperative diagnosis of ovarian cancer.
Serum CA 125 levels during the menstrual cycle.
The effect of abdominal surgery on the serum concentration of the tumour-associated antigen CA 125.
Choroidal osteoma (osseous choristoma): an atypical case.
All-trans retinoic acid as a differentiation therapy for acute promyelocytic leukemia. I. Clinical results.
All-trans retinoic acid in acute promyelocytic leukemias. II. In vitro studies: structure-function relationship.
Autologous bone marrow transplantation in high-risk remission T-lineage acute lymphoblastic leukemia using immunotoxins plus 4-hydroperoxycyclophosphamide for marrow purging.
Human basophils express interleukin-4 receptors.
Developmental regulation of granulocytic cell binding to hemonectin.
Human macrophage colony-stimulating factor induces macrophage colonies after L-phenylalanine methylester treatment of human marrow.
Immunophenotypic characteristics of cerebrospinal fluid cells in children with acute lymphoblastic leukemia at diagnosis.
Ph-negative chronic myeloid leukemia: molecular analysis of ABL insertion into M-BCR on chromosome 22.
New type of Bcr/Abl junction in Philadelphia chromosome-positive chronic myelogenous leukemia.
Shared idiotype expression by chronic lymphocytic leukemia and B-cell lymphoma.
In vitro rosetting, cytoadherence, and microagglutination properties of Plasmodium falciparum-infected erythrocytes from Gambian and Tanzanian patients.
Autologous bone marrow transplantation in multiple myeloma: identification of prognostic factors.
Induction of donor-type chimerism in murine recipients of bone marrow allografts by different radiation regimens currently used in treatment of leukemia patients.
Contamination of peripheral blood stem cell harvests by circulating neuroblastoma cells.
Four and a half year follow up of women with dyskaryotic cervical smears.
Distribution of bony metastases in prostatic carcinoma.
Increased survival of patients with massive lymphadenopathy and prostate cancer: evidence of heterogeneous tumour behaviour.
Persistent carcinoma in situ of the testis after chemotherapy for advanced testicular germ cell tumours.
The importance of prognostic factors in the individual treatment of patients with disseminated germ cell tumours.
Bile acids and the increased risk of colorectal tumours after truncal vagotomy.
Urinary tissue factor activity in colorectal disease.
Malignant left-sided large bowel obstruction managed by subtotal/total colectomy.
Blood transfusion and recurrence of colorectal cancer: the role of platelet derived growth factors.
Laser recanalization versus endoscopic intubation in the palliation of malignant dysphagia.
Aetiology of pancreatic cancer
Premorphological metabolic changes in human breast carcinogenesis.
A phase I study of a new cisplatin derivative for hematologic malignancies.
Toxicity of high-dose cytosine arabinoside in the treatment of advanced childhood tumors resistant to conventional therapy. A Pediatric Oncology Group study.
Endoscopic screening of early esophageal cancer with the Lugol dye method in patients with head and neck cancers.
Primary chemotherapy with or without radiation therapy and/or surgery for children with localized sarcoma of the bladder, prostate, vagina, uterus, and cervix. A comparison of the results in Intergroup Rhabdomyosarcoma Studies I and II.
A phase I study of 4'-0-tetrahydropyranyladriamycin. Clinical pharmacology and pharmacokinetics.
Successful treatment of metastatic thymic carcinoma with cisplatin, vinblastine, bleomycin, and etoposide chemotherapy.
Testicular relapse in children with acute nonlymphoblastic leukemia.
Structural and ultrastructural study of the ovary in childhood leukemia after successful treatment.
Surgical treatment of brain metastases in malignant melanoma.
Expression of major histocompatibility complex class II antigens and interleukin-1 by epithelial cells of Warthin's tumor.
Loss of expression of blood group antigen H is associated with cellular invasion and spread of oral squamous cell carcinomas.
Occurrence of beta-hexachlorocyclohexane in breast cancer patients.
Cell lineage markers in human pancreatic cancer.
Expression of pancreatic secretory trypsin inhibitor gene in human colorectal tumor.
An analysis of abnormalities of the retinoblastoma gene in human ovarian and endometrial carcinoma.
The physical state of human papillomavirus 16 DNA in cervical carcinoma and cervical intraepithelial neoplasia.
The World Health Organization's histologic classification of gastrointestinal tumors. A commentary on the second edition.
Distribution of immunoglobulins and secretory component in gastric cancer of the aged.
Growth and spread of hepatocellular carcinoma. A review of 240 consecutive autopsy cases.
DNA analysis of multiple synchronous renal cell carcinomas.
Giant cell tumor of bone. A clinicopathologic and DNA flow cytometric analysis.
Hyperthermia alone in the treatment of recurrences of malignant tumors. Experience with 60 lesions.
Effectiveness of periodic checkup by ultrasonography for the early diagnosis of hepatocellular carcinoma.
Clear cell adenocarcinoma of the lower genital tract. Correlation of mother's recall of diethylstilbestrol history with obstetrical records.
Sarcoid reaction mimicking intrathoracic dissemination of testicular cancer.
Multiple spinal metastases from paraganglioma.
Malignant fibrous histiocytoma developing in bone 44 years after shrapnel trauma.
Genetic diagnosis of Lynch syndrome II in an extended colorectal cancer-prone family.
Cancer in the families of children with soft tissue sarcoma.
Cholecystectomy and right colon cancer in Puerto Rico.
Concomitant cisplatin chemotherapy and radiotherapy in advanced mucosal squamous cell carcinoma of the head and neck. Long-term results of the Radiation Therapy Oncology Group study 81-17.
Treatment of the acquired immune deficiency syndrome-related Kaposi's sarcoma with bleomycin as a single agent.
Final report of the French multicenter phase II study of the nitrosourea fotemustine in 153 evaluable patients with disseminated malignant melanoma including patients with cerebral metastases.
Treatment of advanced neuroblastoma with emphasis on intensive induction chemotherapy. A report from the Study Group of Japan.
Toxic dermatitis induced by 10-ethyl-10-deaza-aminopterin (10-EdAM), a novel antifolate.
Chemotherapy-related hemolytic-uremic syndrome after the treatment of head and neck cancer. A case report.
Primary carcinoma of the upper urinary tract. Effect of primary and secondary therapy on survival.
Osteosarcoma of the maxilla in Hong Kong Chinese postirradiation for nasopharyngeal carcinoma. A report of four cases.
The significance of low-grade prostate cancer on needle biopsy. A radical prostatectomy study of tumor grade, volume, and stage of the biopsied and multifocal tumor.
Perinatal infection of human T-lymphotropic virus type I, the etiologic virus of adult T-cell leukemia/lymphoma. DNA amplification of specific human T-lymphotropic virus type I sequences.
Impaired production of tumor necrosis factor in breast cancer.
Medroxyprogesterone acetate lowers plasma corticotropin and cortisol but does not suppress anterior pituitary responsiveness to human corticotropin releasing factor.
Possible involvement of the retinoblastoma gene in undifferentiated sinonasal carcinoma.
Sialosyl-Tn. A novel mucin antigen associated with prognosis in colorectal cancer patients.
Characterization of epidermal growth factor receptor in normal and neoplastic human endometrium.
Parathyroid hormone-like peptide in normal and neoplastic mesothelial cells.
Increased expression of the multidrug-resistance gene in undifferentiated sarcoma.
Diffuse intermediate lymphocytic lymphoma. A clinicopathologic study and comparison with small lymphocytic lymphoma and diffuse small cleaved cell lymphoma.
Intraoperative pathologic diagnosis of thyroid neoplasms. Report on experience with 504 specimens.
Cerebral tumor staging in patients with bronchial carcinoma by computed tomography.
Infiltration of dendritic cells in relation to tumor invasion and lymph node metastasis in human gastric cancer.
Changes in gastric mucosa that antedate gastric carcinoma.
Intraoral adenoid cystic carcinoma. The presence of perineural spread in relation to site, size, local extension, and metastatic spread in 22 cases.
Predicting distant metastases in operable breast cancer patients.
Familial occurrence of gastric cancer in the 2-year experience of a population-based registry.
The prophylactic use of octreotide in a patient with ovarian carcinoid and valvular heart disease.
Elevated serum bromide concentrations following repeated halothane anaesthesia in a child.
The presence of human papillomavirus (HPV) in solitary adult laryngeal papillomas demonstrated by in-situ DNA hybridization with sulphonated probes.
Chondrosarcoma complicating total hip arthroplasty in Maffucci's syndrome.
Treatment of manifest and impending pathologic fractures of the femoral neck by cemented hemiarthroplasty.
Complications associated with limb salvage for extremity sarcomas and their management.
Leiomyoma of a digital artery.
Posterior nuchal cystic hygroma [published erratum appears in Clin Perinatol 1990 Dec;17(4):viii]
Subpleural mononuclear cell infiltration. Significance in the differential diagnosis of pleuritis showing nonspecific histologic findings.
Feasibility of intraoperative cytodiagnosis of lung cancer.
Concentration of tumor-associated trypsin inhibitor (TATI) in pleural effusions.
Determinants of cell type in patients with cancer of the lungs.
Pulmonary malignant angioendotheliomatosis. Presentation with fever and syndrome of inappropriate antidiuretic hormone.
A case of massive true thymic hyperplasia with non-Hodgkin's lymphoma.
Urogenital dysfunction after abdominoperineal resection for carcinoma of the rectum.
A critical review of chemical lymph node clearance and staging of colon and rectal cancer at Ferguson Hospital, 1977 to 1982
Colonoscopic screening of asymptomatic patients with a family history of colon cancer.
Survival in patients with large-bowel cancer. A population-based investigation from the Melbourne Colorectal Cancer Study.
Endometrioma. An intra-abdominal troublemaker.
Colonic lipoma as a source of massive hemorrhage. Report of a case.
Malignant potential of juvenile polyposis coli. Report of a case and review of the literature.
Early gastric cancer. Endoscopic diagnosis of depth of invasion.
Cholecystokinin stimulates growth of human pancreatic adenocarcinoma SW-1990.
Improved scintigraphic assessment of severe cholestasis with the hepatic extraction fraction.
Prospective study of alcohol intake and large bowel cancer.
Diagnosis of metastatic lesions to the stomach by salvage cytology. A report of three cases.
Primary non-Hodgkin's T-cell lymphoma of the esophagus. A case with peculiar endoscopic ultrasonographic pattern.
Anionic complex-carbohydrate units of human thyroglobulin.
Hormonal treatment of functional ovarian cysts: a randomized, prospective study.
Multiple hormone elevations in Zollinger-Ellison syndrome. Prospective study of clinical significance and of the development of a second symptomatic pancreatic endocrine tumor syndrome.
Detection of duodenal gastrinomas by operative endoscopic transillumination. A prospective study.
Liver fatty acid-binding protein: a marker for studying cellular differentiation in gut epithelial neoplasms.
Caseating hepatic granulomas in Hodgkin's lymphoma.
Colonic lipomas: outcome of endoscopic removal.
Expandable biliary metal stents for malignancies: endoscopic insertion and diathermic cleaning for tumor ingrowth.
Performing screening flexible sigmoidoscopy using colonoscopes: experience in 500 subjects.
Hormonal and enzymatic parameters of hepatic regeneration in patients undergoing major liver resections.
Pathological observations of intrahepatic peribiliary glands in 1,000 consecutive autopsy livers. III. Survey of necroinflammation and cystic dilatation.
Efficacy of transesophageal echocardiography as a perioperative monitor in patients undergoing cardiovascular surgery. Analysis of 149 consecutive studies.
Three staged approach to the surgical management of renal cell carcinoma extending into the right atrium. Case report.
Substance-P is present in a subset of thyrotrophs in the human pituitary.
Parathyroid hormone-like peptide in normal and neoplastic human endocrine tissues.
Insulin-like growth factor-II: possible local growth factor in pheochromocytoma.
Insulin-like growth factor-I receptors in nonfunctioning thyroid nodules.
Transthyretin receptors on human astrocytoma cells.
Clinical review 16: Parathyroid hormone-related proteins: coming of age in the 1990s.
Clonal origin of pituitary adenomas.
Androgen response to endogenous insulin secretion during the frequently sampled intravenous glucose tolerance test in normal and hyperandrogenic women.
Growth of cultured human cerebral meningiomas is inhibited by dopaminergic agents. Presence of high affinity dopamine-D1 receptors.
Endothelin-like immunoreactivity in human breast cyst fluid.
Sensitivity of digoxigenin and biotin labelled probes for detection of human papillomavirus by in situ hybridisation.
Application of 1 nm gold probes on paraffin wax sections for in situ hybridisation histochemistry.
Importance of sampling method in DNA analysis of lung cancer.
Cells immunoreactive for neuropeptide in human thymomas.
Tissue preparation for simultaneous flow cytometric quantitation of tumour associated antigens and DNA in solid tumours.
Value of monoclonal anti-myeloperoxidase (MPO7) for diagnosing acute leukaemia.
Cutaneous manifestations of postthymic T cell malignancies: description of five clinicopathologic subtypes.
Giant eccrine acrospiroma.
Intralesional interferon therapy for basal cell carcinoma.
Autoimmunity and malignancy.
Buschke-Loewenstein tumor: verrucous carcinoma of the penis.
Cutaneous melanoma and bilateral retinoblastoma.
Multicentric cloacogenic carcinoma: report of a case with anogenital pruritus at presentation.
Severe lidocaine intoxication by cutaneous absorption.
Disseminated Kaposi's sarcoma not associated with HIV infection in a bisexual man.
Cutaneous horn of the penis: its association with squamous cell carcinoma and HPV-16 infection.
Lip paresthesia associated with a jaw mass.
Oncogenes and suppressor genes: their involvement in colon cancer [editorial]
Liver transplant for metastatic neuroendocrine tumor.
A nongastrin malignant ampullary tumor causing gastric acid and pepsin hypersecretion. A case report.
Insulinoma after streptozotocin therapy for metastatic gastrinoma: natural history or iatrogenic complication?
Insulin-like growth factor-I supports proliferation of autocrine thymic lymphoma cells with a pre-T cell phenotype.
Regional and systemic distribution of anti-tumor x anti-CD3 heteroaggregate antibodies and cultured human peripheral blood lymphocytes in a human colon cancer xenograft.
Lymphokine-activated killer (LAK) cells. V. 8-Mercaptoguanosine as an IL-2-sparing agent in LAK generation.
Excision repair of pyrimidine dimers induced by simulated solar radiation in the skin of patients with basal cell carcinoma.
Susceptibility to effects of UVB radiation on induction of contact hypersensitivity as a risk factor for skin cancer in humans.
Premalignant lesions and cancers of the skin in the general population: evaluation of the role of human papillomaviruses.
Cytomegalovirus in the brain: in vitro infection of human brain-derived cells.
Distribution and specific identification of papillomavirus major capsid protein epitopes by immunocytochemistry and epitope scanning of synthetic peptides.
Second primary tumours of the larynx following bronchial carcinoma.
Alternating cisplatinum and VAC ineffective in end stage squamous cell carcinoma of the head and neck.
Head and neck cancer and ageing: a retrospective study in 438 patients.
Rhinosporidiosis associated with squamous cell carcinoma in the tongue.
Malignant adenolymphoma of the parotid gland: report of carcinomatous transformation.
Multiple primary malignancies in patients with malignant tumours of the nasal cavities and paranasal sinuses.
Radiation therapy of laryngeal cancer: a twenty year experience.
Effect of microwave and ionizing radiation in patients with recurrent laryngeal carcinoma.
Benign parotid tumour enucleation--a reliable operation in selected cases.
Hoarseness as the sole presenting symptom of foramen magnum meningioma.
Laryngeal metastasis from colonic adenocarcinoma.
Intralaryngotracheal thyroid.
Mid-line presentation of cervical lymphomata.
Causes of death in hospitalized intravenous drug abusers.
Lambert Eaton syndrome: autonomic neuropathy and inappropriate antidiuretic hormone secretion in a patient with small cell carcinoma of the lung.
Prognostic value of c-myc proto-oncogene overexpression in early invasive carcinoma of the cervix.
High- versus standard-dose megestrol acetate in women with advanced breast cancer: a phase III trial of the Piedmont Oncology Association.
Epirubicin cardiotoxicity: a study of 135 patients with advanced breast cancer.
Acute renal dysfunction during interleukin-2 treatment: suggestion of an intrinsic renal lesion.
Long-term sequelae of conservative treatment by surgery, brachytherapy, and chemotherapy for vulval and vaginal rhabdomyosarcoma in children.
Questionable role of CNS radioprophylaxis in the therapeutic management of childhood rhabdomyosarcoma with meningeal extension.
Treatment of metastatic melanoma with an autologous tumor-cell vaccine: clinical and immunologic results in 64 patients.
Human tumor fluorouracil trapping: clinical correlations of in vivo 19F nuclear magnetic resonance spectroscopy pharmacokinetics.
Changes in the clearance of total and unbound etoposide in patients with liver dysfunction.
Clinical evaluation of a side entry access port: a novel dual-lumen venous access device.
A prospective, randomized evaluation of the treatment of colorectal cancer metastatic to the liver.
Quantitative analysis of antibody localization in human metastatic colon cancer: a phase I study of monoclonal antibody A33.
An early phase II study of CPT-11: a new derivative of camptothecin, for the treatment of leukemia and lymphoma.
The unique aspects of acute promyelocytic leukemia.
Intraperitoneal yttrium-90-labeled monoclonal antibody in ovarian cancer
Pediatric osteosarcoma: therapeutic strategies, results, and prognostic factors derived from a 10-year experience.
Current urinary mass screening for catecholamine metabolites at 6 months of age may be detecting only a small portion of high-risk neuroblastomas: a chromosome and N-myc amplification study.
Mechlorethamine, vincristine, and procarbazine chemotherapy for recurrent high-grade glioma in adults: a phase II study.
Phase II study of fluorouracil and recombinant interferon alfa-2a in previously untreated advanced colorectal carcinoma.
Adjuvant cyclophosphamide, methotrexate, and fluorouracil in patients with axillary node-positive breast cancer: an update of the Guy's/Manchester trial.
Node-negative breast cancer: prognostic subgroups defined by tumor size and flow cytometry
Drug-induced DNA damage and tumor chemosensitivity.
Magnetic resonance imaging contrast agents: theory and application to the central nervous system.
Clinoidal meningiomas.
Motility factor produced by malignant glioma cells: role in tumor invasion.
Antigen related to cell proliferation in malignant gliomas recognized by a human monoclonal antibody.
Evidence of a local immune activation in cystic brain tumors.
Epithelial cyst of the fourth ventricle. Case report.
Recurrence of acoustic neurilemoma as a malignant spindle-cell neoplasm. Case report.
Administered dose and tumor dose of bleomycin labeled with cobalt-57 in mice and men.
Imaging of tumor in patients with indium-111-labeled biotin and streptavidin-conjugated antibodies: preliminary communication
Immunoscintigraphy of ovarian cancer with indium-111-labeled OV-TL 3 F(ab')2 monoclonal antibody.
The potential of 2-deoxy-2[18F]fluoro-D-glucose (FDG) for the detection of tumor involvement in lymph nodes.
Radioimmunoscintigraphy using iodine-131-anti-CEA monoclonal antibodies and thallium-201 scintigraphy in medullary thyroid carcinoma: a case report.
Treatment planning for internal radionuclide therapy: three-dimensional dosimetry for nonuniformly distributed radionuclides.
Effects of energy restriction on mouse mammary tumor virus mRNA levels in mammary glands and uterus and on uterine endometrial hyperplasia and pituitary histology in C3H/SHN F1 mice.
Implementation of cancer prevention guidelines in clinical practice.
Implementation of preventive services in an HMO practice.
Breast cancer screening: who should be included?
Colorectal cancer: have we identified an effective screening strategy?
The impact of the U.S. Preventive Services Task Force guidelines on cancer screening: perspective from the National Cancer Institute.
Squamous cell carcinoma-antigen for detection of squamous cell and mucoepidermoid carcinoma after primary treatment: a preliminary report.
Pedunculated soft-tissue mass on the alveolar gingiva [clinical conference]
Mucous cell hyperplasia in an odontogenic cyst from a patient with Muir-Torre syndrome.
Serial magnetic resonance imaging in neonatal hypoxic-ischemic encephalopathy.
Interaction between trimethoprim-sulfamethoxazole and methotrexate in children with leukemia.
Laparoscopic management of ovarian cysts.
Expression of the MDR1 gene in human gastric and colorectal carcinomas.
Race, nutritional status, and survival from breast cancer.
Effect of tamoxifen on serum insulinlike growth factor I levels in stage I breast cancer patients.
Reduction of the membrane fluidity of human breast cancer cells by tamoxifen and 17 beta-estradiol.
Antitumor activity of liposome-encapsulated doxorubicin in advanced breast cancer: phase II study.
Oral zidovudine, continuous-infusion fluorouracil, and oral leucovorin calcium: a phase I study.
Validation of intermediate end points in cancer research.
Inhibition of invasion of invasive human bladder carcinoma cells by protein kinase C inhibitor staurosporine.
Anti-idiotype monoclonal antibody carrying the internal image of ganglioside GM3.
Nonrandom chromosomal abnormalities in primary uveal melanoma.
Prospective study of the frequency and size distribution of polyps missed by colonoscopy.
Mutagen sensitivity in patients with head and neck cancers: a biologic marker for risk of multiple primary malignancies.
Parotid gland and facial nerve trauma: a retrospective review.
Neoadjuvant chemotherapy in invasive bladder cancer: the evolving role of surgery.
Incidence and properties of renal masses and asymptomatic renal cell carcinoma detected by abdominal ultrasonography.
Magnetic resonance imaging for assessment of vena caval tumor thrombi: a comparative study with venacavography and computerized tomography scanning.
Ureterosigmoidostomy: long-term results, risk of carcinoma and etiological factors for carcinogenesis.
Primary adenocarcinoma of the bladder: favorable prognostic significance of deoxyribonucleic acid diploidy measured by flow cytometry.
Randomized phase II evaluation of carboplatin and CHIP in advanced transitional cell carcinoma of the urothelium. The Eastern Cooperative Oncology Group.
Perioperative methotrexate, vinblastine, doxorubicin and cisplatin (M-VAC) for poor risk transitional cell carcinoma of the bladder: an Eastern Cooperative Oncology Group pilot study.
Local recurrence and survival following nerve-sparing radical cystoprostatectomy.
Testicular carcinoma in patients positive and at risk for human immunodeficiency virus.
Clinical stage 1 testicular cancer: the role of modified retroperitoneal lymphadenectomy.
Erythrocyte polyamine levels in human prostatic carcinoma.
The relationship of prostate specific antigen levels and residual tumor volume in stage A prostate cancer.
Prostate specific antigen for assessing response to ketoconazole and prednisone in patients with hormone refractory metastatic prostate cancer.
Radical prostatectomy for clinical stage T1-2N0M0 prostatic adenocarcinoma: long-term results.
Pheochromocytoma in the pediatric age group: the prostate--an unusual location.
Nuclear morphometry as a prognostic indicator for genitourinary rhabdomyosarcoma: a preliminary investigation.
De novo carcinoma of the lower urinary tract in renal allograft recipients.
Retroperitoneal lymph node dissection in malignant mesothelioma of tunica vaginalis testis.
Long term effects of gastrocystoplasty in rats.
Fatal sepsis following intravesical bacillus Calmette-Guerin administration for bladder cancer.
Fatal disseminated mycobacterial infection following intravesical bacillus Calmette-Guerin.
Nephron-sparing surgery for renal cell carcinoma with venous involvement.
Adverse impact of fibrin clot inhibitors on intravesical bacillus Calmette-Guerin therapy for superficial bladder tumors.
Outpatient flexible cystoscopy and fulguration of recurrent superficial bladder tumors.
Primary malignant lymphoma of the bladder.
Clinical and pathological findings in prostates following intravesical bacillus Calmette-Guerin instillations.
The prognostic value of modal deoxyribonucleic acid in low grade, low stage untreated prostate cancer.
Evaluation of tumor progression by repeated fine needle biopsies in prostate adenocarcinoma: modal deoxyribonucleic acid value and cytological differentiation.
Management of stage D1 adenocarcinoma of the prostate: the Johns Hopkins experience 1974 to 1987.
Total pelvic exenteration with simultaneous bowel and urinary reconstruction.
Isolated primary aldosteronism in a patient with adrenal carcinoma and XY/XXY mosaic Klinefelter's syndrome.
Transrectal ultrasonography in the evaluation of the infertile man: a report of 3 cases.
Gonadoblastoma in an anatomically normal man: a case report and literature review.
In situ hybridization of prostate-specific antigen mRNA in human prostate.
Popliteal artery occlusion caused by cystic adventitial disease: successful treatment by urokinase followed by nonresectional cystotomy.
Prospective study of estrogen replacement therapy and risk of breast cancer in postmenopausal women [published erratum appears in JAMA 1991 Apr 10;265(14):1828]
Preoperative cell-mediated immune function and the prognosis of patients with gastric carcinoma.
Adenocarcinoma arising in Barrett's esophagus.
Small cell carcinoma of the pancreas and biliary tract.
Neoadjuvant Cis-DDP in esophageal cancers: an experience at a regional cancer centre, India.
Obstructing carcinoma of the cecum.
Complications of stapled anastomoses in anterior resection for rectal carcinoma: colorectal anastomosis versus coloanal anastomosis.
Carcinoma of the pancreas: a retrospective review.
In vivo selection and characterization of a murine mammary tumor subline with high potential for spontaneous lymph node metastasis.
Ampullary carcinoma in patients under 50 years of age with a poor prognosis.
Colon carcinoma associated with ureterosigmoidostomy.
Metastatic tumors of the umbilicus: a review 1830-1989.
Parathyroid hormone-related peptide in plasma of patients with hypercalcemia and malignant lesions
Diagnosis of malignant cardiac disease by endomyocardial biopsy
Paraneoplastic cerebellar degeneration: a clinical comparison of patients with and without Purkinje cell cytoplasmic antibodies.
Renal cell carcinoma associated with sarcoidlike tissue reaction.
Malignant transformation of adenomatous hyperplasia to hepatocellular carcinoma.
Efficacy and morbidity of partial laryngectomy and postoperative radiation therapy.
1990 Ogura memorial lecture: moral dilemmas in head and neck cancer.
The efficacy of comprehensive neck dissection with or without postoperative radiotherapy in nodal metastases of squamous cell carcinoma of the upper respiratory and digestive tracts.
Flexible Nd:YAG laser palliation of obstructive tracheal metastatic malignancies.
Carcinoma of the external auditory canal: an update.
Variations on the temporoparietal fascial flap.
Primary central nervous system lymphoma in patients with and without the acquired immune deficiency syndrome. A retrospective analysis and review of the literature.
Altered expression of the retinoblastoma gene product in human sarcomas.
Relation of meat, fat, and fiber intake to the risk of colon cancer in a prospective study among women.
Overall mortality and cancer mortality around French nuclear sites
A downstream initiation element required for efficient TATA box binding and in vitro function of TFIID.
Circulating CD8+ cytotoxic T lymphocytes specific for HTLV-I pX in patients with HTLV-I associated neurological disease.
Inhibition of tumor growth in a glioma model treated with boron neutron capture therapy.
Characterization of a newly established malignant meningioma cell line of the human brain: IOMM-Lee.
Functional results of facial nerve suture after removal of acoustic neurinoma: analysis of 25 cases.
Extracranial repair of cerebrospinal fluid fistulas: technique and results in 37 patients.
Symptomatic pineal cyst: case report.
Clinical study of intracranial nongerminomatous germ cell tumors producing alpha-fetoprotein.
Vagal schwannoma associated with syncopal attacks and postural hypotension: a case report.
Multiple intracranial tumors of different cell types.
Occult vascular malformations of the optic chiasm: magnetic resonance imaging diagnosis and surgical laser resection.
A case of dyschondroplasia associated with brain stem glioma: diagnosis by stereotactic biopsy.
An unusual complication of silastic dural substitute: case report.
Brain stem and spinal metastases of supratentorial glioblastoma multiforme: a clinical series.
Ultrastructural evidence for differentiation in a human glioblastoma cell line treated with inhibitors of eicosanoid metabolism.
Epidermoid tumors of the 4th ventricle: report of seven cases.
Changes in intracochlear and intracanalicular nerves after acoustic neurinoma excision confirmed by magnetic resonance imaging.
Clinicopathological experience with pineocytomas: report of five surgically treated cases.
Subdural hematoma associated with metastatic neoplasms.
Maffucci's syndrome with bilateral cartilaginous tumors of the cerebellopontine angle.
Concurrent intradural and extradural meningiomas of the cervical spine.
Intradural spinal cord tumor presenting as a subarachnoid hemorrhage: magnetic resonance imaging diagnosis.
Radiation necrosis of the optic chiasm, optic tract, hypothalamus, and upper pons after radiotherapy for pituitary adenoma, detected by gadolinium-enhanced, T1-weighted magnetic resonance imaging: case report.
Pituitary hemorrhage into a Rathke's cleft cyst
Suprasellar pituitary adenoma arising from the pars tuberalis: case report.
Central neurogenic hyperventilation: pharmacologic intervention with morphine sulfate and correlative analysis of respiratory, sleep, and ocular motor dysfunction.
Procarbazine chemotherapy in the treatment of recurrent malignant astrocytomas after radiation and nitrosourea failure.
Antibodies to synthetic peptide (125-148) of the alpha-subunit of human nicotinic acetylcholine receptor in sera from patients with myasthenia gravis.
Cavernous hemangioma of the spinal cord: report of 2 unusual cases.
Classification of endometrial cells on cervical cytology.
A randomized trial comparing two methods of cold knife conization with laser conization.
Basement membrane of cervical adenocarcinoma: an immunoperoxidase study of laminin and type IV collagen.
Treatment of fallopian tube carcinoma with cisplatin, doxorubicin, and cyclophosphamide.
Debulking of pelvic and para-aortic lymph node metastases in ovarian cancer with the cavitron ultrasonic surgical aspirator.
The significance of moderate and severe inflammation on class I Papanicolaou smear
Vitreous changes and macular edema in central retinal vein occlusion.
Management of macular puckers associated with retinal angiomas.
Experience with photocoagulation in Behcet's disease.
Fluorescein angiography in ciliary body melanomas.
Visual disturbance in patients with melanocytoma of the optic disk.
Argon green (514 nm) versus krypton red (647 nm) modified grid laser photocoagulation for diffuse diabetic macular edema.
The epidemiology of ophthalmic malignancies in New York State.
Introducing the 'walk-up' flap.
Multiple myeloma and bullous lichenoid lesions: an unusual association.
Thermally induced 'nicotine' stomatitis. A case report.
Diagnosis of oral hairy leukoplakia by ultrastructural examination of exfoliative cytologic specimens.
The cellular composition of basal cell adenoma of the parotid gland: an immunohistochemical analysis.
Primary malignant melanoma in the parotid gland.
Clinical and instrumental evaluation of sensory function before and after percutaneous anterolateral cordotomy at cervical level in man.
Screening for neuroblastoma at 3 weeks of age: methods and preliminary results from the Quebec Neuroblastoma Screening Project.
When epilepsy masquerades as heart disease. Awareness is key to avoiding misdiagnosis.
Expression of murine renin genes in subcutaneous connective tissue.
E1a-dependent expression of adenovirus genes in OTF963 embryonal carcinoma cells: role of E1a-induced differentiation.
The human immunodeficiency virus type 2 vpr gene is essential for productive infection of human macrophages.
Human colorectal cancers display abnormal Fourier-transform infrared spectra.
A rhesus monkey model for sexual transmission of a papillomavirus isolated from a squamous cell carcinoma.
Transfer of secretory proteins from the endoplasmic reticulum to the Golgi apparatus: discrimination between homologous and heterologous transfer in intact heterokaryons.
Adult T-cell leukemia-derived factor/thioredoxin, produced by both human T-lymphotropic virus type I- and Epstein-Barr virus-transformed lymphocytes, acts as an autocrine growth factor and synergizes with interleukin 1 and interleukin 2.
The recombinant immunotoxin anti-Tac(Fv)-Pseudomonas exotoxin 40 is cytotoxic toward peripheral blood malignant cells from patients with adult T-cell leukemia.
A 170-kDa membrane-bound protease is associated with the expression of invasiveness by human malignant melanoma cells.
Homeobox gene expression plus autocrine growth factor production elicits myeloid leukemia.
Introduction of nerve growth factor (NGF) receptors into a medulloblastoma cell line results in expression of high- and low-affinity NGF receptors but not NGF-mediated differentiation.
Rapid, nonradioactive detection of clonal T-cell receptor gene rearrangements in lymphoid neoplasms.
Dioxin-inducible, Ah receptor-dependent transcription in vitro.
Molecular structure of a major insulin/mitogen-activated 70-kDa S6 protein kinase.
Identical splicing of aberrant epidermal growth factor receptor transcripts from amplified rearranged genes in human glioblastomas.
Correlation of the structure of the transmembrane domain of the neu oncogene-encoded p185 protein with its function.
Sixty consecutive breast reconstructions with the inflatable expander: a critical appraisal.
A prospective clinical evaluation of autogenous vein grafts used as a nerve conduit for distal sensory nerve defects of 3 cm or less.
Dacron fabric-enveloped hydroxyapatite prosthesis for sternal tumor defect: an autopsy report.
Interventional radiology of the biliary tract. Intraductal radiation.
Pneumonia due to Legionella micdadei in bone marrow transplant recipients.
Current advances in the diagnosis and treatment of AIDS: an introduction.
Cytomegalovirus infections in bone marrow transplant recipients given intensive cytoreductive therapy.
Detection of bcr-abl fusion in chronic myelogeneous leukemia by in situ hybridization.
Regulation of gene expression with double-stranded phosphorothioate oligonucleotides.
Survey of Alabama physicians' use of mammography, 1989.
Preventing colorectal cancer.
Synchronous Hodgkin's disease and myelofibrosis terminating with granulocytic sarcoma and acute megakaryocytic leukemia.
Adenocarcinoma of the appendiceal stump.
Trabecular or Merkel's cell carcinoma.
Adenocarcinoma of the colon occurring with intussusception in an adolescent.
The predictive value of needle localization mammographically assisted biopsy of the breast.
Focal nodular hyperplasia of the liver.
Time to recurrence varies inversely with thickness in clinical stage 1 cutaneous melanoma.
Repeat hepatic resection for primary and metastatic carcinoma of the liver.
Mediastinal tracheostomy using a pectoralis major myocutaneous flap after resection of carcinoma of the esophagus involving the proximal part of the trachea.
The justification for surgical treatment of metastatic melanoma of the gastrointestinal tract.
Hepatic resection for advanced hepatocellular carcinoma with removal of portal vein tumor thrombi.
Decollateralization with silicone rubber sheeting for advanced hepatocellular carcinoma: a preliminary report.
The role of gastric resection in the management of multicentric argyrophil gastric carcinoids.
Portal vein resection with a new antithrombogenic catheter.
Adoptive immunotherapy of human pancreatic cancer with lymphokine-activated killer cells and interleukin-2 in a nude mouse model.
Radiation therapy of early (stages I and II-A) seminoma of testis after initial orchiectomy.
Management of superficial G2 (pTa and pT1) bladder cancer.
Radiologic staging of chest in testicular seminoma.
Oncocytic renal tubular adenoma (so-called oncocytoma) in seventeen-year-old girl.
Intravesical condyloma acuminatum with progression to verrucous carcinoma.
Constitutional symptoms in patients with germ cell neoplasms.
Natural history of cardiac rhabdomyoma in infancy and childhood.
Diet and female sex hormone concentrations: an intervention study for the type of fat consumed.
Dietary fat and risk of breast cancer.
Breast cancer and dietary and plasma concentrations of carotenoids and vitamin A.
Follicular neoplasms of the thyroid in men older than 50 years of age. A DNA flow cytometric study
Potential value of hormone receptor assay in carcinoma in situ of breast.
Survey of histologic specimens of human cancer for human papillomavirus types 6/11/16/18 by filter in situ hybridization.
Improved flow cytometric determination of proliferative activity (S-phase fraction) from paraffin-embedded tissue.
Demonstration of Lipiodol in paraffin sections using a modified silver impregnation technique.
Immunophenotypic aberrancy in adult acute lymphoblastic leukemia.
Microstaging of squamous cell carcinomas.
Mucinous adenocarcinoma of the prostate with endobronchial metastasis.
Malignant rhabdoid tumor of the liver. A distinct clinicopathologic entity.
Primary malignant melanoma of the lower respiratory tract. Report of a case and literature review.
Clinicopathologic features and long-term results of alpha-fetoprotein-producing gastric cancer.
Adenocarcinoma arising in Barrett's esophagus after total gastrectomy
Granular cell tumor of the esophagus: endoscopic ultrasonographic demonstration and endoscopic removal.
Diffuse hemangiomatosis of the spleen: splenic hemangiomatosis presenting with giant splenomegaly, anemia, and thrombocytopenia.
A chance to cut is a chance to cure?
Ten-year prospective study on the development of renal cell carcinoma in dialysis patients.
The mutation for medullary thyroid carcinoma with parathyroid tumors (MTC with PTs) is closely linked to the centromeric region of chromosome 10.
A new DNA marker (D10S94) very tightly linked to the multiple endocrine neoplasia type 2A (MEN2A) locus.
The importance of cytogenetic studies in adult acute lymphocytic leukemia.
Endometrioma of the liver.
Hemoperitoneum as a result of coital injury without associated vaginal injury.
Management of selected cystic adnexal masses in postmenopausal women by operative laparoscopy: a pilot study.
Ultrasonographic assessment of placental abnormalities.
Preferential mitogenic activity for myoblast-like cells can be extracted from uterine leiomyoma tissues.
Practical aspects of pulsatile gonadotropin-releasing hormone administration.
Ocular adnexal Kaposi's sarcoma in acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Traumatic enucleation for posterior uveal melanoma.
A randomized study of methanol-extraction residue of bacille Calmette-Guerin as postsurgical adjuvant therapy of uveal melanoma.
The value of nucleolar organizer regions in uveal melanoma. The Collaborative Ocular Melanoma Study Group.
Immunohistologic properties of benign and malignant mixed tumor of the lacrimal gland.
A clinicopathologic study of the eyes in familial adenomatous polyposis with extracolonic manifestations (Gardner's syndrome).
Increase of beta 1-6-branched oligosaccharides in human esophageal carcinomas invasive against surrounding tissue in vivo and in vitro.
Vimentin is preferentially expressed in high-grade ductal and medullary, but not in lobular breast carcinomas.
Inhibition of angiogenesis and tumor growth in the brain. Suppression of endothelial cell turnover by penicillamine and the depletion of copper, an angiogenic cofactor.
Coexpression patterns of vimentin and glial filament protein with cytokeratins in the normal, hyperplastic, and neoplastic breast.
A,B blood group antigens in tissues of AB heterozygotes. Emphasis on normal and neoplastic urothelium.
Flow cytometric analysis of the mechanism of methylmercury cytotoxicity.
Expression of aminopeptidase N (CD13) in mesenchymal tumors.
Immunocytochemical localization of progesterone receptors in endocrine cells of the human pancreas.
Immediate versus delayed shoulder exercises after axillary lymph node dissection.
Variations in sensitivity after sectioning the intercostobrachial nerve.
Anaesthetic problems in ex situ resection of the liver.
Anesthesia for craniotomy: a double-blind comparison of alfentanil, fentanyl, and sufentanil.
Infection during chronic epidural catheterization: diagnosis and treatment.
The single-breath nitrogen test, mortality, and cancer.
Frequency and clinical implications of monoclonal antibody detection of tumor-associated antigens in serum of patients with lung cancer.
Cecal diverticulitis presented as a cecal tumor.
Jejunal-rectal fistula as a complication of postoperative radiotherapy.
Risk for colon adenomas in patients with rectosigmoid hyperplastic polyps
Tumor cell lines established in vitro: an independent prognostic factor for survival in non-small-cell lung cancer.
The internist in the management of head and neck cancer.
Colorectal cancer: evidence for distinct genetic categories based on proximal or distal tumor location
Histopathologic grading of salivary gland neoplasms: II. Acinic cell carcinomas.
Myasthenic thymus and thymoma are selectively enriched in acetylcholine receptor-reactive T cells.
Cutaneous T-cell lymphoma (parapsoriasis en plaque). An association with pityriasis lichenoides et varioliformis acuta in young children.
MY7 monoclonal antibody for diagnosis of cutaneous T-cell lymphoma.
Positive results of combined therapy of surgery and intraperitoneal hyperthermic perfusion for far-advanced gastric cancer.
Intrarectal ultrasonography in rectal cancer staging and in the evaluation of pelvic disease. Clinical uses of intrarectal ultrasound.
Localization and peptide content of endocrine pancreatic tumors.
Localization and surgical treatment of occult insulinomas.
Surgical management of pheochromocytoma with the use of metyrosine.
Strategy for lymphadenectomy in lung cancer three centimeters or less in diameter
Surgical management of pulmonary metastatic leiomyosarcoma with gross endobronchial extension.
Giant chest wall tumor resulting from tissue reaction to foreign bodies.
Thoracoscopic treatment of spontaneous pneumothorax using carbon dioxide laser.
Vagal schwannoma.
Successful Fontan-type operation for a nonresectable right ventricular tumor.
Mediastinal hibernoma, a rare tumor.
Acute hypercalcemic crisis after an open heart operation.
Long-term results of operation for non-small cell lung cancer in the elderly.
Congenital tracheoesophageal fistula associated with carcinoma of the lung in an adult.
Bronchial anomaly of the right upper lobe.
Squamous carcinoma metastatic to the sternum.
Malignant thymoma presenting as intracardiac tumor and superior vena caval obstruction.
Empiric treatment of fungal infections in the neutropenic host. Review of the literature and guidelines for use.
Systemic therapy in metastatic colorectal cancer.
Acute renal failure in obstructive jaundice in cholangiocarcinoma.
Medical comorbidity of major depressive disorder in a primary medical practice.
Pheochromocytoma presenting as rhabdomyolysis and acute myoglobinuric renal failure.
Lower extremity weakness as the initial manifestation of lung cancer [published erratum appears in Arch Phys Med Rehabil 1991 Jan;72(1):61]
Needle-localized mammographic lesions. Results and evolving treatment strategy.
Hepatic vein reconstruction for preserving remnant liver function.
Primary malignant peritoneal mesothelioma. A report of seven cases and a review of the literature.
Management of perineal wounds following abdominoperineal resection with inferior gluteal flaps.
The papillary-cystic neoplasm of the pancreas. An increasingly recognized clinicopathologic entity.
Retrovirus from human T-cell leukemia virus type I-associated myelopathy is the same strain as a prototype human T-cell leukemia virus type I.
Molecular phenotype of a pediatric small round cell tumor.
Decrease in cerebral metabolic rate of glucose after high-dose methotrexate in childhood acute lymphocytic leukemia.
Photodynamic therapy with chloroaluminum-sulfonated phthalocyanine.
Photodynamic therapy in the treatment of squamous cell carcinoma of the head and neck.
Leiomyosarcoma of the sinonasal tract. A clinicopathologic study of nine cases.
Flow cytometric DNA content of adenoid cystic carcinoma of submandibular gland. Correlation of histologic features and prognosis.
Improving diagnostic accuracy of cervical metastases with computed tomography and magnetic resonance imaging.
The in vivo biologic effect of interleukin 2 and interferon alfa on natural immunity in patients with head and neck cancer.
Metastasizing pleomorphic adenoma of the nasal septum.
Chondrosarcoma of the larynx. Diagnosis with magnetic resonance imaging and computed tomography.
Reliability of colposcopy and directed punch biopsy
The management of primary fallopian tube carcinoma.
Interleukin-6 (IL-6) is an intermediate in IL-1-induced proliferation of leukemic human megakaryoblasts.
Induction of in vitro graft-versus-leukemia activity following bone marrow transplantation for chronic myeloid leukemia.
Deletion of the human retinoblastoma gene in primary leukemias.
Expression of P-glycoprotein in adult T-cell leukemia cells.
Association of bcl-1 rearrangements with lymphocytic lymphoma of intermediate differentiation.
Psychological outcomes of different treatment policies in women with early breast cancer outside a clinical trial
Chronic anaemia, hyperbaric oxygen and tumour radiosensitivity.
Lipiodol computerized tomography: how sensitive and specific is the technique in the diagnosis of hepatocellular carcinoma?
Choroid plexus cysts and chromosomal defects
Clinical management of port-wine stain in infants and young children using the flashlamp-pulsed dye laser.
Predictive value of congenital hypertrophy of the retinal pigment epithelium as a clinical marker for familial adenomatous polyposis.
Effects of preoperative radiotherapy on rectal cancer. Preliminary report on combining radiation with intratumor injections of peplomycin and bromodeoxyuridine.
Erythrocyte stearic acid desaturation in patients with colorectal carcinoma.
Nitrite from inflammatory cells--a cancer risk factor in ulcerative colitis?
Passage of a colon 'cast' after anoabdominal rectal resection. Report of a case.
Characterization in vitro of a human tumor necrosis factor-binding protein. A soluble form of a tumor necrosis factor receptor.
Whole-body lipolysis and triglyceride-fatty acid cycling in cachectic patients with esophageal cancer.
Potent toxicity of 2-chlorodeoxyadenosine toward human monocytes in vitro and in vivo. A novel approach to immunosuppressive therapy.
Elevated insulin receptor content in human breast cancer.
Epidermal growth factor regulates the in vitro sensitivity of human ovarian carcinoma cells to cisplatin.
A phosphatase activity present in peripheral blood myeloid cells of chronic myelogenous leukemia patients but not normal individuals alters nuclear protein binding to transcriptional enhancers of interferon-inducible genes.
Quality control practices in centralized tumor registries in North America.
Adverse mortality experience of a southwestern American Indian community: overall death rates and underlying causes of death in Pima Indians.
Shortcut method to calculate the sample size in trials of screening for chronic disease.
Atheroemboli to the lower urinary tract: a marker of atherosclerotic vascular disease--a case report.
Family cancer syndrome: a study of the kindred of a man with osteogenic sarcoma of the mandible.
Chondrosarcoma of the head and neck.
The melanocyte and melanoma.
A palmar dermatosis linked to occult carcinoma of the upper thorax, head and neck: Bazex's syndrome and tripe palm.
The Cancer Prevention Reminder System.
Prophylaxis of aphakic cystoid macular edema without corticosteroids. A paired-comparison, placebo-controlled double-masked study.
Ki-67 immunostaining in uveal melanoma. The effect of pre-enucleation radiotherapy.
Immunoblastic T-cell lymphoma presenting as an eyelid tumor.
Emergent signs of cancer. Recognizing them early in the office or ER.
585 nm for the treatment of port-wine stains.
Reasons why mastectomy patients do not have breast reconstruction.
Mammographic measurements before and after augmentation mammaplasty.
Combined tensor fasciae latae musculocutaneous flap and sartorius musculocutaneous flap for the repair of wide defects of the lower leg.
Metabolism of human gliomas: assessment with H-1 MR spectroscopy and F-18 fluorodeoxyglucose PET
Chemical shift imaging of human brain: axial, sagittal, and coronal P-31 metabolite images.
Rhabdomyosarcomas in the head and neck: MR imaging evaluation.
Mucocele of the cystic duct remnant in eight liver transplant recipients: findings at cholangiography, CT, and US.
Colorectal tumors: an in vitro study of high-resolution MR imaging.
Colonic stenoses: use of oral barium when retrograde flow is completely obstructed on barium enema studies.
Hepatic tumors: signal enhancement at Doppler US after intravenous injection of a contrast agent.
Receptor imaging: application to MR imaging of liver cancer.
Hilar malignancy: treatment with an expandable metallic transhepatic biliary stent.
Invasive papillary carcinoma of the breast: mammographic appearance.
Mixed form, diffusely scattered calcifications in breast cancer with apocrine features
Cystic rheumatoid arthritis: description of a nonerosive form.
Widespread inflammatory response to osteoblastoma: the flare phenomenon.
Small cell lung cancer: staging with MR imaging.
Small nodular lesions in the lung periphery: new approach to diagnosis with CT.
Retroviral recombination and reverse transcription.
Germ line p53 mutations in a familial syndrome of breast cancer, sarcomas, and other neoplasms
Biopsy of the breast for mammographically detected lesions.
Trends in conserving treatment of invasive carcinoma of the breast in females.
Correlation between hyperthermoradiosensitivity and clinical effect in carcinoma of the esophagus.
Neoplastic changes in the stomach after gastrectomy.
Therapeutic dilemmas associated with antenatally detected ovarian cysts.
Intraoperative pressure profile measurement and continence mechanism adjustment in the Indiana pouch urinary reservoir.
Magnetic resonance imaging of experimental rat brain tumors: histopathological evaluation.
Third ventricle cavernous angioma: report of two cases.
Magnetic resonance imaging of vertebral osteoblastoma: a report of two cases.
Aqueductal (pencil) glioma presenting as neurogenic pulmonary edema: a case report.
Computed tomography and bronchoscopy in chest radiographically occult main-stem neoplasm diagnosis and Nd-YAG laser treatment in 8 patients.
Correlation of free phenytoin to serum albumin in cancer patients.
Fine-needle aspiration cytology and flow cytometry of intracystic papillary carcinoma of breast
Ki67 index and S-phase fraction in human breast carcinomas. Comparison and correlations with prognostic factors.
Cytologic features of poorly differentiated 'insular' carcinoma of the thyroid, as revealed by fine-needle aspiration biopsy.
Diagnosis and localization of prostate carcinoma by fine-needle aspiration cytology and correlation with histologic whole-organ sections after radical prostatectomy.
Immunocytochemical profile of benign and carcinomatous effusions. A practical approach to difficult diagnosis.
Unusual variants of adrenal pseudocysts with intracystic fat, myelolipomatous metaplasia, and metastatic carcinoma.
Secondary T-cell lymphoproliferation after marrow transplantation.
Primary lymphoma of the central nervous system in two children with acquired immune deficiency syndrome.
Strategy for breakpoint cluster region analysis in chronic myelocytic leukemia in a routine clinical laboratory.
Angiocentric lymphoma with histologic features of neoplastic angioendotheliomatosis presenting with predominant respiratory and hematologic manifestations. Report of a case and review of the literature
Myofibroblastoma of the tongue. An immunohistochemical, ultrastructural, and flow cytometric study.
Multiple myeloma and acute megakaryoblast leukemia in spent phase polycythemia vera.
Patency rate of implantable devices during long-term intraarterial chemotherapy.
Intraocular lens complications.
Effect of bleomycin on hematoporphyrin derivative phototherapy of solid tumors.
Endoscopic management of early supraglottic cancer.
The association of selected cancers with service in the US military in Vietnam. II. Soft-tissue and other sarcomas. The Selected Cancers Cooperative Study Group
The association of selected cancers with service in the US military in Vietnam. III. Hodgkin's disease, nasal cancer, nasopharyngeal cancer, and primary liver cancer. The Selected Cancers Cooperative Study Group
Lymphomatoid granulomatosis presenting as ulcerodestructive gastrointestinal tract lesions in patients with human immunodeficiency virus infection. A new association.
The dichotomous distribution of gastrinomas.
Generation of human monoclonal antibodies against colon cancer.
Detection of primary colorectal cancer with indium 111 monoclonal antibody B72.3.
Metastatic ciliary body carcinoid tumor.
A study of immunoglobulin G in the cerebrospinal fluid of 1007 patients with suspected neurological disease using isoelectric focusing and the Log IgG-Index. A comparison and diagnostic applications.
Oral contraceptives and breast cancer. Review and meta-analysis.
Predictive value of tumor estrogen and progesterone receptor levels in postmenopausal women with advanced breast cancer treated with toremifene.
Combined modality therapy for locally advanced non-small cell lung carcinoma.
Low-dose preoperative radiation postpones recurrences in operable rectal cancer. Results of a randomized multicenter trial in western Norway.
Comparison of lymphangiography and computed tomography scanning in evaluating abdominal disease in stages III and IV Hodgkin's disease. A Southwest Oncology Group study.
Piroxicam decreases postirradiation colonic neoplasia in the rat.
Diffuse sclerosing variant of papillary carcinoma of the thyroid. Clinical importance, surgical treatment, and follow-up study.
Can internal mammary chain treatment decrease the risk of death for patients with medial breast cancers and positive axillary lymph nodes?
Superficial esophageal carcinoma. Surgical treatment and the results.
The concept of locally advanced gastric cancer. Effect of treatment on outcome. The Gastrointestinal Tumor Study Group.
Lack of relationship between perioperative blood transfusion and survival time after curative resection for gastric cancer.
Transrectal ultrasonography of rectal carcinoma.
The effect of dietary omega-3 fatty acids (fish oil) on azoxymethanol-induced focal areas of dysplasia and colon tumor incidence.
Aneuploidy in pancreatic insulinomas does not predict malignancy.
Comparative study of cutaneous T-cell lymphoma and adult T-cell leukemia/lymphoma. Clinical, histopathologic, and immunohistochemical analyses.
von Willebrand factor in head and neck cancer.
Tumor factors predicting for prognosis in metastatic breast cancer. The presence of P24 predicts for response to treatment and duration of survival.
Clinicopathologic features of hepatocellular carcinoma in young patients.
Angiocentric immunoproliferative lesion/T-cell non-Hodgkin's lymphoma and the acquired immune deficiency syndrome: a case report and review of the literature.
Disseminated strongyloidiasis with central nervous system involvement diagnosed antemortem in a patient with acquired immunodeficiency syndrome and Burkitts lymphoma.
Abnormal vitamin B6 status in childhood leukemia.
Simultaneous hepatoblastoma in identical male twins.
Melanoma and soft tissue sarcoma in seven patients.
The epidemiology of cancer among Hispanic women. The experience in Florida.
Increasing incidence of cecal and sigmoid carcinoma. Data from the Connecticut Tumor Registry.
Rapid diagnosis of lung cancer from palpable metastases by needle thrust.
Elevated prostaglandin E2 levels in bronchoalveolar lavage fluid of patients with bronchogenic carcinoma.
Bronchogenic carcinoma in situ on the carina eradicated by endobronchial biopsy.
11 beta-hydroxyandrostenedione: a marker of adrenal function in hirsutism.
Neodymium: YAG laser hysteroscopy in large submucous fibroids.
Enteric neuronal autoantibodies in pseudoobstruction with small-cell lung carcinoma.
Clinical application of ras gene mutation for diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma.
Expression of class II molecules on intestinal epithelial cells in humans. Differences between normal and inflammatory bowel disease.
Screening colonoscopy in asymptomatic average-risk persons with negative fecal occult blood tests.
Modified Van Nes rotationplasty for osteosarcoma of the proximal tibia in children
Parosteal osteosarcoma. Treatment by wide resection and prosthetic replacement.
Marjolin's ulcer: a review and reevaluation of a difficult problem.
Embryologic fusion planes and the spread of cutaneous carcinoma: a review and reassessment.
Effect of the topical anesthetic EMLA on the efficacy of pulsed dye laser treatment of port-wine stains.
Use of Mohs micrographic surgery to establish quantitative proof of heightened tumor spread in basal cell carcinoma recurrent following radiotherapy.
Congenital midline nasal masses: diagnosis and management.
Complete spontaneous regression of multiple basal cell carcinomas in the basal cell nevus syndrome: the possible role of transepithelial elimination.
New primary basal cell carcinomas arising in skin flaps following Mohs micrographic surgery for primary and recurrent basal cell carcinoma.
Oral diseases in older adults [clinical conference]
The gastrin hypothesis. Implications for antisecretory drug selection.
Epitope mapping of human thyroglobulin. Heterogeneous recognition by thyroid pathologic sera.
Growth factor-dependent differentiation along the myeloid and lymphoid lineages in an immature acute T lymphocytic leukemia.
Antigen-induced cross-linking of the IgE receptor leads to an association with the detergent-insoluble membrane skeleton of rat basophilic leukemia (RBL-2H3) cells.
Mapping the site of interaction between murine IgE and its high affinity receptor with chimeric Ig.
IgE receptor-mediated phosphatidylinositol hydrolysis and exocytosis from rat basophilic leukemia cells are independent of extracellular Ca2+ in a hypotonic buffer containing a high concentration of K+.
Primary intratemporal tumours of the facial nerve: diagnosis and treatment.
Technetium-99m(v) dimercaptosuccinic acid planar scintigraphy in head and neck cancer: clinical, scintigraphic and radiological study.
Monomorphic adenomas of the major salivary glands: clinicopathological study of 44 cases.
Tumefactive fibroinflammatory lesions of the head and neck.
Osteoma of the middle ear.
Auro-nasopharyngeal polyp and cholesteatoma.
Giant enterocystoma within an infant's tongue.
Direct extension of laryngeal carcinoma to the skin of the neck.
Late development of a squamous carcinoma in a reconstructed pharynx.
Haemangiosarcoma of the maxillary antrum.
Enhanced hepatic drug clearance in patients with cystic fibrosis.
Vaginal removal of the pedunculated submucous myoma. Historical observations and development of a new procedure.
Laser therapy for vaginal intraepithelial neoplasia after hysterectomy.
The cytobrush for evaluating routine cervicovaginal-endocervical smears.
Carcinosarcoma and spindle cell carcinoma of the lung. Clinicopathologic and immunohistochemical studies.
Utility of frozen-section evaluation of lymph nodes in the staging of bronchogenic carcinoma at mediastinoscopy and thoracotomy.
Diagnostic significance of carcinoembryonic antigen in the differential diagnosis of malignant mesothelioma.
Primary osteosarcoma of the lung. Report of two cases and review of the literature.
Common nonvenereal genital lesions.
Human recombinant GM-CSF in allogeneic bone-marrow transplantation for leukaemia: double-blind, placebo-controlled trial.
Paraneoplastic pemphigus. An autoimmune mucocutaneous disease associated with neoplasia.
Synthetic analogues of fumagillin that inhibit angiogenesis and suppress tumour growth.
Hippocampal sclerosis can be reliably detected by magnetic resonance imaging.
Large cystic optic glioma.
Purification and characterization of an inhibitor (soluble tumor necrosis factor receptor) for tumor necrosis factor and lymphotoxin obtained from the serum ultrafiltrates of human cancer patients.
Epstein-Barr virus small nuclear RNAs are not expressed in permissively infected cells in AIDS-associated leukoplakia.
Overexpression of normal and mutated forms of HRAS induces orthotopic bladder invasion in a human transitional cell carcinoma.
Congenital biliary tract disease.
Cholangiocarcinoma.
Lithiumogenic disorders of the thyroid and parathyroid glands as surgical disease.
Multiple parathyroid adenomas: report of thirty-three cases.
Endosonography in the localization of parathyroid tumors: a preliminary study.
Function in athymic nude mice of parathyroid heterografts from patients with primary hyperparathyroidism and secondary hyperparathyroidism.
Effects of tamoxifen and somatostatin analogue on growth of human medullary, follicular, and papillary thyroid carcinoma cell lines: tissue culture and nude mouse xenograft studies.
Management of Cushing's syndrome secondary to adrenal adenoma during pregnancy.
The role of adrenalectomy in Cushing's syndrome.
Time to recovery of the hypothalamic-pituitary-adrenal axis after curative resection of adrenal tumors in patients with Cushing's syndrome.
Posttranslational gastrin processing depends on tumor morphology.
The utility of circulating levels of human pancreatic polypeptide as a marker for islet cell tumors.
Extraadrenal retroperitoneal paragangliomas: natural history and response to treatment.
The effect of somatostatin on 5-hydroxytryptamine release from a carcinoid tumor.
Intraatrial extension of thyroid cancer: technique and results of a radical surgical approach.
The intraoperative incidence of detectable bilateral and multicentric disease in papillary cancer of the thyroid.
Intraoperative decision making during thyroid surgery based on the results of preoperative needle biopsy and frozen section.
Prognostic significance of nondiploid DNA determined by flow cytometry in sporadic and familial medullary thyroid carcinoma.
Clinicopathologic and flow cytometric DNA study of medullary thyroid carcinoma.
Actin architecture of cultured human thyroid cancer cells: predictor of differentiation?
N-ras 61 oncogene mutations in Hurthle cell tumors.
Posterior mediastinal teratoma with abdominal extension.
Are three substages of clinical B prostate carcinoma useful in predicting disease-free survival?
Radical prostatectomy versus expectant primary treatment in stages I and II prostatic cancer. A fifteen-year follow-up.
Epididymal metastasis from prostatic adenocarcinoma mimicking adenomatoid tumor.
Femoral mononeuropathy after radical prostatectomy.
Testicular calcifications and neoplasia in patient treated for subfertility.
Papanicolaou smear cell recovery techniques used by primary care physicians.
Malignant melanoma presenting as nasal obstruction.
Parental age in sporadic hereditary retinoblastoma.
Capillary haemangioma presenting as a lung pseudocyst.
Indomethacin responsive hypercalcaemia associated with a renal sarcoma.
Surgical strategy in thyroid disease.
Carotid body tumors.
Unknown primary squamous cell carcinoma metastatic to the neck.
Oncogene amplification in squamous cell carcinoma of the head and neck.
Intraoperative radiation of canine carotid artery, internal jugular vein, and vagus nerve. Therapeutic applications in the management of advanced head and neck cancers.
Use of the levator scapulae muscle flap in head and neck reconstruction.
Parotid duct communicating with a labial pit and ectopic salivary cyst.
Intraventricular diamorphine via an Ommaya shunt for intractable cancer pain.
Radiobiological studies in the naevoid basal cell carcinoma syndrome.
The significance of Leu 8 negative T cells in lymphoid skin infiltrates: malignant transformation, selective homing or T-cell activation?
Pachyonychia congenita complicated by hidradenitis suppurativa: a family study.
Leukaemia complicating treatment for Hodgkin's disease: the experience of the British National Lymphoma Investigation.
Dilatation in the duplex kidney: 3 unusual cases.
Surgical approach to the retrocrural lymph nodes.
Nonpigmented congenital iris stromal cyst.
The Patterns of Care Outcome Study for cancer of the uterine cervix. Results of the Second National Practice Survey.
The influence of autologous lymphokine-activated killer cell infusions on the toxicity and antitumor effect of repetitive cycles of interleukin-2.
Carboplatin in childhood brain tumors. A Children's Cancer Study Group Phase II trial.
Interferon alpha-2a and 5-fluorouracil for advanced colorectal carcinoma. Assessment of activity and toxicity.
Conservative surgery and radiation therapy for soft tissue sarcoma of the wrist, hand, ankle, and foot.
Multiagent chemotherapy in relapsed acute lymphoblastic leukemia in children.
A standard dose of radiation for "microscopic disease" is not appropriate.
Primary central nervous system lymphoma in a pediatric patient with acquired immune deficiency syndrome. Treatment with radiation therapy.
131I treatment of thyroid papillary carcinoma in a patient with renal failure.
The interplay of local and distant control in the cure of cervical cancer.
The role of elective lymph node dissection in the management of patients with thick cutaneous melanoma.
Endoscopic and radiographic evaluation of the murine colon.
Immunohistochemical differentiation of basal cell epithelioma from cutaneous appendages using monoclonal anti-glycoprotein antibody TNKH1. Its application in Mohs' micrographic surgery.
Immunohistochemical demonstration of the placental form of glutathione S-transferase, a detoxifying enzyme in human gliomas.
Helicobacter pylori and gastric carcinoma. Serum antibody prevalence in populations with contrasting cancer risks.
Expression of placental alkaline phosphatase in gastric and colorectal cancers. An immunohistochemical study using the prepared monoclonal antibody.
Prognostic significance of type IV collagen and laminin immunoreactivity in urothelial carcinomas of the bladder.
Primary breast lymphoma. An immunohistologic study of 20 new cases.
Estrogen receptor localization in normal and neoplastic epithelium of the uterine cervix.
Cancer antigen 125, carcinoembryonic antigen, and carbohydrate determinant 19-9 in ovarian tumors.
Chondrolipoangioma. A cartilage-containing benign mesenchymoma of soft tissue.
Dentofacial development in long-term survivors of acute lymphoblastic leukemia. A comparison of three treatment modalities.
Clinical and prognostic assessment of patients with resected small peripheral lung cancer lesions.
Choroid plexus tumors in the breast cancer-sarcoma syndrome.
Fallopian tube cancer. The Roswell Park experience.
True hermaphrodite with bilateral ovotestes, bilateral gonadoblastomas and dysgerminomas, 46,XX/46,XY karyotype, and a successful pregnancy.
Extrahepatic metabolism of morphine occurs in humans.
Insulin-like growth factor binding protein secretion by breast carcinoma cell lines: correlation with estrogen receptor status.
A simple and sensitive microtiter plate estrogen bioassay based on stimulation of alkaline phosphatase in Ishikawa cells: estrogenic action of delta 5 adrenal steroids.
Alterations in opioid parameters in the hypothalamus of rats with estradiol-induced polycystic ovarian disease.
Rapid inactivation and phosphorylation of pyroglutamyl peptidase II in Y-79 human retinoblastoma cells after exposure to phorbol ester.
Squamous cell carcinomas often produce more than a single bone resorption-stimulating factor: role of interleukin-1 alpha*.
Autoradiographic evaluation of monoclonal antibodies' access to melanoma-associated antigens in melanoma xenografts.
Ability of circular extrachromosomal DNA molecules to carry amplified MYCN proto-oncogenes in human neuroblastomas in vivo.
History of cigarette smoking and risk of leukemia and myeloma: results from the Adventist health study.
Glycolysis as primary energy source in tumor cell chemotaxis.
Influence of organ environment on extracellular matrix degradative activity and metastasis of human colon carcinoma cells
Bolus versus infusion regimens of etoposide and cisplatin in treatment of non-small cell lung cancer: a study of the North Central Cancer Treatment group
Mechanism of antitumor activity of tumor necrosis factor alpha with hyperthermia in a tumor necrosis factor alpha-resistant tumor.
Segregation analysis of breast cancer from the cancer and steroid hormone study: histologic subtypes
Results of stereotactic brachytherapy used in the initial management of patients with glioblastoma.
Lipolytic factors associated with murine and human cancer cachexia.
Effects of FUdR on primary-cultured colon carcinomas metastatic to the liver.
Recurrence of resected esophagogastric adenocarcinoma: results of re-resection.
Cryoprobe as a "handle" for resection of metastatic liver tumors.
Extended neck dissection.
Immune-competent cells of regional lymph nodes in colorectal cancer patients: II. Immunohistochemical analysis of Leu-7+ cells.
Gamma-detecting probe and autoradiographic studies of radiolabeled antibody B72.3 in CX-1 colon xenografts.
Surgical wound infection and cancer among the elderly: a case control study.
Long survival and prognostic factors in hepatocellular carcinoma.
Carcinoid tumors.
Symptomatic pericardial effusion in breast cancer patients: the role of fluid cytology.
Hemicorporectomy: a collective review.
The use of interferon alpha-C in patients with metastatic renal cell carcinoma arising in a congenital solitary kidney.
Community lifestyle characteristics and risk of acute lymphoblastic leukaemia in children.
Matched group study of surgical resection versus cobalt-60 plaque radiotherapy for primary choroidal or ciliary body melanoma.
Interleukin-2 immunotherapy in children.
Congenital abnormalities of the lymphatic system: a new clinical classification.
Tissue-specific transformation by epidermal growth factor receptor: a single point mutation within the ATP-binding pocket of the erbB product increases its intrinsic kinase activity and activates its sarcomagenic potential.
v-Ha-ras transgene abrogates the initiation step in mouse skin tumorigenesis: effects of phorbol esters and retinoic acid.
Multisurface method of pattern separation for medical diagnosis applied to breast cytology.
Embryonic stem cell virus, a recombinant murine retrovirus with expression in embryonic stem cells.
Glucocorticoids locally disrupt an array of positioned nucleosomes on the rat tyrosine aminotransferase promoter in hepatoma cells.
Mapping chromosome band 11q23 in human acute leukemia with biotinylated probes: identification of 11q23 translocation breakpoints with a yeast artificial chromosome.
Vaccination against tumor cells expressing breast cancer epithelial tumor antigen.
Recognition by ELAM-1 of the sialyl-Lex determinant on myeloid and tumor cells.
Head and neck paragangliomas: a clinicopathologic study with DNA flow cytometric analysis.
Breast cancer: the military's experience at Wilford Hall USAF Medical Center.
Pheochromocytoma and acute myocardial infarction.
Endometriosis of the abdominal wall.
Unilateral hydrocephalus in adults.
Pedunculated giant lipoma of the esophagus.
Peritoneal mesothelioma: an unusual cause of esophageal achalasia.
Multifocal gastric carcinoma arising from hyperplastic and adenomatous polyps.
Synchronous diffuse well-differentiated lymphocytic lymphoma and gastric adenocarcinoma presenting as splenomegaly and iron deficiency anemia.
Primary leiomyoma of the liver.
Liver abscess complicating intratumoral ethanol injection therapy for HCC.
Failure to limit quantities of benzodiazepine hypnotic drugs for outpatients: placing the elderly at risk.
Lack of correlation of clinical breast examination with high-risk histopathology.
Role of systemic therapy in advanced non-small-cell lung cancer.
The role of attitudes, beliefs, and personal characteristics of Italian physicians in the surgical treatment of early breast cancer.
Characteristics of duodenal wall gastrinomas.
Glucagonoma syndrome is an underdiagnosed clinical entity.
Perioperative blood transfusion adversely affects prognosis of patients with stage I non-small-cell lung cancer.
Continent ileocolonic urinary reservoirs for filling and lining the post-exenteration pelvis.
Selective nonoperative management of patients referred with abnormal mammograms.
When is polypectomy sufficient treatment for colorectal cancer in a polyp?
Multimodal therapy in locally advanced breast carcinoma.
Outpatient percutaneous central venous access in cancer patients.
Kaposi's sarcoma of the rectum in patients with the acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Caesarean section in a patient with haemoglobin SC disease and a phaeochromocytoma.
Tyrosine kinase and control of cell proliferation.
Gene amplification in human lung cancer. The myc family genes and other proto-oncogenes and growth factor genes.
The ras oncogenes in human lung cancer.
Progression through the cell cycle: an overview.
The beta-type transforming growth factor. Mediators of cell regulation in the lung.
Genetic strategies of tumor suppression.
Cell-to-cell communication and the control of growth.
src expression in small-cell lung carcinoma and other neuroendocrine malignancies.
Internists' practices in health promotion and disease prevention. A survey.
Cerebrospinal fluid neopterin in human immunodeficiency virus type 1 infection.
Lymphoproliferative disorders associated with carbamazepine.
Image cytophotometric DNA analysis of atypical hyperplasias and intraductal carcinomas of the breast.
Enhanced expression of c-myc and H-ras oncogenes in Letterer-Siwe disease. A sequential study using colorimetric in situ hybridization.
Lack of prognostic value of nucleolar organizer region enumeration in transitional cell carcinoma of the bladder.
Bilateral familial carotid body paragangliomas. Report of a case with DNA flow cytometric and cytogenetic analyses.
Hepatic cyst associated with Peutz-Jeghers syndrome.
Soft-tissue tumor with abnormal amianthoid collagen fibers.
Extramedullary hematopoiesis in a bronchial carcinoid tumor. An unusual complication of agnogenic myeloid metaplasia.
Cholangiocarcinoma in association with multiple biliary microhamartomas.
Acquired childhood aphasia. Outcome 1 year after onset.
Morphine-induced transactivation of HIV-1 LTR in human neuroblastoma cells.
Shear stress induces not only platelet aggregation but also platelet-tumor cell interaction.
Palliative treatment of bile duct tumoral compression by an endoprosthesis: clinical results.
Basic studies on a new material for inducing antitumor immune cells.
Protection of the small intestine against irradiation by means of a removable prosthesis.
Large loop excision of the transformation zone (LLETZ) compared to carbon dioxide laser in the treatment of CIN: a superior mode of treatment.
The relationship of "high risk" mammographic patterns to histological risk factors for development of cancer in the human breast.
Lack of late skin necrosis in man after high-dose irradiation using small field sizes: experiences of grid therapy.
Preoperative cytology and mammography in patients with single-duct nipple discharge treated by surgery.
Microdochectomy for discharge from a single lactiferous duct.
Fine needle aspiration biopsy in the diagnosis and management of fibroadenoma of the breast.
Reduced psychological morbidity after breast conservation.
Impaired polymorphonuclear leucocyte function in patients undergoing hepatectomy: adenylate energy charge and superoxide anion production in relation to hepatic mitochondrial redox state.
Regional chemotherapy for colorectal liver metastases: a phase II evaluation of targeted hepatic arterial 5-fluorouracil for colorectal liver metastases.
Hepatic metastases from colorectal carcinoma: impact of surgical resection on the natural history.
Extended hepatectomy for hepatocellular carcinoma.
Vastus lateralis myocutaneous flap for reconstruction of defects around the groin and pelvis.
Association between extent of colonic mucosal sialomucin change and subsequent local recurrence after curative excision of primary colorectal cancer.
Intraluminal pressure adjacent to left colonic anastomoses.
Thallous chloride uptake and DNA profile in parathyroid adenomas.
The importance of calcium regulation in toxic cell injury. Studies utilizing the technology of digital imaging fluorescence microscopy.
Esophageal adenocarcinoma in a patient with surgically treated achalasia.
Cathepsins D and E in normal, metaplastic, dysplastic, and carcinomatous gastric tissue: an immunohistochemical study.
Microspectrophotometric DNA analysis in ulcerative colitis with special reference to its application in diagnosis of carcinoma and dysplasia.
Role of upper gastrointestinal investigations in a screening study for colorectal neoplasia.
Role of ultrasound guided fine needle aspiration biopsy in the diagnosis of hepatocellular carcinoma.
Stomal adenocarcinoma in Crohn's disease.
Squamous carcinoma in the liver.
Function after amputation, arthrodesis, or arthroplasty for tumors about the knee.
The Van Nes tibial rotationplasty. A functionally viable reconstructive procedure in children who have a tumor of the distal end of the femur.
Insulin-like growth factor I expression by tumors of neuroectodermal origin with the t(11;22) chromosomal translocation. A potential autocrine growth factor.
Metabolic effects of cachectin/tumor necrosis factor are modified by site of production. Cachectin/tumor necrosis factor-secreting tumor in skeletal muscle induces chronic cachexia, while implantation in brain induces predominantly acute anorexia.
Active specific immunotherapy in patients with melanoma. A clinical trial with mouse antiidiotypic monoclonal antibodies elicited with syngeneic anti-high-molecular-weight-melanoma-associated antigen monoclonal antibodies [published erratum appears in J Clin Invest 1991 Feb;87(2):757]
Occurrence of human papillomavirus type 16 DNA in cutaneous squamous and basal cell neoplasms.
Spitz nevi in black children.
Ocular melanoma in families with dysplastic nevus syndrome.
Polypoid melanoma: a virulent variant of nodular melanoma. Report of three cases and literature review.
Photopheresis for the treatment of cutaneous T cell lymphoma.
Causes of death in the elderly and their changing pattern in Hisayama, a Japanese community. Results from a long-term and autopsy-based study.
Leukocyte larceny: spurious hypoxemia confirmed with pulse oximetry
Blepharospasm-oromandibular dystonia associated with a left cerebellopontine angle meningioma.
A randomized trial of the effect of three non-steroid anti-inflammatory agents in ameliorating cancer-induced fever.
Castanospermine vs. its 6-O-butanoyl analog: a comparison of toxicity and antiviral activity in vitro and in vivo.
Incidence of polymyositis-dermatomyositis: a 20-year study of hospital diagnosed cases in Allegheny County, PA 1963-1982.
Bladder outlet obstruction due to pelvic lipoma: computerized tomography, magnetic resonance imaging and radiographic evaluation.
Adenocarcinoma of the urachus associated with elevated levels of CA 125.
Unresectable calcified bladder tumor: hemiacidrin irrigation as an adjunct to resection.
Rectourethral fistula caused by Kaposi's sarcoma.
Adenocarcinoma of the prostate in a 41-year-old man with XXY karyotype and chronic lymphocytic leukemia: report of a case.
Exaggerated venous mural hypertrophy in association with metastatic adenocarcinoma of the prostate.
End stage renal disease serum contains a specific renal cell growth factor.
Cytotoxic effects of high energy shock waves in different in vitro models: influence of the experimental set-up.
Surgical management and prognosis of renal cell carcinoma invading the vena cava.
Progression of stage T1 bladder tumors after intravesical bacillus Calmette-Guerin [published erratum appears in J Urol 1991 Apr;145(4):840]
Results of contemporary radical cystectomy for invasive bladder cancer: a clinicopathological study with an emphasis on the inadequacy of the tumor, nodes and metastases classification.
Total bladder replacement using detubularized sigmoid colon: technique and results.
Prevalence of carcinoma in situ and other histopathological abnormalities in testes from 399 men who died suddenly and unexpectedly.
Application of the monoclonal antibody Ki-67 on prostate biopsies to assess the fraction of human prostatic carcinoma.
Diagnostic accuracy and appropriateness of care for seborrheic keratoses. A pilot study of an approach to quality assurance for cutaneous surgery
Gynecologic cancer in patients with subacute cerebellar degeneration predicted by anti-Purkinje cell antibodies and limited in metastatic volume.
Endorectal ultrasonographic staging of rectal carcinoma.
Tumor angiogenesis and metastasis--correlation in invasive breast carcinoma.
An epidemiologic study of abuse of analgesic drugs. Effects of phenacetin and salicylate on mortality and cardiovascular morbidity (1968 to 1987)
Human T-cell leukemia virus type I infection as an oncogenic and prognostic risk factor in cervical and vaginal carcinoma.
Flow cytometric analysis of DNA content in partial hydatidiform moles with persistent gestational trophoblastic tumor.
Appendectomy in primary and secondary staging operations for ovarian malignancy.
Rhabdomyosarcoma of the ciliary body.
Cystic adenoma of the pigmented ciliary epithelium. Clinical, pathologic, and immunohistopathologic findings.
Evaluation of argon laser surgery in children under 13 years of age.
Hepatocellular carcinoma within siderotic regenerative nodules: appearance as a nodule within a nodule on MR images.
Invasive lobular carcinoma: mammographic findings in a 10-year experience
Mammographic follow-up of low-suspicion lesions: compliance rate and diagnostic yield.
Immediate postoperative mammogram for failed surgical excision of breast lesions
Data compression: effect on diagnostic accuracy in digital chest radiography.
Biologic aggressiveness of palpable and nonpalpable prostate cancer: assessment with endosonography.
Congenital cystic disease of the seminal vesicle.
Insulinomas: localization with selective intraarterial injection of calcium.
Complications of percutaneous abdominal fine-needle biopsy. Review.
Selective catheterization of the inferior petrosal sinuses: new catheter design.
Petrosal sinus sampling: technique and rationale.
Liver and pancreas: improved spin-echo T1 contrast by shorter echo time and fat suppression at 1.5 T.
MR imaging of blood-borne liver metastases in mice: contrast enhancement with Fe-EHPG.
Pancreatic cancer versus chronic pancreatitis: diagnosis with CA 19-9 assessment, US, CT, and CT-guided fine-needle biopsy.
Primary bone tumours of the thoracic skeleton: an audit of the Leeds regional bone tumour registry.
Adult respiratory distress syndrome after limited resection of adenocarcinoma of the lung.
Specific binding sites for insulin-like growth factor I in the ovarian stroma of women with polycystic ovarian disease and stromal hyperthecosis.
Evidence of heterogeneous mechanisms in lipoprotein lipid alterations in hyperandrogenic women.
Which clinical variables predict an abnormal double-contrast barium enema result?
Spindle and epithelioid cell nevus (Spitz nevus). Natural history following biopsy.
Vestibular papillae of the vulva. Lack of evidence for human papillomavirus etiology.
'Cystic papilloma' in humans? Demonstration of human papillomavirus in plantar epidermoid cysts.
Regressing atypical histiocytosis. Aberrant prothymocyte differentiation, T-cell receptor gene rearrangements, and nodal involvement.
Unusual skin tumors in Langerhans' cell histiocytosis.
Occupational sunlight exposure and melanoma in the U.S. Navy.
The risk of large bowel cancer after partial gastrectomy for benign ulcer disease.
Removal of radiation-induced cataracts in patients treated for retinoblastoma.
Respiratory epithelium in a cystic choristoma of the limbus.
Control of interleukin-1 beta expression by protein kinase C and cyclic adenosine monophosphate in myeloid leukemia cells.
Potentiation of the erythropoietin response by dimethyl sulfoxide priming of erythroleukemia cells: evidence for interaction of two signaling pathways.
Different effect of benzylacyclouridine on the toxic and therapeutic effects of azidothymidine in mice.
Long-term (5 to 20 years) Evolution of nongrafted aplastic anemias. The Cooperative Group for the Study of Aplastic and Refractory Anemias.
Transformation-associated alterations in interactions between pre-B cells and fibronectin.
In vitro drug sensitivity of cells from children with leukemia using the MTT assay with improved culture conditions.
Analysis of interferon-inducible genes in cells of chronic myeloid leukemia patients responsive or resistant to an interferon-alpha treatment.
Down's syndrome and acute leukemia in children: an analysis of phenotype by use of monoclonal antibodies and electron microscopic platelet peroxidase reaction
Serum erythropoietin levels in patients receiving intensive chemotherapy and radiotherapy.
CD11c (LEU-M5) expression characterizes a B-cell chronic lymphoproliferative disorder with features of both chronic lymphocytic leukemia and hairy cell leukemia.
Detection of breakpoint cluster region- negative and nonclonal hematopoiesis in vitro and in vivo after transplantation of cells selected in cultures of chronic myeloid leukemia marrow.
Chemoprotective effects of recombinant human IL-1 alpha in cyclophosphamide-treated normal and tumor-bearing mice. Protection from acute toxicity, hematologic effects, development of late mortality, and enhanced therapeutic efficacy.
Role of histamine in natural killer cell-mediated resistance against tumor cells.
Efficacy of interferons on bowenoid papulosis and other precancerous lesions.
Non-AIDS-associated Kaposi's sarcoma (classical and endemic African types): treatment with low doses of recombinant interferon-alpha.
Clinical evaluation of interferons in malignant melanoma.
Long-term adjuvant therapy of high-risk malignant melanoma with interferon alpha 2b.
Photochemotherapy alone or combined with interferon alpha-2a in the treatment of cutaneous T-cell lymphoma.
Interferon alpha and etretinate combination treatment of cutaneous T-cell lymphoma.
Recombinant IFN-alpha in lymphomas.
Cytostatic and cytotoxic effects of recombinant tumor necrosis factor-alpha on sensitive human melanoma cells in vitro may result in selection of cells with enhanced markers of malignancy.
High incidence of antibodies to HTLV-I tax in blood relatives of adult T cell leukemia patients.
Tumor-associated neurological dysfunction prevented by lazaroids in rats.
Epidermoid cysts of the brain stem. Report of three cases.
Pseudopsammomatous meningioma with elevated serum carcinoembryonic antigen: a true secretory meningioma. Case report.
The fastigial pressor response. Case report.
Correlates of survival and the Daumas-Duport grading system for astrocytomas.
Idiopathic and glucocorticoid-induced spinal epidural lipomatosis.
Intratumoral oxygen pressure in malignant brain tumor.
Pediatric spinal epidural metastases.
Photodynamic therapy of spontaneous cancers in felines, canines, and snakes with chloro-aluminum sulfonated phthalocyanine.
Increased expression of the laminin receptor in human colon cancer.
Effect of prior cancer chemotherapy on human tumor-specific cytotoxicity in vitro in response to immunopotentiating biologic response modifiers.
Elevated expression of the c-fes proto-oncogene in adult human myeloid leukemia cells in the absence of gene amplification.
Comparisons of diet and biochemical characteristics of stool and urine between Chinese populations with low and high colorectal cancer rates.
Phase I trial of piritrexim capsules using prolonged, low-dose oral administration for the treatment of advanced malignancies.
Magnetic resonance imaging of facial nerve neuromas.
Hematoporphyrin photodynamic therapy: is there truly a future in head and neck oncology? Reflections on a 5-year experience.
Rapid sequence treatment of advanced squamous cell carcinoma of the upper aerodigestive tract: a pilot study.
Extended retrolabyrinthine transtentorial approach to petroclival lesions.
Molecular pathologic study of human papillomavirus infection in inverted papilloma and squamous cell carcinoma of the nasal cavities and paranasal sinuses.
A novel metalloproteinase gene specifically expressed in stromal cells of breast carcinomas.
Germ-line transmission of a mutated p53 gene in a cancer-prone family with Li-Fraumeni syndrome
Hemorrhagic pituitary adenomas: clinicopathological features and surgical treatment.
The association of hydrocephalus with intramedullary spinal cord tumors: a series of 25 patients.
Preoperative superselective arteriolar embolization: a new approach to enhance resectability of spinal tumors.
Meningiomas involving the clivus: a six-year experience with 41 patients.
Surgical resection of intrinsic brain stem lesions: an overview.
Spinal hemangioblastoma, syrinx, and hydrocephalus in a two-year-old child.
Esthesioneuroblastoma with intracranial extension.
Cryptic osteoid osteoma of the cranium: case report.
Intracerebral solitary plasmacytoma.
Mohs micrographic surgery.
Hyperandrogenism in peripubertal girls.
Transhepatic portal vein catheterization for localization of insulinomas: a ten-year experience.
Adenomyomatosis of the gallbladder. A premalignant lesion?
Greenfield filter as primary therapy for deep venous thrombosis and/or pulmonary embolism in patients with cancer.
Leucine kinetics in patients with benign disease, non-weight-losing cancer, and cancer cachexia: studies at the whole-body and tissue level and the response to nutritional support.
Gastric duplication cyst communicating with the pancreatic duct: a rare cause of recurrent abdominal pain.
Myogenic regulatory protein (MyoD1) expression in childhood solid tumors: diagnostic utility in rhabdomyosarcoma.
Vimentin expression appears to be associated with poor prognosis in node-negative ductal NOS breast carcinomas.
Study of neu-protein expression in mammary Paget's disease with and without underlying breast carcinoma and in extramammary Paget's disease.
Detection of HTLV-I proviral sequences in CD30-positive large cell cutaneous T-cell lymphomas.
Immunodetection of the metastasis-associated laminin receptor in human breast cancer cells obtained by fine-needle aspiration biopsy.
Proliferation markers Ki-67 and p105 in soft-tissue lesions. Correlation with DNA flow cytometric characteristics.
Alternative splicing of endothelial cell fibronectin mRNA in the IIICS region. Functional significance.
A three-dimensional system for long-term culture of human colorectal adenomas.
Isolation of a complementary DNA clone encoding an autoantigen recognized by an anti-neuronal cell antibody from a patient with paraneoplastic cerebellar degeneration.
Cutaneous vasculitis associated with pheochromocytoma.
Chromatin structural analysis of the 5' end and contiguous flanking region of the myeloperoxidase gene.
Allogeneic marrow transplantation in patients positive for hepatitis B surface antigen.
Use of leukocyte-depleted platelet concentrates for the prevention of refractoriness and primary HLA alloimmunization: a prospective, randomized trial.
Six years' audit of laboratory workload and rates of referral for colposcopy in a cervical screening programme in three districts
How district health authorities organise cervical screening [published erratum appears in BMJ 1990 Nov 24;301(6762):1209]
Diagnosis of abdominal masses with percutaneous biopsy guided by ultrasound
Etoposide. Current and future status.
New chemotherapies for ovarian cancer. Systemic and intraperitoneal podophyllotoxins.
Etoposide in the management of non-small cell lung cancer.
Recent advances in etoposide therapy for non-small cell lung cancer.
Current strategies in the management of locoregional and metastatic gastric carcinoma.
Etoposide in the management of metastatic breast cancer.
Etoposide in acute leukemia. Past experience and future perspectives.
Etoposide in leukemia.
High-dose etoposide and marrow transplantation.
The pharmacology of intravenous and oral etoposide.
Chronic oral etoposide.
The role of etoposide in the treatment of poorly differentiated carcinoma of unknown primary site.
Future directions for etoposide therapy.
The clinical pharmacology of etoposide.
Diagnosis of noninfective cardiac mass lesions by two-dimensional echocardiography. Comparison of the transthoracic and transesophageal approaches.
Effects of radiation therapy on skeletal growth in childhood.
Limb-salvage surgery in the treatment of osteosarcoma in skeletally immature individuals.
The cellular biology of bone tumors.
Osteoid osteoma of the scapula. A case report and review of the literature.
Autograft versus allograft for benign lesions in children.
Cryosurgery and acrylic cementation as surgical adjuncts in the treatment of aggressive (benign) bone tumors. Analysis of 25 patients below the age of 21.
Chemotherapy for children with aggressive fibromatosis and Langerhans' cell histiocytosis.
Limb reconstruction with vascularized fibular grafts after bone tumor resection.
Modified Van Nes rotationplasty in the treatment of malignant neoplasms in the lower extremities of children.
Ewing's sarcoma. Prognostic factors, disease control, and the reemerging role of surgical treatment.
Pulmonary metastases and bone sarcomas. Surgical removal of lesions appearing after adjuvant chemotherapy.
The effect of chemotherapy on growth in the skeletally immature individual.
Cardiac rhabdomyoma. Rare cause of fetal death.
99mTc-anti-CEA radioimmunoscintigraphy of lung adenocarcinoma.
Pulmonary complications of combination therapy with cyclophosphamide and prednisone.
Minute squamous cell carcinoma arising in the wall of a congenital lung cyst.
Complications of general anesthesia for Nd:YAG laser resection of endobronchial tumors.
Zollinger-Ellison syndrome. Relation to Helicobacter pylori-associated chronic gastritis and gastric acid secretion.
Helicobacter pylori and Zollinger-Ellison syndrome.
Peptic ulcer perforation as the presentation of Zollinger-Ellison syndrome.
Partial gastric corpectomy results in hypergastrinemia and development of gastric enterochromaffinlike-cell carcinoids in the rat.
Patterns of growth and metastases of induced pancreatic cancer in relation to the prognosis and its clinical implications.
Granulocytic sarcoma of the colon.
Hyperplastic polyps seen at sigmoidoscopy are markers for additional adenomas seen at colonoscopy.
Carotid artery resection and replacement in patients with head and neck malignant tumors.
Thrombin stimulates tumor-platelet adhesion in vitro and metastasis in vivo.
The growth inhibition of human breast cancer cells by a novel synthetic progestin involves the induction of transforming growth factor beta.
Coexpression of two fibronectin receptors, VLA-4 and VLA-5, by immature human erythroblastic precursor cells.
Use of cytoplasmic 5'nucleotidase for differentiating malignant from benign monoclonal gammopathies.
Immunohistochemical demonstration of pancreatic secretory trypsin inhibitor in normal and neoplastic colonic mucosa.
Human papillomavirus in oesophageal squamous cell carcinoma.
Detection and typing of human papillomavirus using the Vira Type "in situ" kit: comparison with a conventional dot blot technique.
Detection of human papillomavirus type 16 DNA in carcinomas of the palatine tonsil.
Measurement techniques for melanoma: a statistical comparison
Bone marrow stromal cell changes in haematological malignancies.
Cartilage removal prior to skin grafting in the triangular fossa, antihelix, and concha of the ear.
Mohs micrographic surgery fixed-tissue technique for melanoma of the nose.
Razor-blade surgery.
Fine-needle aspiration for diagnosis of intranodal squamous-cell carcinoma metastatic from the skin.
Basal cell carcinoma arising in pemphigus vulgaris of the lower eyelid.
Elevated serum concentrations of IgE antibodies to environmental antigens in HIV-seropositive male homosexuals.
Continuous infusion carboplatin on a 21-day schedule: a phase I and pharmacokinetic study.
Cardiopulmonary resuscitation and the patient with cancer.
High survival rate in advanced-stage B-cell lymphomas and leukemias without CNS involvement with a short intensive polychemotherapy: results from the French Pediatric Oncology Society of a randomized trial of 216 children.
HiC-COM: a 2-month intensive chemotherapy regimen for children with stage III and IV Burkitt's lymphoma and B-cell acute lymphoblastic leukemia.
A phase II study of combined methotrexate and teniposide infusions prior to reinduction therapy in relapsed childhood acute lymphoblastic leukemia: a Pediatric Oncology Group study.
Comparison of neuropsychologic functioning and clinical indicators of neurotoxicity in long-term survivors of childhood leukemia given cranial radiation or parenteral methotrexate: a prospective study.
High-dose chemoradiotherapy supported by marrow infusions for advanced neuroblastoma: a Pediatric Oncology Group study [published erratum appears in J Clin Oncol 1991 Jun;9(6):1094]
Relationship of tumor-cell ploidy to histologic subtype and treatment outcome in children and adolescents with unresectable rhabdomyosarcoma [published erratum appears in J Clin Oncol 1991 May;9(5):893]
Fludarabine phosphate: a synthetic purine antimetabolite with significant activity against lymphoid malignancies.
A phase II clinical trial of carboplatin infusion in high-risk acute nonlymphoblastic leukemia.
Fludarabine: a new agent with marked cytoreductive activity in untreated chronic lymphocytic leukemia.
Cytotoxic chemotherapy induces cell differentiation in small-cell lung carcinoma.
Effectiveness of carboplatin, etoposide, and bleomycin combination chemotherapy in good-prognosis metastatic testicular nonseminomatous germ cell tumors.
How American oncologists treat breast cancer: an assessment of the influence of clinical trials.
4-Hydroperoxycyclophosphamide purging of breast cancer from the mononuclear cell fraction of bone marrow in patients receiving high-dose chemotherapy and autologous marrow support: a phase I trial.
Phase I clinical trial with floxuridine and high-dose continuous infusion of leucovorin calcium.
Effect of dietary alpha-linolenic acid on growth, metastasis, fatty acid profile and prostaglandin production of two murine mammary adenocarcinomas.
Extraoral application of osseointegrated implants.
Central odontogenic fibroma: clinicopathologic features of 19 cases and review of the literature.
Antisecretory and antilesional effect of a new histamine H2-receptor antagonist, IT-066, in rats.
Potent selective inhibition of 7-O-methyl UCN-01 against protein kinase C.
Stimulatory effects of maitotoxin on insulin release in insulinoma HIT cells: role of calcium uptake and phosphoinositide breakdown.
Improved outcome in childhood acute lymphoblastic leukaemia with reinforced early treatment and rotational combination chemotherapy.
Nd:YAG-laser in the microsurgery of frontobasal meningiomas.
Molecular surgery of the basement membrane by the argon laser.
Cancer mortality in workers exposed to 2,3,7,8-tetrachlorodibenzo-p-dioxin
Prognostic value of immunocytologic detection of bone marrow metastases in neuroblastoma.
Neonatal subependymal giant cell astrocytoma associated with tuberous sclerosis: MRI, CT, and ultrasound correlation.
Absence of acetylcholine-induced current in epithelial cells from thymus glands and thymomas of myasthenia gravis patients.
Brain and spinal cord hemorrhage in long-term survivors of malignant pediatric brain tumors: a possible late effect of therapy.
Comparison of myelography with CT follow-up versus gadolinium MRI for subarachnoid metastatic disease in children.
Dysgeusia, gustatory sweating, and crocodile tears syndrome induced by a cerebellopontine angle meningioma.
Salivary flow rates in patients with head and neck cancer 0.5 to 25 years after radiotherapy.
Intramuscular hemangioma in the oral region: report of three cases.
Human papillomaviruses: pediatric perspectives on a family of multifaceted tumorigenic pathogens
The butterfly rash and the malar flush. What diseases do these signs reflect?
Analysis of interleukin 2 and various effector cell populations in adoptive immunotherapy of 9L rat gliosarcoma: allogeneic cytotoxic T lymphocytes prevent tumor take.
Activation of early events of the mitogenic response by a P2Y purinoceptor with covalently bound 3'-O-(4-benzoyl)-benzoyladenosine 5'-triphosphate.
Human tumor necrosis factor alpha gene regulation by virus and lipopolysaccharide.
Boron neutron capture therapy of intracerebral rat gliosarcomas.
Identification of transforming growth factor beta family members present in bone-inductive protein purified from bovine bone.
Adenovirus 12S E1A gene represses differentiation of F9 teratocarcinoma cells.
Frequent mutation of the p53 gene in human esophageal cancer.
Activation of erythropoietin receptors by Friend viral gp55 and by erythropoietin and down-modulation by the murine Fv-2r resistance gene.
Skeletal manifestations of ectopic or inappropriate endocrine and metabolic syndromes.
Adenocarcinoma of the colon and rectum in patients less than 40 years of age.
The oncologic risks of skin preservation at mastectomy when combined with immediate reconstruction of the breast.
Prognostic significance of serosal invasion in carcinoma of the stomach.
Gastric lymphoma.
Effect of closing dead space on incidence of seroma after mastectomy.
Efficacy of doxazosin in specific hypertensive patient groups.
Nutritional approach to cancer prevention with emphasis on vitamins, antioxidants, and carotenoids.
Effects of carotenoids in cellular and animal systems.
Vegetables, fruits, and carotenoids and the risk of cancer.
Prediagnostic serum levels of carotenoids and vitamin E as related to subsequent cancer in Washington County, Maryland.
Beta-carotene and cancer prevention: the Basel Study.
Vitamin C and cancer prevention: the epidemiologic evidence.
Vitamin E and cancer prevention.
Gastric juice ascorbic acid: effects of disease and implications for gastric carcinogenesis.
Potential role of beta-carotene in prevention of oral cancer.
Remission of precancerous lesions in the oral cavity of tobacco chewers and maintenance of the protective effect of beta-carotene or vitamin A.
Studies evaluating antioxidants and beta-carotene as chemopreventives.
Premalignant lesions: role of antioxidant vitamins and beta-carotene in risk reduction and prevention of malignant transformation.
Nevus flammeus. Discordance in monozygotic twins.
Interaction of chloramphenicol and metabolites with colony stimulating factors: possible role in chloramphenicol-induced bone marrow injury.
Kaposi's sarcoma involvement of the bone marrow.
Ethanol causes accelerated G1 arrest in differentiating HL-60 cells.
Herpes zoster ophthalmicus and iris cysts.
Childhood blindness in Peru.
Magnetic resonance imaging and computed tomography in pediatric head and neck masses.
Vertical partial laryngectomy: a critical analysis of local recurrence.
Hemangioma of the temporalis muscle.
Undifferentiated carcinomas of salivary glands.
Cholangiocarcinoma complicating primary sclerosing cholangitis.
A clinical pilot study combining surgery with intraoperative pelvic hyperthermochemotherapy to prevent the local recurrence of rectal cancer.
Locally recurrent parathyroid neoplasms as a cause for recurrent and persistent primary hyperparathyroidism.
Synthesis of type I collagen in healing wounds in humans.
Rupture of a benign mediastinal teratoma into the right pleural cavity.
Tricuspid valve papillary fibroelastoma: echocardiographic characterization.
Rectus abdominis muscle flap with microvascular anastomoses for repair of recurrent sarcoma.
Thymoma: results of 241 operated cases
Multiple primary bronchogenic carcinomas: treatment and follow-up.
The impact of physician compliance on screening mammography for older women.
The relationship of Papanicolaou testing and contacts with the medical care system to stage at diagnosis of cervical cancer.
Menopausal estrogen replacement therapy and breast cancer
Decreased mortality in users of estrogen replacement therapy
Combined hepatic and vena caval resection with autogenous caval graft replacement.
Photodynamic therapy to treat tumors of the extrahepatic biliary ducts. A case report.
The changing face of dermatology out-patient referrals in the south-east of Scotland.
Pigmented spindle cell naevus.
Factor XIIIa in nodular malignant melanoma and Spitz naevi.
Necrolytic migratory erythema: association with neuroendocrine tumour with predominant insulin secretion.
Angiotropic B-cell lymphoma (malignant angioendotheliomatosis): failure of systemic chemotherapy.
Donor leukocyte transfusions for treatment of recurrent chronic myelogenous leukemia in marrow transplant patients.
Expression of leukocyte alkaline phosphatase gene in normal and leukemic cells: regulation of the transcript by granulocyte colony-stimulating factor.
Monoclonal antibody to the interferon-inducible protein Leu-13 triggers aggregation and inhibits proliferation of leukemic B cells.
Granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor synergizes with interleukin-6 in supporting the proliferation of human myeloma cells.
Hybridization protection assay: a rapid, sensitive, and specific method for detection of Philadelphia chromosome-positive leukemias.
Retroviral transformation of cerebral microvascular endothelial cells: macrophage-like and microvascular endothelial cell properties.
Consistent involvement of the bcr gene by 9;22 breakpoints in pediatric acute leukemias.
Synergistic inhibition by verapamil and quinine of P-glycoprotein-mediated multidrug resistance in a human myeloma cell line model.
Anti-CD33 monoclonal antibody and etoposide/cytosine arabinoside combinations for the ex vivo purification of bone marrow in acute nonlymphocytic leukemia.
Neutrophil function and pyogenic infections in bone marrow transplant recipients.
Flow cytometry for clinical estimation of circulating hematopoietic progenitors for autologous transplantation in cancer patients.
Renal angiomyolipoma: report of 24 cases.
Ten cases of transitional cell carcinoma of bladder causing ureteric obstruction.
Prostate tumour markers and differentiation grade in prostatic cancer.
Epidermoid cyst (monodermal teratoma) of the testis.
The cancer experience in the Framingham Heart Study cohort.
Variability in DNA measurements in multiple tumor samples of human colonic carcinoma.
Clear cell carcinoma of the inguinal region arising from endometriosis.
Percent tumor necrosis as a predictor of treatment response in canine osteosarcoma.
Usefulness of serum glycoconjugates in precancerous and cancerous diseases of the oral cavity.
A prospective randomized comparison of protracted infusional 5-fluorouracil with or without weekly bolus cisplatin in metastatic colorectal carcinoma. A Mid-Atlantic Oncology Program study.
Relationship between histologic features, DNA flow cytometry, and clinical behavior of squamous cell carcinomas of the larynx.
Evaluation of serum CA 125 as a tumor marker in non-small cell lung cancer.
Chondrosarcomas of the synovium.
Prognostic value of histopathology in Ewing's sarcoma. Long-term follow-up of distal extremity primary tumors.
Acinic cell carcinoma. Clinicopathologic review.
Risk factors for cancer of the tongue in Uruguay.
Prognostic factors in yolk sac tumors of the ovary. A clinicopathologic analysis of 29 cases.
Bone sarcomas as second malignant neoplasms following childhood cancer.
A Southwest Oncology Group study on the use of a human tumor cloning assay for predicting response in patients with ovarian cancer.
Yield from total skin examination and effectiveness of skin cancer awareness program. Findings in 874 new dermatology patients.
Achievement of life goals by adult survivors of modern treatment for childhood cancer.
Two-drug therapy in patients with metastatic germ cell tumors.
A study of cyproheptadine in the treatment of metastatic carcinoid tumor and the malignant carcinoid syndrome.
Remission induction and continuation therapy in children with their first relapse of acute lymphoid leukemia. A Pediatric Oncology Group study.
Prolonged response to carboplatin in an infant with brain stem glioma.
Postoperative follow-up of patients with early breast cancer. Patterns of care among clinical oncologists and a review of the literature.
Imaging of a parapharyngeal hemangiopericytoma. Radioimmunoscintigraphy (SPECT) with indium-111-labeled anti-CEA antibody, and comparison to digital subtraction angiography, computed tomography, and immunohistochemistry.
Elective radical neck dissection in epidermoid cancer of the head and neck. A retrospective analysis of 853 cases of mouth, pharynx, and larynx cancer.
Results of treating ductal carcinoma in situ of the breast with conservative surgery and radiation therapy.
Surgical management of pericardial effusion in patients with malignancies. Comparison of subxiphoid window versus pericardiectomy.
Limitation of transcatheter arterial chemoembolization using iodized oil for small hepatocellular carcinoma. A study in resected cases.
The interferon system in carcinoma of the cervix. Effect of radiation and chemotherapy.
Immunohistologic detection of the epidermal growth factor receptor in human esophageal squamous cell carcinoma.
The value of immunohistochemistry for collagen IV expression in colorectal carcinomas.
Late effects of treatment for Wilms' tumor. A report from the National Wilms' Tumor Study Group.
T-cell lymphoma and mature nephroblastoma after synchronous bilateral Wilms' tumor.
Hepatocellular carcinoma as second malignant neoplasms in successfully treated Wilms' tumor patients. A National Wilms' Tumor Study report.
A phase II trial of carboplatin and vinblastine in the treatment of advanced squamous cell carcinoma of the esophagus.
A phase II multi-institutional trial of low-dose N-(phosphonacetyl)-L-aspartate and high-dose 5-fluorouracil as a short-term infusion in the treatment of adenocarcinoma of the pancreas. A Southwest Oncology Group study.
A dose-intensive regimen of 5-fluorouracil for the treatment of metastatic colorectal carcinoma.
Neoadjuvant chemotherapy and radical surgery in locally advanced cervical cancer. Prognostic factors for response and survival.
Combined surgical resection and iridium 192 implantation for locally advanced and recurrent desmoid tumors.
Prognostic factors in the treatment of hepatocellular carcinoma with transcatheter arterial embolization and arterial infusion.
A report on radiation-induced gliomas.
Second cancer after radiation therapy for cancer of the uterine cervix.
Evaluation of a simple line width test involving magnetic resonance spectroscopy of plasma in carcinoma of the ovary.
Prostate-specific antigen and external beam radiation therapy in prostate cancer.
Ki-67 immunostaining in human breast tumors and its relationship to prognosis.
A high prevalence of antibody to the hepatitis C virus in patients with hepatocellular carcinoma in Japan.
A comparison of Ho's, International Union Against Cancer, and American Joint Committee stage classifications for nasopharyngeal carcinoma.
Non-Hodgkin's lymphoma of the brain after Hodgkin's disease. An immunohistochemical study.
In situ hybridization for the detection of Epstein-Barr virus in central nervous system lymphomas.
DNA and RNA flow cytometric study in multiple myeloma. Clinical correlations.
An immunohistochemical evaluation of progesterone receptor in frozen sections, paraffin sections, and cytologic imprints of breast carcinomas.
A comparative study of histopathology, hormone receptors, peanut lectin binding, Ki-67 immunostaining, and nucleolar organizer region-associated proteins in human breast cancer.
Nucleolar organizer regions in precancerous and cancerous lesions of the bronchus.
Differential alpha-fetoprotein lectin binding in hepatocellular carcinoma. Diagnostic utility at low serum levels.
Insulin secretion and action in patients with pancreatic cancer.
Pancreatic mucinous cystadenocarcinoma with pseudosarcomatous mural nodules. A report of a case with immunohistochemical study.
Malignant fibrous histiocytoma of soft tissue. A population-based epidemiologic and prognostic study of 137 patients.
Obesity and body fat distribution and breast cancer prognosis.
Prognostic implications of tumor diameter in carcinoma of the head of the pancreas.
Is the treatment of metastatic carcinoid tumor with interferon not as successful as suggested?
A pilot study of intermediate-dose methotrexate and cytosine arabinoside, "spread-out" or "up-front," in continuation therapy for childhood non-T, non-B acute lymphoblastic leukemia. A Pediatric Oncology Group study.
Multidisciplinary treatment of primary orbital rhabdomyosarcoma. A single-institution experience.
Combination therapy for anaplastic giant cell thyroid carcinoma.
Response rates in relapsed Wilms' tumor. A need for new effective agents.
Primary treatment of large and massive adult sarcomas with iododeoxyuridine and aggressive hyperfractionated irradiation.
Ultrasound and ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration biopsy of supraclavicular lymph nodes in patients with esophageal carcinoma.
Altered protein tyrosine kinase levels in human colon carcinoma.
Watch and wait after careful surgical treatment and staging in well-differentiated early ovarian cancer.
Immunosuppressive acidic protein in malignant diseases. Clinical relevance?
Loss of expression of blood group antigen H is associated with cellular invasion and spread of oral squamous cell carcinomas.
Novel antigens characteristic of neuroendocrine malignancies.
Ras gene mutations in intraductal papillary neoplasms of the pancreas. Analysis in five cases.
Osteosarcoma in young children.
Clinicopathologic characteristics of adenosquamous carcinoma of the lung.
Immunohistochemical evaluation of seven monoclonal antibodies for differentiation of pleural mesothelioma from lung adenocarcinoma.
Fine-needle aspiration in hepatocellular carcinoma. Combined cytologic and histologic approach.
Myeloma of the head of the pancreas. A case report.
Nonseminomatous germ cell tumor with very high serum human chorionic gonadotropin.
Recurrent renal cell carcinoma arising in Wilms' tumor.
Acute respiratory failure and pulmonary thrombosis in leukemic children.
Pregnancy outcome in hematologic malignancies.
Clinical presentation, treatment, and outcome of trilateral retinoblastoma.
The role of infection in the morbidity and mortality of patients with head and neck cancer undergoing multimodality therapy.
Factors related to and consequences of weight loss in patients with stomach cancer. The Norwegian Multicenter experience. Norwegian Stomach Cancer Trial.
Intrapericardial infusion of 5-fluorouracil. An unusual complication of a Hickman catheter.
Zinc and copper in breast cancer. A joint study in northern Italy and southern France.
Comparative epidemiology of cancer between the United States and Japan. A second look.
Gastrointestinal intraluminal pH in normal subjects and those with colorectal adenoma or carcinoma.
In vitro anticolon antibody production by mucosal or peripheral blood lymphocytes from patients with ulcerative colitis [published erratum appears in Gut 1991 Apr;32(4):460]
Rectal mucosal dysplasia in Crohn's disease.
Type II oestrogen binding sites in human colorectal carcinoma.
Primary lymphoma of the liver: clinical and pathological features of 10 patients.
Comparative in situ hybridisation study of juvenile laryngeal papillomatosis in Papua New Guinea and Australia.
Monoclonal antibody B72.3 in benign breast lesions.
Improved silver staining of nucleolar organiser regions in paraffin wax sections using an inverted incubation technique [published erratum appears in J Clin Pathol 1991 Jun;44(6):528]
Refractory parastomal ulcers: a multidisciplinary approach.
Ileal duplication cyst causing massive bleeding in a child.
Small bowel obstruction associated with a leiomyomatous uterus. A case report and review of the literature.
Cystic mesothelioma of peritoneum: occurrence in a man.
Neuromesenchymal hamartoma of the small bowel.
Early inappropriate secretion of antidiuretic hormone after trans-sphenoidal pituitary adenomectomy.
Marijuana smoking as a possible cause of tongue carcinoma in young patients.
Pharyngeal adenocarcinoma with intestinal features.
Fourth branchial pouch anomaly.
Cystic hygroma: massive recurrence in adult life.
Papillary adenocarcinoma of the middle ear.
A case of amnesia after excision of the septum pellucidum.
Trends in female breast cancer in Connecticut and the United States.
Recent life change and large bowel cancer. Data from the Melbourne Colorectal Cancer Study.
Clustering of cancer in families of patients with primary lung cancer.
SPECT quantitation of iodine-131 concentration in phantoms and human tumors.
Management of patients with thyroid carcinoma: application of thallium-201 scintigraphy and magnetic resonance imaging
Indium-111-antimyosin scintigraphy after doxorubicin therapy in patients with advanced breast cancer
Indium-labeled anti-colorectal carcinoma monoclonal antibody accumulation in non-tumored tissue in patients with colorectal carcinoma.
6-[18F]fluoro-L-fucose: a possible tracer for assessing glycoconjugate synthesis in tumors with positron emission tomography.
SPECT imaging of pediatric brain tumor with hexakis (methoxyisobutylisonitrile) technetium (I).
Beta camera for static and dynamic imaging of charged-particle emitting radionuclides in biologic samples.
Treatment of childhood angiomatous diseases with recombinant interferon alfa-2a.
Renal function in obstructive jaundice in man: cholangiocarcinoma model.
Postoperative adjuvant chemotherapy in non-small cell lung cancer: prognostic value of DNA ploidy and post-recurrent survival.
Modified anterior compartment resection.
Leukocyte alkaline phosphatase score in patients with cerebrovascular disease and in patients with primary and metastatic brain tumors.
Dysgerminoma of the ovary: review of 27 cases.
Renal oncocytoma: long-term follow-up and flow cytometric DNA analysis.
Granular cell neoplasm of the extrahepatic biliary tree: morphological, ultrastructural, and immunohistochemical study and review of the literature.
Bilateral malignant phyllodes tumours.
Adjuvant, specific, active immunotherapy for resectable squamous cell lung carcinoma: a 5-year survival analysis.
Unusual malignant neoplasms of the esophagus. Oat cell carcinoma, melanoma, and sarcoma.
Migration stimulating activity in serum of breast cancer patients.
The axilla: not a no-go zone
Nonhomologous chromatid exchange in hereditary and sporadic renal cell carcinomas.
Prothymosin alpha antisense oligomers inhibit myeloma cell division.
Sequence and functional expression in Xenopus oocytes of a human insulinoma and islet potassium channel.
Dimerization of mammalian progesterone receptors occurs in the absence of DNA and is related to the release of the 90-kDa heat shock protein.
Pancreatic tumor pathogenesis reflects the causative genetic lesion.
Nosocomial infections due to Xanthomonas maltophilia (Pseudomonas maltophilia) in patients with cancer.
Williams' vulvovaginoplasty after supralevator total pelvic exenteration.
Roentgenographic evaluation of the augmented breast.
Flexible sigmoidoscopy as a screening procedure in rural patients.
Pancreatic carcinoma in an elderly woman with an organic affective disorder and AIDS delusion.
Scoring system for the preoperative evaluation of metastatic spine tumor prognosis.
Total sacrectomy and reconstruction for huge sacral tumors.
Transurethral resection versus needle biopsy prior to radical prostatectomy for stage C prostate cancer. Influence on progression and survival.
Renal cell carcinoma vs. renal oncocytoma. Report of a case with overlap features and review of the literature
Perinatal transmission of human papillomavirus.
Hepatobiliary manifestations of the acquired immune deficiency syndrome.
Clinical evaluation of plasma abnormal prothrombin (des-gamma-carboxy prothrombin) in hepatobiliary malignancies and other diseases.
Spontaneous rupture of hepatocellular carcinoma: a review of 172 Japanese cases.
Endoscopic placement of a Foley catheter across a stricture and rectovaginal fistula to perform a barium enema.
Epstein-Barr virus transformation of B lymphocytes from IgA nephropathy patients and first-degree relatives results in increased immunoglobulin synthesis not restricted to IgA.
Infiltration of the lower respiratory tract by helper/inducer T lymphocytes in HTLV-1-associated adult T-cell leukemia/lymphoma.
Aggressive primary gastrointestinal lymphomas: review of 91 patients treated with the LNH-84 regimen. A study of the Groupe d'Etude des Lymphomes Agressifs.
Overexpression of HER-2/neu in endometrial cancer is associated with advanced stage disease.
A risk-benefit analysis of elective bilateral oophorectomy: effect of changes in compliance with estrogen therapy on outcome.
Human immunodeficiency virus-induced immunosuppression: a risk factor for human papillomavirus infection.
The diagnosis of ovarian cancer by pathologists: how often do diagnoses by contributing pathologists agree with a panel of gynecologic pathologists?
Dissection of the cardinal ligament in radical hysterectomy for cervical cancer with emphasis on the lateral ligament.
Angiosarcoma of the uterus: a case report.
The elusive colonic malignancy. A need for definitive preoperative localization.
Carotid artery disease in patients with head and neck carcinoma.
The pathology of nonpalpable breast cancer.
Intravenous administration of recombinant human granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor causes a cutaneous eruption
Intraepithelial anchoring fibril components.
Cutaneous manifestations of multiple myeloma.
Familial multiple desmoplastic trichoepitheliomas.
In vivo ultraviolet irradiation of human skin results in profound perturbation of the immune system. Relevance to ultraviolet-induced skin cancer [published erratum appears in Arch Dermatol 1991 Sep;127(9):1368]
Acquired von Willebrand's syndrome. Therapeutic and diagnostic implications.
Cervical rotation flaps for midface resurfacing.
Drug response of head and neck tumors in native-state histoculture.
Ultrasonic morphology of the uterus and ovaries after treatment of invasive mole and gestational choriocarcinoma.
Progress and challenges in psychosocial and behavioral research in cancer in the twentieth century.
Advances in data assessment. Application to the etiology of nausea reported during chemotherapy, concerns about significance testing, and opportunities in clinical trials.
Social environment and social support.
Social support and the cancer patient. Implications for future research and clinical care.
Needs and recommendations for behavior research in the prevention and early detection of cancer.
Epidemiologic perspectives on life-style modification and health promotion in cancer research.
Physiologic and psychobehavioral research in oncology.
Psychoneuroimmunology. Implications for oncology?
Scientific inquiry in childhood cancer psychosocial research. Theoretical, conceptual, and methodologic issues in the investigation and behavioral treatment of procedure-related distress.
Quality of life research in oncology. Past achievements and future priorities.
Methodologic issues in assessing the quality of life of cancer patients.
Quality-of-life-adjusted survival for comparing cancer treatments. A commentary on TWiST and Q-TWiST.
Progress in psychosocial and behavioral cancer research. The need for enabling strategies.
Behavioral and psychosocial cancer research. Building on the past, preparing for the future.
Update: prostate cancer.
Polycystic ovary syndrome.
Risk factors for breast cancer.
Fertility-sparing treatment of patients with ovarian cancer.
Chromogranin A: posttranslational modifications in secretory granules.
Comparison of FRTL-5 cell growth in vitro with that of xenotransplanted cells and the thyroid of the recipient mouse.
Regulation of pancreastatin release from a human pancreatic carcinoid cell line in vitro.
The gonadotropin-releasing hormone associated peptide reduces calcium entry in prolactin-secreting cells.
Regulation of the truncation of luteinizing hormone receptors at the plasma membrane is different in rat and mouse Leydig cells.
Single cell levels of hypothalamic messenger ribonucleic acid encoding luteinizing hormone-releasing hormone in intact, castrated, and hyperprolactinemic male rats.
Breast cancer screening in older women: practices and barriers reported by primary care physicians.
The role of tumor-derived cytokines on the immune system of mice bearing a mammary adenocarcinoma. I. Induction of regulatory macrophages in normal mice by the in vivo administration of rGM-CSF.
Insulin-like growth factors are mitogenic for human keratinocytes and a squamous cell carcinoma.
Inositol phosphate formation in the human squamous cell carcinoma line SCC-12 F: studies with bradykinin, the calcium ionophore A23187, and sodium fluoride.
A clonal CD4-positive T-cell line established from the blood of a patient with Sezary syndrome.
Scanning acoustic microscopy of neoplastic and inflammatory cutaneous tissue specimens.
T-cell subsets with a naive phenotype are selectively decreased in the peripheral blood of patients with mycosis fungoides.
The use of L-dopa and carbidopa in metastatic malignant melanoma.
Elderly men with histories of heavy drinking: correlates and consequences.
Thyroid disease and pregnancy.
Thyroid disease in the elderly.
Thyroid cancer.
The effects of nonthyroid disease and drugs on thyroid function tests.
Advances in molecular biology. Potential impact on diagnosis and treatment of disorders of the thyroid.
Suppression of tumorigenicity in human colon carcinoma cells by introduction of normal chromosome 5 or 18.
Lack of transmission of the live attenuated varicella vaccine virus to immunocompromised children after immunization of their siblings.
Hepatic arterial embolization in cases of extensive celiac arterial stenosis.
Malignancy associated with chronic empyema: radiologic assessment.
Use of gadolinium-enhanced MR imaging for differentiating mucoceles from neoplasms in the paranasal sinuses.
Normal and abnormal pituitary glands: gadopentetate dimeglumine-enhanced MR imaging.
Benign and malignant nodules in cirrhotic livers: distinction based on blood supply.
Hepatic dynamic sequential CT: section enhancement profiles with a bolus of ionic and nonionic contrast agents.
Linkage of early-onset familial breast cancer to chromosome 17q21.
Inheritance of proliferative breast disease in breast cancer kindreds.
Detection of Ki-67 proliferation rate in breast cancer. Correlation with clinical and pathologic features.
Fluorescent cytochemical detection of estrogen and progesterone receptors in breast fine-needle aspirates.
Evaluation of in vitro bromodeoxyuridine labeling of breast carcinomas with the use of a commercial kit.
Neuroendocrine carcinoma of the ampulla of vater. A case of absence of somatostatin in a vasoactive intestinal polypeptide-, bombesin-, and cholecystokinin-producing tumor.
Diagnostic value of DNA analysis in effusions by flow cytometry and image analysis. A prospective study on 102 patients as compared with cytologic examination
Evolution of in vitro transformation and tumorigenesis of HPV16 and HPV18 immortalized primary cervical epithelial cells.
Expression of blood group antigens H-2, Le(y), and sialylated-Le(a) in human colorectal carcinoma. An immunohistochemical study using double-labeling techniques.
Phenotypic relationships of prostatic intraepithelial neoplasia to invasive prostatic carcinoma.
Tumor-secreted vascular permeability factor increases cytosolic Ca2+ and von Willebrand factor release in human endothelial cells.
Immunoreactivity and receptor expression of insulinlike growth factor I and insulin in human adrenal tumors. An immunohistochemical study of 94 cases.
A critical analysis of the largest reported mass fecal occult blood screening program in the United States.
Surgical management of nonparasitic cystic liver disease.
Factors influencing survival after pancreaticoduodenectomy for pancreatic cancer.
Immunophenotyping in the management of gastric lymphoma.
Implications of peritoneal cytology for staging of early pancreatic cancer.
Differential diagnosis of sclerosing cholangiocarcinomas of the common hepatic duct (Klatskin tumors).
High-grade dysplasia in the columnar-lined esophagus.
Thoracoscopy for the diagnosis of pleural disease.
Late deaths after treatment for childhood cancer.
Acute myeloid leukemia and background radiation in an expanded case-referent study.
Expression of blood group antigens by normal bronchopulmonary tissues and common forms of pulmonary carcinomas.
Expression of ABH blood group antigens, Ulex europaeus agglutinin I, and type IV collagen in the sinusoids of hepatocellular carcinoma.
Null cell adenoma of the pituitary with features of plurihormonality and plurimorphous differentiation.
Pleomorphic (anaplastic) neuroblastoma in nude mice.
Glomus tumor of the coccyx. A curable cause of coccygodynia.
Malignant mixed tumor (malignant ameloblastoma and fibrosarcoma) of the maxilla.
Bone marrow necrosis in leukemic-phase follicular lymphoma.
Aspergillus terreus endophthalmitis in a patient with chronic lymphocytic leukemia.
Response by women aged 65-79 to invitation for screening for breast cancer by mammography: a pilot study [published erratum appears in BMJ 1991 Jul 27;303(6796):234]
The use of cytochemical procedures in the diagnosis and management of acute and chronic myeloid leukemia.
Leukemias of indeterminant lineage.
The role of ras gene mutations in myeloproliferative disorders.
Systems used to study the nature of the leukemic cell and predict treatment outcome in patients with myeloproliferative disorders.
Myeloproliferative disorders. Classification and diagnostic features with special emphasis on chronic myelogenous leukemia and agnogenic myeloid metaplasia.
Molecular methods to detect the Philadelphia chromosome.
Palliation of malignant esophageal obstruction.
Islet cell carcinoma of the pancreas presenting as bleeding from isolated gastric varices. Report of a case and review of the literature.
Pancreatic ascites presenting in infancy, with review of the literature.
Significance of anti-HBx antibodies in hepatitis B virus infection.
Point mutation, allelic loss and increased methylation of c-Ha-ras gene in human hepatocellular carcinoma.
Antibodies in anti-HBe-positive patient sera bind to an HBe protein expressed on the cell surface of human hepatoma cells: implications for virus clearance.
Increased epidermal growth factor receptors in seborrheic keratoses and acrochordons of patients with the dysplastic nevus syndrome.
Cyclosporine in the treatment of cutaneous T cell lymphoma.
Recreational sun exposure in Puerto Rico: trends and cancer risk awareness.
Cutaneous angiolipoleiomyoma.
Complete follow-up and evaluation of a skin cancer screening in Connecticut.
The risk of developing subsequent nonmelanoma skin cancers.
Histologic pattern analysis of basal cell carcinoma. Study of a series of 1039 consecutive neoplasms.
Treatment of port-wine stains during childhood with the flashlamp-pumped pulsed dye laser.
Induction of DNA fragmentation in chronic B-lymphocytic leukemia cells.
Transforming growth factor-beta-induced inhibition of T cell function. Susceptibility difference in T cells of various phenotypes and functions and its relevance to immunosuppression in the tumor-bearing state.
Expression of VHIII-associated cross-reactive idiotype on human B lymphocytes. Association with staphylococcal protein A binding and Staphylococcus aureus Cowan I stimulation.
Intraperitoneal cisplatin and cytarabine in the treatment of refractory or recurrent ovarian carcinoma
Prognostic variables in patients with diffuse large-cell lymphoma treated with MACOP-B.
Discordant bone marrow involvement in diffuse large-cell lymphoma: a distinct clinical-pathologic entity associated with a continuous risk of relapse.
A comparison of induction and maintenance therapy for acute nonlymphocytic leukemia in childhood: results of a Pediatric Oncology Group study.
Influence of chemotherapy administration on monocyte activation by liposomal muramyl tripeptide phosphatidylethanolamine in children with osteosarcoma.
Venous and arterial thrombosis in patients who received adjuvant therapy for breast cancer.
Epirubicin at two dose levels with prednisolone as treatment for advanced breast cancer: the results of a randomized trial.
A prospective randomized trial comparing epirubicin monochemotherapy to two fluorouracil, cyclophosphamide, and epirubicin regimens differing in epirubicin dose in advanced breast cancer patients. The French Epirubicin Study Group
Intrapleural cisplatin and cytarabine in the management of malignant pleural effusions: a Lung Cancer Study Group trial.
When is a prognostic factor useful? A guide for the perplexed.
Endoscopic ventricular fenestration using a "saline torch".
Intracranial arachnoid cysts in children. A comparison of the effects of fenestration and shunting.
Multiple adenomas of the human pituitary. A retrospective autopsy study with clinical implications.
An epithelial cyst in the cerebellopontine angle. Case report.
Accessory arm--dysraphism or disparity? Case report.
L-methionine uptake by human cerebral cortex: maturation from infancy to old age
Long-term follow-up in toxic solitary autonomous thyroid nodules treated with radioactive iodine
Vasculitis as a paraneoplastic syndrome. Report of 11 cases and review of the literature.
Systemic toxic effects associated with high-dose verapamil infusion and chemotherapy administration.
Clinical relevance of immunohistochemical detection of multidrug resistance P-glycoprotein in breast carcinoma
Effect of interleukin-1-beta on metastasis formation in different tumor systems.
Phase I clinical and pharmacokinetic trial of flavone acetic acid.
Tumor suppressor genes: new prospects for cancer research.
Phase I and imaging trial of indium 111-labeled anti-epidermal growth factor receptor monoclonal antibody 225 in patients with squamous cell lung carcinoma
Stress response protein (srp-27) determination in primary human breast carcinomas: clinical, histologic, and prognostic correlations
Therapeutic advantage of hypoxic cells in tumors: a theoretical study
Brief intensive chemotherapy for metastatic non-small-cell lung cancer: a phase II study of the weekly CODE regimen.
Analysis of alterations in the retinoblastoma gene and tumor grade in bone and soft-tissue sarcomas.
Diffusion and binding of monoclonal antibody TNT-1 in multicellular tumor spheroids.
Management of primary nonrenal parenchymal malignancies with vena caval thrombus.
The incidence and prognostic significance of humoral hypercalcemia in renal cell carcinoma.
Uptake of 2-deoxy, 2-(18F) fluoro-D-glucose in bladder cancer: animal localization and initial patient positron emission tomography.
Post-chemotherapy tumor residuals in patients with advanced nonseminomatous testicular cancer. Is it necessary to resect all residual masses?
Predicting radionuclide bone scan findings in patients with newly diagnosed, untreated prostate cancer: prostate specific antigen is superior to all other clinical parameters.
The distribution of residual cancer in radical prostatectomy specimens in stage A prostate cancer.
Multifocal, synchronous inverted papillomas involving the ureter.
Pelvic lipomatosis associated with cystitis glandularis and adenocarcinoma of the bladder.
Locally recurrent endometrioid adenocarcinoma of the prostate after radical prostatectomy.
Effect of suramin on human prostate cancer cells in vitro.
Influence of age and endocrine factors on the volume of benign prostatic hyperplasia.
Expression of c-erbB-2 gene product in urinary bladder cancer.
Follicular thyroid cancer treated at the Mayo Clinic, 1946 through 1970: initial manifestations, pathologic findings, therapy, and outcome
Paraneoplastic brachial plexopathy in a patient with Hodgkin's disease.
Longitudinal study of women with negative cervical smears according to endocervical status
Chromogranin A storage and secretion: sensitivity and specificity for the diagnosis of pheochromocytoma.
A simplified diagnostic approach to pheochromocytoma. A review of the literature and report of one institution's experience.
Diagnostic relevance of clonal cytogenetic aberrations in malignant soft-tissue tumors.
Pretreatment neuropsychological status and associated factors in children with primary brain tumors.
Observations on the pathophysiology of Nelson's syndrome: a report of three cases.
Myeloma manifesting as a large jugular tumor: case report.
Giant intradiploic epidermoid tumor of the occipital bone: case report.
Neurinoma in the cavernous sinus: report of two cases.
Spinal cord hemangioblastoma with subarachnoid hemorrhage.
"Moustache" appearance in craniopharyngiomas: unique magnetic resonance imaging and computed tomographic findings of perifocal edema.
Prognostic factors in stage IB squamous cervical cancer patients with low risk for recurrence.
Familial ovarian cancer in Israeli Jewish women.
Serial CA 125 levels during chemotherapy for metastatic or recurrent endometrial cancer.
Estrogen replacement therapy: is previously treated cancer a contraindication?
Cone cerclage in pregnancy.
Identification of a cDNA encoding a second putative prohormone convertase related to PC2 in AtT20 cells and islets of Langerhans.
Queuine, a tRNA anticodon wobble base, maintains the proliferative and pluripotent potential of HL-60 cells in the presence of the differentiating agent 6-thioguanine.
Progression of human papillomavirus type 18-immortalized human keratinocytes to a malignant phenotype.
Vascularized full-thickness parietal bone grafts in maxillofacial reconstruction: the role of the galea and superficial temporal vessels.
Metastatic melanoma to the facial nerve.
An evaluation of the distinction of ectopic and pituitary ACTH dependent Cushing's syndrome by clinical features, biochemical tests and radiological findings.
Clinical features and natural history of von Hippel-Lindau disease
Genetic mechanisms of tumor suppression by the human p53 gene.
Reoperation for colorectal carcinoma.
Treatment of renal cell carcinoma by extracorporeal partial nephrectomy and autotransplantation using splenic vascular anastomosis.
A prospective study of double diagnosis of nonpalpable lesions of the breast.
Simple technique for long term central venous access in the patient with thrombocytopenic carcinoma.
The Merkel cell and associated neoplasms in the eyelids and periocular region.
Chest wall involvement by lung cancer: computed tomographic detection and results of operation.
Esophageal malignancies: is preoperative radiotherapy the way to go?
Response to chemotherapy does not predict survival after resection of sarcomatous pulmonary metastases.
Aggressive surgical intervention in N2 non-small cell cancer of the lung.
Nephrotic syndrome complicating adenocarcinoma of the lung with resolution after resection.
Surgical strategy for early gastric cancer.
Adrenal insufficiency in the cancer patient: implications for the surgeon.
Adjuvant chemotherapy with 5-fluorouracil, vincristine and CCNU for patients with Dukes' C colorectal cancer. The Swedish Gastrointestinal Tumour Adjuvant Therapy Group.
Value of retesting subjects with a positive Hemoccult in screening for colorectal cancer.
Epidermal growth factor receptor expression in colorectal cancer.
Risk of cancer death in first-degree relatives of patients with hereditary non-polyposis cancer syndrome (Lynch type II): a study of 130 kindreds in the United Kingdom.
Levamisole and 5-fluorouracil therapy for resected colon cancer: a new indication.
Macrophage colony-stimulating factor activity in malignant pleural effusions. Its augmentation by intrapleural interleukin-2 infusions.
Catecholamine-induced cardiomyopathy in multiple endocrine neoplasia. A histologic, ultrastructural, and biochemical study.
Atopy and primary lung cancer. Histology and sex distribution.
The acute and insidious onset of pulmonary metastatic transitional cell carcinoma.
Retinoid modulation of insulin-like growth factor-binding proteins and inhibition of breast carcinoma proliferation.
Reviewing the unicystic ameloblastoma: report of two cases.
A multicentre follow-up study of 1152 patients with myasthenia gravis in Italy.
Oculo-bulbar myasthenic symptoms as the sole sign of tumour involving or compressing the brain stem.
Primary intracerebral sarcoma in childhood: case report with electron-microscope study.
Evaluation of the serum level of immunosuppressive substance in oral cancer patients.
Vulvar Paget's disease. Is immunocytochemistry helpful in assessing the surgical margins?
Immunohistochemical investigations of estrogen receptors in normal and neoplastic squamous epithelium of the vulva.
Granular cell tumors of the vulva.
Periurethral colonic-type polyp simulating urethral caruncle. A case report.
Vulvar condylomas and squamous vestibular micropapilloma. Differences in appearance and response to treatment.
Vulvar intraepithelial neoplasia. A clinicopathologic study of 60 cases.
Multimodality therapy for advanced and recurrent vulvar squamous cell carcinoma. A pilot project.
Value of four models for selecting patients for local excision of invasive squamous cell carcinoma of the vulva.
The 1989 presidential address. International Society for the Study of Vulvar Disease.
Decreased local toxicity with subcutaneous diamorphine (heroin): a preliminary report.
Literacy and laryngectomy: how should one treat head and neck cancer in patients who cannot read or write?
Paratesticular myxoma: an unusual benign intrascrotal neoplasm.
Wernicke-Korsakoff syndrome complicating T-cell lymphoma: unusual or unrecognized?
Astroblastoma: electron microscopy and immunohistochemical findings: case report.
Intramedullary spinal cord germinoma: case report.
Glossopharyngeal schwannoma: review of five cases and the literature.
Infarct of the conus medullaris simulating a spinal cord tumor: case report.
Ganglioneuroma of the spinal cord.
Mammography and early breast cancer detection.
Genetic analysis of breast cancer in the cancer and steroid hormone study.
Contributions of the Zollinger-Ellison syndrome.
Historical review of pancreaticoduodenectomy.
Carcinoma of the ductus choledochus.
Germfree animals and technics in surgical research.
Vascular lesions of the intestines.
The effects of midazolam on cerebral blood flow and oxygen consumption. Interaction with nitrous oxide in patients undergoing craniotomy for supratentorial cerebral tumours.
Pregnancy associated with Gorlin's syndrome.
Cellular and molecular basis of the asbestos-related diseases.
Reversed helper/suppressor T-lymphocyte ratio in bronchoalveolar lavage fluid from patients with breast cancer and Pneumocystis carinii pneumonia.
Capillary hemangiomas and treatment with the flash lamp-pumped pulsed dye laser
Effectiveness of radiotherapy with radical neck dissection in cancers of the head and neck.
The epithelial changes associated with squamous cell carcinoma of the vulva: a review of the clinical, histological and viral findings in 78 women.
Decalcification of a choroidal osteoma.
Translocation (9;22) is associated with extremely poor prognosis in intensively treated children with acute lymphoblastic leukemia.
Clinical characteristics and treatment outcome of childhood acute lymphoblastic leukemia with the t(4;11)(q21;q23): a collaborative study of 40 cases.
Human immunodeficiency virus infection of megakaryocytic cells.
Characterization of an interleukin-6-mediated autocrine growth loop in the human multiple myeloma cell line, U266.
T-cell translocation gene 1 (Ttg-1) encodes a nuclear protein normally expressed in neural lineage cells.
Fine-needle aspiration evaluation of lymphoproliferative lesions in human immunodeficiency virus-positive patients. A multiparameter approach.
Juvenile (embryonal and alveolar) rhabdomyosarcoma of the head and neck in adults. A clinical, pathologic, and immunohistochemical study of 12 cases.
Thymic carcinoma. A clinicopathologic study of 60 cases.
A comparative analysis of three different techniques for the detection of breast cancer cells in bone marrow.
Microinvasive carcinoma of the uterine cervix (International Federation of Gynecology and Obstetrics Stage IA).
Leiomyosarcoma of bone. A clinicopathologic, immunohistochemical, and ultrastructural study of five cases.
Clinical characteristics and treatment outcome of children with acute lymphocytic leukemia and Down's syndrome. A Pediatric Oncology Group study.
Idiopathic hypereosinophilic syndrome terminating as disseminated T-cell lymphoma.
Hypersensitivity reactions to epipodophyllotoxins in children with acute lymphoblastic leukemia.
Malignant glandular triton tumor.
The long-term effects of radiation therapy on patients with ovarian dysgerminoma.
Expectant management of localized prostatic cancer.
Psychosocial adjustment in women with breast cancer.
Prognosis of pregnancy-associated breast cancer.
Patient-controlled analgesic administration. A comparison of steady-state morphine infusions with bolus doses.
Combination hormonal therapy with tamoxifen plus fluoxymesterone versus tamoxifen alone in postmenopausal women with metastatic breast cancer. An updated analysis.
Cisplatin, continuous-infusion 5-fluorouracil, and intermediate-dose methotrexate in the treatment of unresectable non-small cell carcinoma of the lung.
Multimodality cisplatin treatment in nonresectable alpha-fetoprotein-positive hepatoma.
Ultrasound-guided hepatic cryosurgery in the treatment of metastatic colon carcinoma. Preliminary results.
Sphincter preservation in rectal cancer by local excision and postoperative radiation therapy.
Combined chemotherapy and radiation therapy in advanced inoperable squamous cell carcinoma of the head and neck. The final report of a randomized trial.
Treatment of advanced neuroblastoma with I-131 meta-iodobenzylguanidine.
Plasma cell granuloma of the nasal cavity treated by radiation therapy.
Surgical treatment of extramammary Paget's disease. A report of six cases and a reexamination of Mohs micrographic surgery compared with conventional surgical excision.
Flow cytometric DNA analysis of hepatocellular carcinoma.
Predictors of physician nonadherence to chemotherapy regimens.
Complete remission in refractory anaplastic adult Wilms' tumor treated with cisplatin and etoposide.
Platelet factor 4 mRNA expression in cells from a patient with megakaryoblastic crisis of chronic myelogenous leukemia.
Differentiation in embryonal neuroepithelial tumors of the central nervous system.
Expression of class I and II human leukocyte antigens by thyrocytes and lymphocytic infiltration on human thyroid tumors. An immunofluorescence study.
Immunohistologic evaluation of parathyroid hormone-related protein in human lung cancer and normal tissue with newly developed monoclonal antibody.
Expression of the macrophage colony-stimulating factor and its receptor in gynecologic malignancies.
Genotypic analyses of Richter's syndrome.
Advances in medical imaging for cancer diagnosis and treatment.
Prostate cancer: transrectal ultrasound and pathology comparison. A preliminary study of outer gland (peripheral and central zones) and inner gland (transition zone) cancer.
The natural history of colorectal cancer. Opportunities for intervention.
Imaging techniques in the diagnosis of carcinoma of the colon.
Imaging bone tumors in the 1990s.
Primary neoplasms of the hollow organs of the gastrointestinal tract. Staging and follow-up.
Liver tumor imaging.
Staging and follow-up of breast cancer patients.
Oncologic imaging. Staging and follow-up of renal and adrenal carcinoma.
Primary neoplasms of the central nervous system in children.
Magnetic resonance imaging in the evaluation of spinal tumors.
Radioimmunology. Imaging and therapy.
Single photon emission computed tomography and positron emission tomography in cancer imaging.
New directions in medical imaging of cancer. Magnetic resonance methods and single photon emission computed tomography.
Imaging of adult central nervous system primary malignant gliomas. Staging and follow-up.
Proliferation and DNA ploidy in malignant breast tumors in relation to early oral contraceptive use and early abortions.
Treatment of patients with advanced colorectal cancer with cisplatin, 5-fluorouracil, and leucovorin.
Serum tumor markers and patient allocation to good-risk and poor-risk clinical trials in patients with germ cell tumors.
Salvage chemotherapy for patients with germ cell tumors. The Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center experience (1979-1989).
Radiation therapy in metastatic spinal cord compression. A prospective analysis of 105 consecutive patients.
The prognostic value of image analysis in ovarian cancer.
Resection of the primary liver cancer of the hepatic hilus.
Structural and functional integrity of ovarian tumor tissue obtained by ultrasonic aspiration.
Induction of cytotoxicity of the renal hilar lymph nodes by pedal subcutaneous administration of interleukin-2 in patients with renal cancer.
The Lewis X antigen. A new paraffin section marker for Reed-Sternberg cells.
Receptors for epidermal growth factor and steroid hormones in primary laryngeal tumors.
The expression of progesterone receptors coincides with an arrest of DNA synthesis in human breast cancer.
Lymphomas of the breast. A clinicopathologic and immunohistochemical study of primary and secondary cases.
Prognostic implications of DNA histogram, DNA content, and histologic changes of regional lymph nodes in patients with lung cancer.
Association of expression between N-myc gene and major histocompatibility complex class I gene in surgically resected human neuroblastoma.
Clinical significance of hematologic parameters in non-Hodgkin's lymphoma at diagnosis.
Amplification of oncogenes in mammary carcinoma shown by fine-needle biopsy.
Flow cytometric determination of breast tumor heterogeneity.
Predicting recurrence time of esophageal carcinoma through assessment of histologic factors and DNA ploidy.
Primary and metastatic pulmonary meningioma.
Transurethral-resection zone prostate cancer detected at cystoprostatectomy. A detailed histologic analysis and clinical implications.
Serial immunocytologic analysis of blood for tumor cells in two patients with neuroblastoma.
Primary central nervous system lymphoma as a secondary malignancy.
Lung cancer in patients younger than 40 years of age.
A recurrent pelvic desmoid tumor successfully treated with tamoxifen.
The use of ketoconazole in ectopic adrenocorticotropic hormone syndrome.
Serous papillary adenocarcinoma of the tunica vaginalis of the testis with metastasis.
Rural-urban differences in stage at diagnosis. Possible relationship to cancer screening.
Hereditary ovarian cancer. Heterogeneity in age at diagnosis.
Cancer in relatives of survivors of childhood sarcoma.
DNA ploidy pattern in rectal carcinoid tumors.
Detection by CT during arterial portography of colorectal cancer metastases to liver.
Intraepithelial bodies in colorectal adenomas: Leuchtenberger bodies revisited.
Subsite distribution and incidence of colorectal cancer in New Zealand, 1974-1983.
Colorectal cancer: differences between community and geographically distant patients seen at an urban medical center.
A case of cecocolic intussusception with complete invagination and intussusception of the appendix with villous adenoma.
Intra-abdominal desmoid tumors in familial polyposis coli: a case report of tumor regression by prednisolone therapy.
Polycystic ovary syndrome and bulimia.
Effect of baseline ovarian cysts on in vitro fertilization and gamete intrafallopian transfer cycles.
Endoscopic ultrasonography in diagnosis of the extent of gallbladder carcinoma.
Endoscopic biopsy has limited accuracy in diagnosis of ampullary tumors.
Evaluation of endosonography in TN staging of oesophageal cancer.
Alcohol consumption in patients with colorectal adenomatous polyps.
Coeliac disease and malignancy of the duodenum: diagnosis by endoscopy, successful treatment of the malignancy, and response to a gluten free diet.
Spinal instability secondary to metastatic cancer.
Intraosseous lipomatosis. A case report.
Bone lesions secondary to benign phaeochromocytoma. Four cases in childhood.
Chondrosarcoma of the soft tissues. Two different sub-groups.
Determination of plasma calcitonin gene-related peptide concentrations by a new immunochemiluminometric assay in normal persons and patients with medullary thyroid carcinoma and other neuroendocrine tumors.
Use of m-[131I]iodobenzylguanidine in the treatment of malignant pheochromocytoma.
Quantitation of G0 and G1 phase cells in primary carcinomas. Antibody to M1 subunit of ribonucleotide reductase shows G1 phase restriction point block.
Mutations in the K-ras oncogene induced by 1,2-dimethylhydrazine in preneoplastic and neoplastic rat colonic mucosa.
Insulin-like growth factor II-mediated proliferation of human neuroblastoma.
Recombinative events of the T cell antigen receptor delta gene in peripheral T cell lymphomas.
Patterns of epidermal growth factor receptors in basal and squamous cell carcinoma.
Basal cell carcinoma recurring after radiotherapy: a unique, difficult treatment subclass of recurrent basal cell carcinoma.
Skin ultrasound in dermatologic surgical planning.
Prospective follow-up for malignant melanoma in patients with atypical-mole (dysplastic-nevus) syndrome.
The medical necessity of evaluation and treatment of port-wine stains.
Retroviral transduction of protein kinase C-gamma into cytotoxic T lymphocyte clones leads to immortalization with retention of specific function.
Dexamethasone inhibits the induction of monocyte chemotactic-activating factor production by IL-1 or tumor necrosis factor.
DNA sequences 3' of the Ig H chain cluster rearrange in mouse B cell lines.
Examination of HTLV-I integration in the skin lesions of various types of adult T-cell leukemia (ATL): independence of cutaneous-type ATL confirmed by Southern blot analysis.
Immunolocation of TNF-alpha/cachectin in human melanoma cells: studies on co-cultivated malignant melanoma.
Immunohistochemical alterations in basement membrane components of squamous cell carcinoma.
Identification of a melanoma progression antigen as integrin VLA-2.
Mandibular involvement in oral cancer.
Non-Hodgkins lymphoma of the head and neck: experience in the Grampian area.
Haemangiopericytoma of the temporal bone.
Forty years of neuroglycopenia: neuropsychiatry for the internist.
Reproducibility of image interpretation in immunoscintigraphy performed with indium-111- and iodine-131-labeled OC125 F(ab')2 antibody injected into the same patients.
Relationship of uptake of technetium-99m(Sn)-N-pyridoxyl-5-methyltryptophan by hepatocellular carcinoma to prognosis
Comparison of 1073 MBq and 3700 MBq iodine-131 in postoperative ablation of residual thyroid tissue in patients with differentiated thyroid cancer.
Variables influencing tumor uptake of anti-melanoma monoclonal antibodies radioiodinated using para-iodobenzoyl (PIB) conjugate
Extracranial metastatic glioblastoma: appearance on thallium-201-chloride/technetium-99m-HMPAO SPECT images.
Technetium-99m-methylene diphosphonate (MDP) uptake in a sympathetic effusion: an index of malignancy and a review of the literature.
HTLV-I-associated leukemia/lymphoma in south Florida.
Treatable abdominal pathologic conditions and unsuspected malignant neoplasms at autopsy in veterans who received mechanical ventilation.
Mucoepidermoid carcinoma of the salivary glands: a reappraisal of the influence of tumor differentiation on prognosis.
Comparison of characteristics of esophageal squamous cell carcinoma associated with head and neck cancer and those with gastric cancer.
Immune competent cells of regional lymph nodes in colorectal cancer patients: I. Flow cytometric analysis of lymphocyte subpopulation.
Activation and in vitro expansion of tumor-reactive T lymphocytes from lymph nodes draining human primary breast cancers.
Neuroendocrine carcinoid tumours of the breast: a variant of carcinoma with neuroendocrine differentiation.
Characterization and histopathological correlation of cytosol proteins of benign and malignant breast tumors.
Surgical resection of a solitary liver metastasis in a 46-year-old patient with a malignant thymoma.
Lactation following conservation surgery and radiotherapy for breast cancer.
Subrenal capsule assay as a chemosensitivity test for primary esophageal squamous cell carcinoma.
Expression of HLA-DR and secretory component antigens and lymphocyte infiltration in human gastric nonmalignant and malignant tissues: an immunohistochemical study.
Clinical management of gastric cancer and concomitant esophagogastric varices.
Squamous carcinoma of the distal esophagus: a survival study.
Lymphoscintigraphy with 123I-labelled epidermal growth factor
Comparison of continuous subcutaneous and intravenous hydromorphone infusions for management of cancer pain.
Imaging modalities in recurrent head and neck tumors.
Management decisions in laryngeal carcinoma in situ.
The use of bromodeoxyuridine cytokinetic studies as a prognostic indicator of cancer of the head and neck.
Epidermal nevus syndrome: a neurologic variant with hemimegalencephaly, gyral malformation, mental retardation, seizures, and facial hemihypertrophy.
Vascular abnormalities in epidermal nevus syndrome.
Percutaneous aspiration of brain tumor cysts via the Ommaya reservoir system.
The "numb cheek-limp lower lid" syndrome.
Repetitive conservative surgery for recurrence of endometriosis.
Endometrial carcinoma: the relevance of cervical cytology.
Introduction to limb-salvage surgery for sarcomas.
Mobile knee reconstructions after resection of malignant tumors of the distal femur.
Limb salvage in pediatric surgery. The use of the expandable prosthesis.
Resection and reconstruction for bone tumors in the proximal tibia.
Endoprosthetic reconstruction after bone tumor resections of the proximal tibia.
Resection and reconstruction for soft-tissue sarcomas of the extremity.
Allograft reconstructions of the shoulder after bone tumor resections.
Resections and reconstructions for tumors of the distal radius.
Pelvic resections: the Rizzoli Institute experience.
Tumors of the shoulder girdle. Technique of resection and description of a surgical classification.
Reconstructions after resections of tumors involving the proximal femur.
Inhibition of growth of experimental prostate cancer with sustained delivery systems (microcapsules and microgranules) of the luteinizing hormone-releasing hormone antagonist SB-75.
Molecular localization of the t(11;22)(q24;q12) translocation of Ewing sarcoma by chromosomal in situ suppression hybridization.
Mutational activation of the c-Ha-ras gene in liver tumors of different rodent strains: correlation with susceptibility to hepatocarcinogenesis.
cDNA cloning and sequencing of human fibrillarin, a conserved nucleolar protein recognized by autoimmune antisera.
Free radical-derived quinone methide mediates skin tumor promotion by butylated hydroxytoluene hydroperoxide: expanded role for electrophiles in multistage carcinogenesis.
Osteoblastoma of the spine. A review of 75 cases.
Survival after groin dissection for malignant melanoma.
The role of resection in the management of melanoma metastatic to the adrenal gland.
Evaluation of preoperative computed tomography in gastric malignancy.
Total gastrectomy for gastric cancer in the elderly.
A hepatoblastoma originating in the caudate lobe radically resected with the inferior vena cava.
Hepatocellular carcinoma with tumor thrombus extending into the right atrium: report of a successful resection with the use of cardiopulmonary bypass.
A new method for mapping hepatic subsegment: counterstaining identification technique.
Effects of hypothyroidism on bronchial reactivity in non-asthmatic subjects.
Performance and prognosis in patients with lung cancer. The Edinburgh Lung Cancer Group.
Hemibody irradiation in advanced prostatic carcinoma.
Management of spinal cord compression secondary to metastatic prostatic carcinoma.
Treatment of metastatic prostate cancer of the spine.
Partial and total penectomy for cancer.
Imaging of patients with stage D prostatic carcinoma.
Initial results with slightly modified Kock pouch.
Carcinoma of female urethra. Manitoba experience: 1958-1987.
Association of germ cell tumors and Hodgkin's disease.
Coexistence of testicular carcinoma and hairy cell leukemia.
Bilateral renal cell carcinoma with metastasis to thyroid.
Intravesical bacillus Calmette-Guerin for patients with high-risk superficial bladder cancer.
Percutaneous urinary diversion in patients with hormone-refractory prostate cancer.
Prognostic factors and value of adjunctive nephrectomy in patients with stage IV renal cell carcinoma.
Cytologic criteria to distinguish hepatocellular carcinoma from nonneoplastic liver.
Cytologic identification of clinically occult proliferative breast disease in women with a family history of breast cancer.
Metastatic small cell tumor of bone with 'true' rosettes and glial fibrillary acidic protein positivity.
Primary hepatic carcinoid tumor. An electron microscopic and immunohistochemical study.
Papillary carcinoma of the thyroid with mucoepidermoid features.
Surface and cytoplasmic expression of CD45 antigen isoforms in normal and malignant myeloid cell differentiation.
A6--a new 45RO monoclonal antibody for immunostaining of paraffin-embedded tissues.
Use of a probe to repeat sequence of the Y chromosome for detection of host cells in peripheral blood of bone marrow transplant recipients.
Granulocytic sarcoma presenting as an epidural mass with acute paraparesis in an aleukemic patient.
Secretin provocation test in the diagnosis of Zollinger-Ellison syndrome.
DNA flow cytometry of colorectal carcinoma: correlation of DNA stemlines with other prognostic indices.
Magnetic resonance imaging of small hepatocellular carcinoma.
Intrahepatic lymphatics opacified during hepatic arteriography in a patient with hepatocellular carcinoma.
Inflammatory pseudotumor of the liver associated with acute myelomonocytic leukemia.
Endosalpingosis as a cause of chronic pelvic pain.
Endodermal sinus tumor of the ovary during pregnancy: a case report.
Analysis of antigen expression at multiple tumor sites in epithelial ovarian cancer.
Ovarian neoplasms and the risk of adnexal torsion.
Laparoscopic pelvic lymphadenectomy in the staging of early carcinoma of the cervix.
The increased frequency of cervical dysplasia-neoplasia in women infected with the human immunodeficiency virus is related to the degree of immunosuppression.
The value of squamous cell carcinoma antigen in patients with locally advanced cervical cancer undergoing neoadjuvant chemotherapy.
Clinical implications of screening for cervical cancer under Medicare. The natural history of cervical cancer in the elderly: what do we know? What do we need to know?
Epidermal growth factor receptor expression in normal ovarian epithelium and ovarian cancer. I. Correlation of receptor expression with prognostic factors in patients with ovarian cancer.
Mucogenic secondary open-angle glaucoma in diffuse epithelial ingrowth treated by block-excision.
Detection of loss of heterozygosity in formalin-fixed paraffin-embedded tumor specimens by the polymerase chain reaction.
Characterization of preneoplastic and neoplastic lesions in the rat pancreas.
Induction of different morphologic features of malignant melanoma and pigmented lesions after transformation of murine melanocytes with bFGF-cDNA and H-ras, myc, neu, and E1a oncogenes.
Marker profile of different phases in the transition of normal human ovarian epithelium to ovarian carcinomas.
Keratin subsets in spindle cell sarcomas. Keratins are widespread but synovial sarcoma contains a distinctive keratin polypeptide pattern and desmoplakins.
Treatment of angiomas with sclerosing injection of hydroxypolyethoxydodecan.
Intraoperative pancreatic fine needle aspiration biopsy. Results in 166 patients.
Skull base malignancy following long-term sinus mucocele and osteomyelitis.
Surgical voice restoration with the Blom-Singer prosthesis following laryngopharyngoesophagectomy and pharyngogastric anastomosis.
Management of subglottic stenosis in the adult.
Selenium in forage crops and cancer mortality in U.S. counties.
Rapid analysis of carcinoembryonic antigen levels in gallbladder bile. Identification of patients at high risk of colorectal liver metastasis
Liver transplantation for hepatoblastoma. The American experience.
Adenocarcinoma in Barrett's esophagus. A clinicopathologic study of 65 cases.
Mastectomy following preoperative chemotherapy. Strict operative criteria control operative morbidity.
A population-based study of functional status and social support networks of elderly patients newly diagnosed with cancer.
The origin of epidermal melanocytes. Implications for the histogenesis of nevi and melanomas.
Recurrent pigmented melanocytic nevus. A benign lesion, not to be mistaken for malignant melanoma.
Pulmonary tumor embolism to alveolar septal capillaries. A prospective study of 12 cases.
Mucocelelike tumor of the breast associated with atypical ductal hyperplasia or mucinous carcinoma. A clinicopathologic study of seven cases.
Secretory carcinoma of the breast.
Intraluminal crystalloids in struma ovarii. Immunohistochemical, DNA flow cytometric, and ultrastructural study.
Steroid cell tumor of the ovary in a child.
Gross cystic disease fluid protein-15 in salivary gland tumors.
The tall cell variant of papillary carcinoma of the thyroid gland. Comparison with the common form of papillary carcinoma by DNA and morphometric analysis.
Squamous cell carcinoma in situ arising in an ovarian mature cystic teratoma. Report of one case with histopathologic, cytogenetic, and flow cytometric DNA content analysis.
Ring neutrophils in plasma cell dyscrasia.
Extramammary Paget's disease of the bronchial epithelium.
Lipomatous hamartoma of the orbit.
Lipomatous hypertrophy of the interatrial septum: an unusual intraoperative finding.
Tenascin expression in hyperproliferative skin diseases.
'High single-dose' European PUVA regimen also causes an excess of non-melanoma skin cancer.
Epidermodysplasia verruciformis-associated papillomavirus infection complicating human immunodeficiency virus disease.
An adult with common acute lymphoblastic leukaemia (C-ALL) presenting with skin infiltration.
The t(1;19)(q23;p13) results in consistent fusion of E2A and PBX1 coding sequences in acute lymphoblastic leukemias.
Monoclonal antibody-purged autologous bone marrow transplantation therapy for multiple myeloma.
Adoptive immunotherapy with high-dose interleukin-2: kinetics of circulating progenitors correlate with interleukin-6, granulocyte colony-stimulating factor level.
Ki-B5: a monoclonal antibody unrelated to CD45 recognizes normal and neoplastic human B cells in routine paraffin sections.
An epitope on the transferrin receptor preferentially exposed during tumor progression in human lymphoma is close to the ligand binding site.
Inactivation of the retinoblastoma gene in human lymphoid neoplasms.
The beta globin 3' enhancer element confers regulated expression on the human gamma globin gene in the human embryonic-fetal erythroleukemia cell line K562.
Detection of residual leukemia after bone marrow transplant for chronic myeloid leukemia: role of polymerase chain reaction in predicting relapse.
Terminal cancer care and patients' preference for place of death: a prospective study.
Upper tract tumours following cystectomy for bladder cancer. Is routine intravenous urography worthwhile?
Transitional cell carcinoma of the upper urinary tract: prognostic variables and post-operative recurrences.
Pattern of urological malignancy in Zambia. A hospital-based histopathological study.
Clinical significance of the "palpable mass" in patients with muscle-infiltrating bladder cancer undergoing cystectomy after pre-operative radiotherapy.
Adjuvant topical chemotherapy versus immunotherapy in primary superficial transitional cell carcinoma of the bladder.
Short-term radiotherapy as palliative treatment in patients with transitional cell bladder cancer.
Indications for the surgical treatment of osteomas of the frontal and ethmoid sinuses.
The reliability of palpation in the assessment of tumours.
Cyclic-AMP binding proteins in the head and neck.
Occupational exposure and head and neck carcinoma.
Nuclear medicine in otolaryngology.
Epidemiology of primary osteogenic sarcoma in the San Francisco Bay Area of California.
Spontaneous necrosis in osteosarcoma.
Solitary fibromatosis of bone. A rare variant of congenital generalized fibromatosis.
Assessment of "squamous cell carcinoma antigen" (SCC) as a marker of epidermoid carcinoma of the anal canal.
Anti-tumor X anti-lymphocyte heteroconjugates augment colon tumor cell lysis in vitro and prevent tumor growth in vivo.
Polyamine levels in healthy and tumor tissues of patients with colon adenocarcinoma.
Crohn's disease and adenocarcinoma of the intestinal tract. Report of four cases.
Isolation and characterization of normal and neoplastic colonic epithelial cell populations.
Ampullary hamartoma: endoscopic diagnosis and treatment.
Prosthetic arthroplasty of the knee after resection of a sarcoma in the proximal end of the tibia. A report of sixteen cases.
A human CD5+ B cell clone that secretes an idiotype-specific high affinity IgM monoclonal antibody.
MHC-restricted recognition of autologous melanoma by tumor-specific cytotoxic T cells. Evidence for restriction by a dominant HLA-A allele.
Cytotoxic T cell clones isolated from ovarian tumor-infiltrating lymphocytes recognize multiple antigenic epitopes on autologous tumor cells.
Evidence for the functional binding in vivo of tumor rejection antigens to antigen-presenting cells in tumor-bearing hosts.
Multiple spinal epidural metastases; an unexpectedly frequent finding.
Touch and surgical division of the anterior quadrant of the spinal cord.
Diagnostic value of anti-neuronal antibodies for paraneoplastic disorders of the nervous system.
Gemistocytic astrocytomas: a reappraisal.
Improved survival with the use of adjuvant chemotherapy in the treatment of medulloblastoma.
Interstitial chemotherapy with drug polymer implants for the treatment of recurrent gliomas.
Characterization of astrocytomas, meningiomas, and pituitary adenomas by phosphorus magnetic resonance spectroscopy.
Tethered cord syndrome from a choristoma of mullerian origin. Case report.
Intradural chordoma of the tentorium cerebelli. Case report.
Hemangiopericytoma of the sciatic nerve. Case report.
A vascular malformation mimicking an intracanalicular acoustic neurilemoma. Case report.
Dose dependency of time of onset of radiation-induced growth hormone deficiency.
Biphasic reduction and concanavalin A binding properties of serum alpha-fetoprotein in preterm and term infants.
Carcinoma of the vulva. Clinicopathologic factors involved in inguinal and pelvic lymph node metastasis.
Human papillomavirus in women with vulvar intraepithelial neoplasia III.
Deep femoral lymphadenectomy with preservation of the fascia lata. Preliminary report on 42 invasive vulvar carcinomas.
Performing cytogenetic studies on ascitic, amniotic and hygroma fluid.
Breast self-examination in relation to the occurrence of advanced breast cancer.
Preoperative chemotherapy (cisplatin and fluorouracil) and radiation therapy in stage III non-small-cell lung cancer: a phase II study of the Lung Cancer Study Group.
Expression of the antimetastatic gene nm23 in human breast cancer: an association with good prognosis.
Pathologic fracture through a solitary enchondroma of the radial diaphysis: case report.
Microscopic pulmonary tumor embolism causing subacute cor pulmonale: a difficult antemortem diagnosis [published erratum appears in Mayo Clin Proc 1991 Apr;66(4):439]
Oxygen-exacerbated bleomycin pulmonary toxicity
Progressive coma after the transsphenoidal decompression of a pituitary adenoma with marked suprasellar extension: report of two cases.
Ectopic retinoblastoma within the 3rd ventricle: case report.
Long-term follow-up of patients with recurrent malignant gliomas treated with adjuvant adoptive immunotherapy.
Immunohistochemical study of erythropoietin in cerebellar hemangioblastomas associated with secondary polycythemia.
Disposition of cerebral metastases from malignant melanoma: implications for radiosurgery
The transoral approach for the management of intradural lesions at the craniovertebral junction: review of 7 cases.
Improved access to lesions of the central skull base by mobilization of the zygoma: experience with 54 cases.
Submandibular cystic hygroma resembling a plunging ranula in a neonate. Review and report of a case.
HIV infection: clinical features and treatment of thirty-three homosexual men with Kaposi's sarcoma.
Effect of antileukemia chemotherapy on marrow, blood, and oral granulocyte counts.
Melanocytic hyperplasia of the oral mucosa.
Ectopic thyroid tissue in the submandibular region.
Orofacial metastasis of pulmonary giant cell carcinoma.
Blue rubber bleb nevus syndrome with oral hemangiomas.
Early diagnosis of breast cancer. Universal screening is essential.
Nipple discharge in women. Is it cause for concern?
CT and MR imaging in staging non-small cell bronchogenic carcinoma: report of the Radiologic Diagnostic Oncology Group.
Primary CT diagnosis of abdominal masses in a PACS environment
Zollinger-Ellison syndrome: prospective assessment of abdominal US in the localization of gastrinomas.
Oral magnetic particles in MR imaging of the abdomen and pelvis.
Capsular transgression of prostatic carcinoma: evaluation with transrectal US with pathologic correlation.
Prostate cancer: local staging with endorectal surface coil MR imaging.
Combined gadolinium-enhanced and fat-saturation MR imaging of renal masses.
Epithelial tumors of the ovary: CT findings and correlation with US.
Lesions that manifest as medial cheek and nasolabial fold masses.
Intraoperative I-125 seed implantation for extensive recurrent head and neck carcinomas.
Carcinoma of the head of the pancreas.
The value of symptom directed evaluation in the surveillance for recurrence of carcinoma of the breast.
Trends in thirty years of vaginal hysterectomy.
Axillary lymphadenectomy for intraductal carcinoma of the breast.
An analysis of the results of mammographically guided biopsies of the breast.
Modified technique of Pringle's maneuver in resection of the liver.
Iron and the liver.
Expression of beta 1 integrins in normal human keratinocytes.
Using a state cancer registry to increase screening behaviors of sisters and daughters of breast cancer patients.
Subscapular elastofibroma in a young pitcher. A case report.
The glucose transporter and blood-brain barrier of human brain tumors.
Effects of treatment on long-term survivors with malignant astrocytomas.
Chemotherapy for medulloblastoma/primitive neuroectodermal tumors of the posterior fossa.
General assay for phosphoproteins in cerebrospinal fluid: a candidate marker for paraneoplastic cerebellar degeneration.
Comparative in vitro activities of newer quinolones against Pseudomonas species and Xanthomonas maltophilia isolated from patients with cancer.
Therapeutic outcome of patients suffering from malignant melanomas of the conjunctiva.
Malignant fibrous histiocytoma of the conjunctiva.
Increased lysis of patient CD10-positive leukemic cells by T cells coated with anti-CD3 Fab' antibody cross-linked to anti-CD10 Fab' antibody.
Philadelphia chromosome and monosomy 7 in childhood acute lymphoblastic leukemia: a Pediatric Oncology Group study.
Preliminary studies for an immunotherapeutic approach to the treatment of human myeloma using chimeric anti-CD38 antibody.
NB4, a maturation inducible cell line with t(15;17) marker isolated from a human acute promyelocytic leukemia (M3).
Interphase cytogenetic analysis detects minimal residual disease in a case of acute lymphoblastic leukemia and resolves the question of origin of relapse after allogeneic bone marrow transplantation.
Selective hypersensitivity to granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor by juvenile chronic myeloid leukemia hematopoietic progenitors.
Expression of intercellular adhesion molecule-1 (CD54) on hematopoietic progenitors.
Synergistic effects of nerve growth factor and granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor on human basophilic cell differentiation.
Tumor necrosis factor regulates the expression of granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor and interleukin-3 receptors on human acute myeloid leukemia cells.
Genetics of common diseases of adulthood. Implications for prenatal counseling and diagnosis.
Pneumocystis carinii pneumonia complicating multiple myeloma.
Left atrial bacterial mural endocarditis.
Central neurogenic hyperventilation in invasive laryngeal carcinoma.
Ampullary tumor caused by metastatic renal cell carcinoma.
Expression of laminin and its receptor LBP-32 in human and rat hepatoma cells.
Differences in glycolytic capacity and hypoxia tolerance between hepatoma cells and hepatocytes.
Cyclosporine enhances the growth of carcinogen-induced enzyme-altered foci in rat liver.
Regulation of insulin-like growth factor II gene expression by hepatitis B virus in hepatocellular carcinoma.
Hepatitis B virus integration in hepatitis B virus-related hepatocellular carcinoma in childhood.
Incidence of hairy cell leukemia, mycosis fungoides, and chronic lymphocytic leukemia in first known HTLV-II-endemic population.
Changes in plasma high density lipoprotein cholesterol and phospholipid in acute viral hepatitis and cholestatic jaundice.
Serum erythropoietin levels in the anaemia of chronic disorders.
High cardiac output as a paraneoplastic syndrome.
The vascularized fibula graft in mandibular reconstruction.
Fine-needle aspiration biopsy of head and neck lesions.
Nasopalatine duct cyst: an analysis of 334 cases.
Synergism of herpes simplex virus and tobacco-specific N'-nitrosamines in cell transformation.
Immunohistochemical demonstration of keratin in ameloblastoma as an indication of tumor differentiation.
Liposarcoma arising in the cheek: report of a case and review of the literature.
A cohort study of fat intake and risk of breast cancer.
Genetic analysis as an aid in diagnosis for patients with midline carcinomas of uncertain histologies
Disseminated human malignant melanoma in congenitally immune-deficient (bg/nu/xid) mice.
A hypothesis: nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs reduce the incidence of large-bowel cancer.
Obesity and colorectal adenomatous polyps.
Rising incidence of adenocarcinoma of the esophagus and gastric cardia
Activated protooncogenes in human lung tumors from smokers.
Influence of chromosomal integration on glucocorticoid-regulated transcription of growth-stimulating papillomavirus genes E6 and E7 in cervical carcinoma cells.
Human catechol-O-methyltransferase: cloning and expression of the membrane-associated form.
Stimulation of cAMP and phosphomonoester production by melanotropin in melanoma cells: 31P NMR studies.
Mononuclear phagocytes: a major population of effector cells responsible for rejection of allografted tumor cells in mice.
Recombinant Epstein-Barr virus with small RNA (EBER) genes deleted transforms lymphocytes and replicates in vitro.
Leukemia initiated by hemopoietic stem cells expressing the v-abl oncogene.
Tumoral thrombosis of cerebral venous sinuses: preoperative diagnosis using magnetic resonance phase imaging.
Angiotropic intravascular large-cell lymphoma (malignant angioendotheliomatosis): report of a case and review of the literature.
Intracranial chordoma in a preadolescent. Case report.
Solitary, isolated metastasis from Ewing's sarcoma to the brain: case report.
Treatment of leptomeningeal carcinomatosis with continuous intraventricular infusion of recombinant interleukin-2.
Relationship of transfusion and infectious complications after gastric carcinoma operations.
Immunochemical studies on the differential binding properties of two monoclonal antibodies reacting with Tn red cells.
Medullary thyroid cancer. An immunohistochemical and humoral study using six separate antigens
Papillary carcinoma of thyroid with exuberant nodular fasciitis-like stroma. Report of three cases.
Small cell carcinomas of the large intestine.
The use of monoclonal antibody 44-3A6 in cell blocks in the diagnosis of lung carcinoma, carcinomas metastatic to lung and pleura, and pleural malignant mesothelioma.
Granulomatous prostatitis and poorly differentiated prostate carcinoma. Their distinction with the use of immunohistochemical methods.
Automated immunohistochemical estrogen receptor in fixed embedded breast carcinomas.
Ovarian myxoma. A study of two cases with long-term follow-up.
Gene rearrangements in the diagnosis of lymphoma/leukemia. Guidelines for use based on a multiinstitutional study.
Bone marrow findings after treatment with recombinant human interleukin-3.
Flow cytometric analysis of terminal deoxynucleotidyl transferase.
Renal function after tumor enucleation in a solitary kidney.
Local reactions to radioiodine in the treatment of thyroid cancer.
Efficacy of fludarabine, a new adenine nucleoside analogue, in patients with prolymphocytic leukemia and the prolymphocytoid variant of chronic lymphocytic leukemia.
Two cases of adult T-cell leukemia associated with acute pancreatitis due to hypercalcemia.
Suddenly symptomatic brain tumors at altitude.
Melanoma in pregnancy.
Surgical staging of cervical cancer.
Surgery or radiation for early cervical cancer.
The management of malignant bone tumors in children and adolescents.
Dexamethasone-nonsuppressible cortisol in two cases with aldosterone-producing adenoma.
Preliminary characterization of growth factors secreted by human pituitary tumors.
Endothelial markers in malignant vascular tumours of the liver: superiority of QB-END/10 over von Willebrand factor and Ulex europaeus agglutinin 1.
Interphase cytogenetics using biotin and digoxigenin labelled probes: III. Increased sensitivity and flexibility for detecting HPV in cervical biopsy specimens and cell lines.
Chromosomes in childhood acute lymphoblastic leukaemia: karyotypic patterns in disease subtypes.
Increased serum beta 2-microglobulin concentrations in hyperthyroid states.
Mechanical ventilation in medical and neurological diseases: 11 years of experience.
Gastric lymphoma causing granulocytopenia and cold intolerance, with recovery after treatment.
Familial hypobetalipoproteinaemia complicated by cerebellar ataxia and steatocystoma multiplex.
Lymphoma presenting as a popliteal mass in a patient with rheumatoid arthritis.
The role of adjuvant chemotherapy following cystectomy for invasive bladder cancer: a prospective comparative trial.
Spontaneous perinephric hemorrhage: imaging and management.
Partial nephrectomy for renal cell carcinoma: indications, results and implications.
A seromuscular stripping method to create a nipple valve without metal stapling for continent urinary reservoir.
Sensitivity of urinary quantitative immunocytology with monoclonal antibody 486 P3/12 in 241 unselected patients with bladder carcinoma.
Oral or intravesical bacillus Calmette-Guerin immunoprophylaxis in bladder carcinoma.
Ileocolic neobladder post-cystectomy: continence and potency.
Impact of anatomical radical prostatectomy on urinary continence.
Correlation of ultrasound guided and digitally directed transrectal biopsies of palpable prostatic abnormalities.
Radical prostatectomy and adjuvant radioactive gold seed placement: results of treatment at 5 and 10 years for clinical stages A2, B1 and B2 cancer of the prostate.
Preoperative endoscopic diagnosis of fibroepithelial polyp of the renal pelvis: a case report and review of the literature.
Nonspecific magnetic resonance appearance of renal oncocytomas: report of 3 cases and review of the literature.
Surgical management of renal cell carcinoma with extensive intracaval involvement using a venous bypass system suitable for rapid conversion to total cardiopulmonary bypass.
Assessment of the critical level of androgen for growth response of transplantable human prostatic carcinoma (PC-82) in nude mice.
Experimental intravesical therapy for superficial transitional cell carcinoma in a rat bladder tumor model.
The effects of interleukin-6 on tumor-infiltrating lymphocytes derived from human renal cell cancer.
Bladder perforation resulting from the use of the neodymium:YAG laser.
Generation of "soft x-rays" by using the free electron laser as a proposed means of diagnosing and treating breast cancer.
Endometrial ablation for the treatment of menorrhagia: a comparison of patients with normal, enlarged, and fibroid uteri.
Effective surgical adjuvant therapy for high-risk rectal carcinoma
Clinical importance of myeloid-antigen expression in acute lymphoblastic leukemia of childhood.
Late cardiac effects of doxorubicin therapy for acute lymphoblastic leukemia in childhood
Chemotherapy of brain metastases from lung carcinoma: a controlled randomized study.
Interstitial irradiation and hyperthermia for the treatment of recurrent malignant brain tumors.
Expression of platelet-derived growth factors, transforming growth factors, and the ros gene in a variety of primary human brain tumors.
Iatrogenic saphenous neuralgia: successful therapy with neuroma resection.
Spinal glioblastomas: report of seven cases and review of the literature.
Spinal cord compression from a thoracic paraganglioma: case report.
Reversible hearing loss from cerebellopontine angle tumors.
Malignant melanoma of the oral cavity. A case report.
Oral cancer: a survey of 566 cases from the University of Connecticut Oral Pathology Biopsy Service, 1975-1986.
Pathologic characteristics of human T-cell lymphotropic virus (HTLV)-related extranodal orofacial lymphomas.
Adult T-cell leukemia/lymphoma of the tongue.
Peripheral ameloblastoma with clear cell differentiation.
Ectatic blood vessels in port-wine stains lack innervation: possible role in pathogenesis.
Composite reconstruction for chest wall and scalp using multiple ribs-latissimus dorsi osteomyocutaneous flaps as pedicled and free flaps.
Cerebral venous thrombosis: new causes for an old syndrome?
Incidence, causes and mechanism of hypercalcaemia in a hospital population in Hong Kong.
Radiographic manifestations of anomalies of the brain.
Radiographic manifestations of congenital anomalies affecting the airway.
Bronchopulmonary and neurenteric forms of foregut anomalies. Imaging for diagnosis and management.
Immunohistochemical characterization of microvascular endothelial cells in primary B cell lymphoma of the gastrointestinal tract.
The role of the physician in the late diagnosis of primary malignant tumors of the small intestine.
The effects of vitamin K on the generation of des-gamma-carboxy prothrombin (PIVKA-II) in patients with hepatocellular carcinoma.
Perforation and tumor formation of the intestine in primary amyloidosis.
A community study of delay in presenting with signs of melanoma to medical practitioners.
Nasal midline masses in infants and children. Dermoids, encephaloceles, and gliomas.
Somatostatin and analogues in the treatment of cancer. A review
The potential role of postoperative hepatic artery chemotherapy in patients with high-risk hepatomas.
Human liver regeneration after major hepatectomy. A study of liver volume by computed tomography.
Surgical management of 552 carcinomas of the extrahepatic bile ducts (gallbladder and periampullary tumors excluded). Results of the French Surgical Association Survey.
Defining the role of subtotal colectomy in the treatment of carcinoma of the colon.
Bronchoalveolar carcinoma: factors affecting survival.
Primary cysts and tumors of the mediastinum.
Role of percutaneous fine-needle aspiration biopsy in suspected intrathoracic malignancy.
Carcinosarcoma of the lung with hypertrophic pulmonary osteoarthropathy.
Surgical management of carcinoid heart disease
Adenocarcinoma arising in a foregut cyst of the mediastinum.
Inflammatory breast cancer.
Enhanced antitumor reactivity of tumor-sensitized T cells by interferon alfa.
Prognostic significance of carcinoembryonic antigen in colorectal carcinoma. Serum levels before and after resection and before recurrence.
Technique of photodynamic therapy for disseminated intraperitoneal malignant neoplasms. Phase I study.
Prognostic factors in primary retroperitoneal soft-tissue sarcomas.
Mechanism of surgical stress impairment of human perioperative natural killer cell cytotoxicity.
Radioimmunoguided surgery using iodine 125 B72.3 in patients with colorectal cancer.
Radical resection for carcinoma of the ampulla of Vater.
Effect of splenectomy on morbidity and survival following curative gastrectomy for carcinoma.
The use of a biodegradable mesh to prevent radiation-associated small-bowel injury.
5-year results of cisplatin and fluorouracil infusion in head and neck cancer.
Circulating C1q-binding macromolecules and their relationship to radiographic characteristics of laryngeal cancer.
Radiotherapy. The mainstay in the treatment of early glottic carcinoma.
Primary sarcomas of the major salivary glands.
Effective destruction of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 3 at 100 degrees C using the Semm cold coagulator: 14 years experience
A randomized control trial of two cervical spatulas
Vaginal epithelial abnormalities in patients with CIN: clinical and pathological features and management.
Treatment of anovulation due to polycystic ovarian syndrome by laparoscopic ovarian electrocautery.
The immunoperoxidase localization of tumour markers in ovarian cancer: the value of CEA, EMA, cytokeratin and DD9.
Hormone replacement therapy and survival after surgery for ovarian cancer
Misinterpretation of the upper parathyroid adenoma on thallium-201/technetium-99m subtraction scintigraphy.
Ultrasound in the investigation of the right iliac fossa mass.
Carcinoma of the breast: measurement and the management of treatment. I. The value of the data.
Selective uptake of toxic nucleoside (125IUdR) by resistant cancer.
Tissue dose estimates following the selective uptake of 125IUdR and other radiolabelled thymidine precursors in resistant tumours.
Importance of the omentum in the development of intra-abdominal metastases.
Evaluation of the results of oesophagectomy for oesophageal cancer.
Prolonged intermittent clamping of the portal triad during hepatectomy.
Detection of colorectal liver metastases using intraoperative ultrasonography.
Proliferation characteristics of human colorectal carcinomas measured in vivo.
Primary papillary carcinoma of a thyroglossal duct cyst: report of a case and literature review.
Solitary thyroid nodule: a prospective evaluation of nuclear scanning and ultrasonography.
DNA aneuploidy in follicular thyroid neoplasia.
Further evaluation of radical surgery following radiotherapy for advanced parotid carcinoma.
Axial myoclonus of propriospinal origin.
Hemodialysis for acute renal failure in patients with hematologic malignancies.
The value of radioimmunoguided surgery in first and second look laparotomy for colorectal cancer.
Nuclear shape as a prognostic discriminant in colorectal carcinoma.
Primary de novo adenocarcinoma of the colon measuring 8 mm in diameter with lymph node metastases. Report of a case.
Dysplasia and DNA aneuploidy in a pelvic pouch. Report of a case.
Development and characterization of a new, highly specific antibody to the human chorionic gonadotropin-beta fragment.
Calcium transport by plasma membranes from a glucose-responsive rat insulinoma.
Transcriptional regulation of ferritin messenger ribonucleic acid levels by insulin in cultured rat glioma cells.
Regulation of insulin, epidermal growth factor, and transforming growth factor-alpha levels by growth factor-degrading enzymes.
Effects of hepatitis B virus, alcohol drinking, cigarette smoking and familial tendency on hepatocellular carcinoma.
Transcatheter oily chemoembolization in the management of advanced hepatocellular carcinoma in cirrhosis: results of a Western comparative study in 60 patients.
Usefulness of pulsed Doppler ultrasound in detection of angiographically evident recurrence of hepatocellular carcinoma after arterial embolization treatment.
Mucin production by human colonic carcinoma cells correlates with their metastatic potential in animal models of colon cancer metastasis.
Acquired cisplatin resistance in human ovarian cancer cells is associated with enhanced repair of cisplatin-DNA lesions and reduced drug accumulation.
Evidence that tumor necrosis factor plays a pathogenetic role in the paraneoplastic syndromes of cachexia, hypercalcemia, and leukocytosis in a human tumor in nude mice.
Biology of basal cell carcinoma (Part I).
The reliability of frozen sections in the evaluation of surgical margins for melanoma.
Epidermotropic eccrine porocarcinoma.
Lobulated intradermal nevus. Report of three cases.
Late metastases of cutaneous melanoma: case report and literature review.
Multiple granular cell tumors associated with giant speckled lentiginous nevus and nevus flammeus in a child.
Xeroderma pigmentosum lesions related to ultraviolet transmittance by clothes.
Abnormal epidermal changes after argon laser treatment.
Unusual presentation of squamous cell carcinoma of the middle ear and mastoid.
Radiation-induced cranial nerve palsy: hypoglossal nerve and vocal cord palsies.
Massive metastasis from squamous carcinoma of the tonsil.
Paraneoplastic limbic encephalitis: clinico-pathological correlations.
The history of nitrite in human nutrition: a contribution from German cookery books.
Systematic computer-aided search of optimal staging system for colorectal cancer.
A cost-minimization study of cancer patients requiring a narcotic infusion in hospital and at home.
Usefulness of epidurally evoked cortical potential monitoring during cervicomedullary glioma surgery.
The influence of drug interval on the effect of methotrexate and fluorouracil in the treatment of advanced colorectal cancer
Clonogenic growth in vitro: an independent biologic prognostic factor in ovarian carcinoma
Second-line platinum therapy in patients with ovarian cancer previously treated with cisplatin.
Human growth hormone and insulin-like growth factor-1 enhance the proliferation of human leukemic blasts.
Abnormal growth patterns and adult short stature in 115 long-term survivors of childhood leukemia.
A phase I clinical trial of 2-chlorodeoxyadenosine in pediatric patients with acute leukemia.
Treatment of relapsed non-Hodgkin's lymphomas with dexamethasone, high-dose cytarabine, and cisplatin before marrow transplantation.
Second primary cancer following Hodgkin's disease: updated results of an Italian multicentric study.
The pattern of intrathoracic Hodgkin's disease assessed by computed tomography.
Multiple myeloma: VMCP/VBAP alternating combination chemotherapy is not superior to melphalan and prednisone even in high-risk patients.
Concurrent cisplatin, infusional fluorouracil, and conventionally fractionated radiation therapy in head and neck cancer: dose-limiting mucosal toxicity.
Phase II trial of piritrexim in metastatic melanoma using intermittent, low-dose administration.
Occurrence of hypercalcemia and leukocytosis with cachexia in a human squamous cell carcinoma of the maxilla in athymic nude mice: a novel experimental model of three concomitant paraneoplastic syndromes.
A phase I clinical, plasma, and cellular pharmacology study of gemcitabine.
Bone metastases: pathophysiology and management policy.
Interleukin-2: prospects for lymphocyte-mediated destruction of pediatric malignancies.
Endometrial cancer: biochemical and clinical correlates.
Radiotherapy alone versus combined chemotherapy and radiotherapy in nonresectable non-small-cell lung cancer: first analysis of a randomized trial in 353 patients.
Alternating hepatic intra-arterial floxuridine and fluorouracil: a less toxic regimen for treatment of liver metastases from colorectal cancer.
Cancer registry problems in classifying invasive bladder cancer.
Preferential localization of human adherent lymphokine-activated killer cells in tumor microcirculation.
Mortality among workers at Oak Ridge National Laboratory. Evidence of radiation effects in follow-up through 1984 [published erratum appears in JAMA 1991 Aug 7;266(5):657]
Cancer in populations living near nuclear facilities. A survey of mortality nationwide and incidence in two states.
Esophageal ultrasound and the preoperative staging of carcinoma of the esophagus.
Use of immunoglobulin gene rearrangements to show clonal lymphoproliferation in hyper-reactive malarial splenomegaly
Muscle fibre type and habitual snoring.
Lack of effect of pregnancy on outcome of melanoma. For The World Health Organisation Melanoma Programme
Prognostic factors in craniofacial surgery.
The internal oblique-iliac crest free flap in composite defects of the oral cavity involving bone, skin, and mucosa.
Detection of Epstein-Barr virus DNA in formalin-fixed paraffin-embedded tissue of nasopharyngeal carcinoma using polymerase chain reaction and in situ hybridization.
Paraneoplastic vasculitic neuropathy: a treatable neuropathy.
Activation of Epstein-Barr virus latent genes protects human B cells from death by apoptosis.
Location of port-wine stains and the likelihood of ophthalmic and/or central nervous system complications.
The nursing role in limb salvage surgery.
What to do when an x-ray film suggests lung cancer.
Why patients delay seeking care for cancer symptoms. What you can do about it.
Effects of epidermal growth factor and analogues of luteinizing hormone-releasing hormone and somatostatin on phosphorylation and dephosphorylation of tyrosine residues of specific protein substrates in various tumors.
Characteristics of erythroleukemia cells selected for vincristine resistance that have accelerated inducer-mediated differentiation.
Effects of site-directed mutagenesis at residues cysteine-31 and cysteine-184 on lecithin-cholesterol acyltransferase activity.
Transfection of C6 glioma cells with connexin 43 cDNA: analysis of expression, intercellular coupling, and cell proliferation.
Translocation breakpoint of acute promyelocytic leukemia lies within the retinoic acid receptor alpha locus.
Differentiation of HL-60 leukemia by type I regulatory subunit antisense oligodeoxynucleotide of cAMP-dependent protein kinase.
Computed tomography and the TNM classification of lung cancer.
Titrated intravenous barbiturates in the control of symptoms in patients with terminal cancer.
Scalp pilomatrix carcinoma as an extra-axial mass.
Benign cystic teratoma manifested as an umbilical hernia.
Stomatococcus mucilaginosus catheter-related infection in an adolescent with osteosarcoma.
Management of soft tissue sarcomas of the extremities.
Possible transmission of serum hepatitis in liver surgery with the ultrasonic dissector.
Effects of hypovolemia and transfusion on tumor growth in MCA-tumor-bearing rats.
Cystic dilatation of the cystic duct: a new type of biliary cyst.
Malignant melanoma of the biliary tract: a case report.
Inflammatory pseudotumor of the liver.
Congenital cyst of common bile duct: an unusual cause of obstructive jaundice.
Lymphoma of the gastric stump: report of a case.
Gleason's histologic grading as clinical prognostic marker in patients with advanced prostatic carcinoma.
Simultaneous presentation of adenocarcinoma of prostate and transitional cell carcinoma of bladder.
Results of surgical treatment of kidney cancer with solitary metastasis to contralateral adrenal.
Management of symptomatic lymphocele via percutaneous drainage and sclerotherapy with tetracycline.
Renal cell metastases versus liver hemangioma.
Squamous cell carcinoma of prostate.
Giant sclerosing leiomyoma of bladder presenting as chronic renal failure.
Ureteral stump carcinoma incidentally found at cystectomy for bladder cancer.
Tumor-targeted chemotherapy with lipid contrast medium and macromolecular anticancer drug (SMANCS) for renal cell carcinoma.
Hypercalcemia in malignancy.
Giant cell tumor of bone.
Lack of effect of chronic administration of oral beta-carotene on serum cholesterol and triglyceride concentrations.
Beta-carotene's effects on serum lipoproteins and immunologic indices in humans.
Hypercalcemia with excess serum 1,25 dihydroxyvitamin D in lymphomatoid granulomatosis/angiocentric lymphoma.
Pericardial metastasis from testicular seminoma: appearance and disappearance by echocardiography.
In vivo phosphorus 31 magnetic resonance spectroscopy of human uveal melanomas and other intraocular tumors.
Incidence of prominent corneal nerves in multiple endocrine neoplasia type 2A.
Histopathologic evidence of fibrovascular ingrowth four weeks after placement of the hydroxyapatite orbital implant.
Ovarian granulosa-stromal cell tumors are characterized by trisomy 12.
Development of intrapancreatic transplantable model of pancreatic duct adenocarcinoma in Syrian golden hamsters.
Evaluation of hepatocellular carcinoma aggressiveness by a panel of extracellular matrix antigens.
Epithelial cells immortalized by human papillomaviruses have premalignant characteristics in organotypic culture.
Expression of VLA-alpha 2, VLA-alpha 6, and VLA-beta 1 chains in normal mucosa and adenomas of the colon, and in colon carcinomas and their liver metastases.
Basal cell-specific and hyperproliferation-related keratins in human breast cancer.
Elective diagnostic laparoscopy.
Interferon-alpha produces sustained cytogenetic responses in chronic myelogenous leukemia. Philadelphia chromosome-positive patients.
In vitro activity of LY264826, a new glycopeptide antibiotic, against gram-positive bacteria isolated from patients with cancer.
Primary rhabdomyosarcoma of the ileum in an adult.
Papillary endothelial hyperplasia in the thyroid following fine-needle aspiration.
Hemangiopericytoma of the sternum.
The pathology of heart allograft rejection.
The role of the immunogenetics laboratory in marrow transplantation.
Clinical analyses and short-term prognoses of neonates with subependymal cysts.
Human interleukin-3 mRNA accumulation is controlled at both the transcriptional and posttranscriptional level.
1,25-Dihydroxyvitamin D3 receptor RNA: expression in hematopoietic cells.
Induction of protein kinase C mRNA in cultured lymphoblastoid T cells by iron-transferrin but not by soluble iron.
Cytogenetic studies in untreated Hodgkin's disease.
Ultrastructural demonstration of peroxidase expression in acute unclassified leukemias: correlation to immunophenotype and treatment outcome.
Calcium ionophore, A23187, induces commitment to differentiation but inhibits the subsequent expression of erythroid genes in murine erythroleukemia cells.
Rationale for different chemotherapeutic and radiation therapy strategies in cancer management.
Stage IV neuroblastoma in infants. Long-term survival.
Ductal carcinoma in situ with microinvasion. A curable entity using surgery alone without need for adjuvant therapy.
Intraoperative electron beam radiation therapy for recurrent locally advanced rectal or rectosigmoid carcinoma.
A pilot study of suramin in the treatment of metastatic renal cell carcinoma.
High-dose cisplatin plus dacarbazine in the treatment of metastatic melanoma.
The use of probenecid as a chemoprotector against cisplatin nephrotoxicity.
Prognostic factors for survival of patients with advanced urothelial tumors treated with methotrexate, vinblastine, doxorubicin, and cisplatin chemotherapy.
Results of radiation therapy in carcinoma of the base of the tongue. The Curie Institute experience with about 166 cases.
18F-2-deoxy-2-fluoro-D-glucose uptake into human tumor xenografts. Feasibility studies for cancer imaging with positron-emission tomography.
Detection of somatic DNA alterations in ovarian cancer by DNA fingerprint analysis.
Stimulation of tumor cell growth by vasoactive intestinal peptide.
CD34 antigen expression in children with Philadelphia chromosome-positive acute lymphoblastic leukemia.
Tissue distribution of 2-3 and 2-6 sialyl Lewis A antigens and significance of the ratio of two antigens for the differential diagnosis of malignant and benign disorders of the digestive tract.
Establishment and characterization of unique cell lines (KCC-1a and KCC-1b) from endometrial adenocarcinoma with clear cell carcinoma presenting unusual karyotypes and estrogen secretion.
Possible etiologic heterogeneity of vulvar intraepithelial neoplasia. A correlation of pathologic characteristics with human papillomavirus detection by in situ hybridization and polymerase chain reaction.
Immunohistologic localization of alpha, mu, and pi class glutathione S-transferases in human tissues.
Lymph nodes in incipient adult T-cell leukemia-lymphoma with Hodgkin's disease-like histologic features.
Correlation between bromodeoxyuridine-labeling indices and patient prognosis in cerebral astrocytic tumors of adults.
Association between DNA ploidy pattern and cellular atypia in colorectal carcinomas. A new clinical application of DNA flow cytometric study?
The relationship of ABH(O) blood group antigen expression in intraepithelial dysplastic lesions to clinicopathologic properties of associated transitional cell carcinoma of the bladder.
The relationship of nasopharyngeal carcinomas and second independent malignancies based on the Radiation Therapy Oncology Group experience.
Thermography as a predictor of prognosis in cancer of the breast.
Depression of serum melatonin in patients with primary breast cancer is not due to an increased peripheral metabolism.
Meningeal carcinomatosis in breast cancer. Prognostic factors and influence of treatment.
Clinical observation on the association of gallstones and colorectal cancer.
Sunlight and dysplastic nevus risk. Results of a clinic-based case-control study.
Serum ferritin and stomach cancer risk among a Japanese population.
The human costs of cancer and the response of the National Cancer Program.
Changing cancer care in the 1990s and the cost.
Forces of change in the health care system. Implications for cancer care in the 1990s.
Legislative influences on cancer care.
Access to cancer prevention, detection, and treatment.
Adjuvant therapy for node-negative breast cancer. The use of prognostic factors in selecting patients.
The role of chemotherapy for node-negative breast cancer.
Measuring the quality of care for the cancer patient.
Continuity of cancer care.
A provider's view of prevention approaches in a prepaid group practice.
Changing demographics in the United States. Implications for health professionals.
Clinical trials. Access and reimbursement.
Patient perceptions.
Alternative therapies, 1990. An overview.
Facilitating clinical trials. The expanding role of the nurse.
Clinical trials. A family physician's perspective.
An inner city cancer prevention clinic. Design, methods, and early results.
Increasing the cancer screening of the medically underserved in south Florida.
Prevention and changing demographics. The underserved and cancer.
Cessation of treatment in advanced cancer.
Primary prevention of cancer. The case for comprehensive school health education.
Technetium-99m (v) dimercaptosuccinic acid: a clinical and scintigraphic study in an animal tumour model.
Anaplastic carcinoma presenting with cervical lymphadenopathy.
Long-term survival patients with acute and severe renal failure due to multiple myeloma.
The role of interleukin-2 in cancer immunotherapy.
Adenocarcinomas of the colon and rectum in persons under 40 years old. A population-based study.
The presence of human papillomavirus type 16 in squamous cell carcinoma of the proximal finger and reconstruction with a bilobed transposition flap.
Localization of basic fibroblast growth factor mRNA in melanocytic lesions by in situ hybridization.
TGF-alpha is widely expressed in differentiated as well as hyperproliferative skin epithelium.
Adenotin and adenotin-like proteins coexist with adenosine receptors in mammalian tissues.
Clinical, radiographic, and pathological features of symptomatic Rathke's cleft cysts.
Intracranial germ-cell tumors in children.
Stereotactic radiosurgery of meningiomas.
The standardized assessment of argyrophilic nucleolar organizer regions in meningeal tumors.
Lack of neural control and reactivity to vasoactive agents in malignant glioma arteries.
In vivo incorporation of [9,10(-3)H]-palmitate into a rat metastatic brain-tumor model.
Postoperative ectopic craniopharyngioma. Case report.
Primary central nervous system T-cell lymphoma. Case report.
Mesangial cell accessory functions: mediation by intercellular adhesion molecule-1.
Effect of the somatostatin analogue octreotide acetate on hemostasis in humans.
Chromosome studies in 104 patients with polycythemia vera.
Diagnosis of nasopharyngeal carcinoma by means of recombinant Epstein-Barr virus proteins.
Topical calcipotriol treatment in advanced breast cancer [published erratum appears in Lancet 1991 Jun 29;337(8757):1618]
Correlations between therapeutic response of leukaemias and in-vitro drug-sensitivity assay.
Laparoscopic excision of ovarian neoplasms subsequently found to be malignant.
Use of various epithelial tumor markers and a stromal marker in the assessment of cervical carcinoma.
Radical vulvectomy with partial rectal resection and temporary colostomy as primary therapy for selected patients with vulvar carcinoma.
Antigen CA 19-9: presence in mucosa of nondiseased mullerian duct derivatives and marker for differentiation in their carcinomas.
The long-term effectiveness of hysteroscopic treatment of menorrhagia and leiomyomas.
Indwelling epidural catheters for pain control in gynecologic cancer patients.
Chondrosarcoma of the jaws: clinical findings, histopathology, and treatment.
Oral manifestations of HIV infection and their management. I. More common lesions.
Oral manifestations of HIV infection and their management. II. Less common lesions.
Immunoprofile of mucoepidermoid carcinomas of minor salivary glands.
Parotid gland plasmacytoma with crystalline deposits.
Lymph node metastasis in spindle cell carcinoma arising in odontogenic cyst. Report of a case.
Malignant cyst of the lateral aspect of the neck: branchial cleft carcinoma or metastasis?
Common skin lesions of the elderly.
Nonsquamous tumors of the head and neck in the geriatric population.
Reconstructive and rehabilitative aspects of head and neck cancer in the elderly.
Thyroid and parathyroid cancer.
Chest CT combined with artificial pneumothorax: value in determining origin and extent of tumor.
Carcinoma of the cervix: value of MR imaging in detecting parametrial involvement.
Small non-cleaved-cell lymphoma (undifferentiated lymphoma, Burkitt's type) in American adults: results with treatment designed for acute lymphoblastic leukemia.
Systemic mast cell disease associated with primary mediastinal germ cell tumor.
Acute renal failure associated with the use of intraperitoneal carboplatin: a report of two cases and review of the literature.
Epidermal growth factor receptor expression in normal ovarian epithelium and ovarian cancer. II. Relationship between receptor expression and response to epidermal growth factor.
Fetal ovarian cysts: prenatal ultrasonographic detection and postnatal evaluation and treatment.
Restriction fragment length polymorphism analysis to study the genetic origin of complete hydatidiform mole.
Does increased detection account for the rising incidence of breast cancer?
Bone cancer incidence rates in New York State: time trends and fluoridated drinking water.
Black-white differences in cancer prevention knowledge and behavior.
Quality-of-life-adjusted evaluation of adjuvant therapies for operable breast cancer. The International Breast Cancer Study Group
Psychological and behavioral implications of abnormal mammograms.
Molteno implants and operating microscope-induced retinal phototoxicity. A clinicopathologic report.
Embryonal carcinoma of the testis presenting as a left heart mass.
Endothelial leucocyte adhesion molecule-1 (ELAM-1) expression in cutaneous inflammation.
Melanocytic lesions and melanocyte populations in human epidermis.
Prevalence of common and dysplastic naevi in a Swedish population.
Glomus tumours of the skin: an immunohistochemical investigation of the expression of marker proteins.
Photoelectric quantitative evaluation of argon laser treatment of port wine stains.
A case of classical mycosis fungoides associated with human T-cell lymphotropic virus type I.
Risk of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia in women with glomerulonephritis.
Increase in incidence of disease due to diagnostic drift: primary liver cancer in Denmark, 1943-85.
A new phantom for mammography.
Carcinoma of the breast: measurement and the management of treatment. II. The regression of tumours.
Fractionated high dose rate versus low dose rate regimens for intracavitary brachytherapy of the cervix. I. General considerations based on radiobiology.
Fetal choroid plexus cysts: a prospective study and review of the literature.
Is there a place for conservative surgery in the treatment of renal carcinoma?
Rationalisation of follow-up in patients with non-invasive bladder tumours. A preliminary report.
Transferrin receptor activity as a marker in transitional cell carcinoma of the bladder.
Systemic chemotherapy for urothelial cancer in patients with ureteric obstruction.
Urological manifestations of HIV-related disease. A case of AIDS-associated testicular seminoma, Kaposi's sarcoma and possible intracranial lymphoma.
The growing teratoma syndrome.
Selective impairment of memory and visual perception in splenial tumours.
Effectiveness of high-dose MCNU therapy and hematopoietic stem cell autografts treatment of childhood acute leukemia/lymphoma with high-risk features.
A prospective study of magnetic resonance imaging in lymphoma staging.
The contribution of routine follow-up mammography to an early detection of asynchronous contralateral breast cancer.
Integrated magnetic resonance imaging and phosphorus spectroscopy of soft tissue tumors.
Prognosis of node-positive colon cancer.
The development of neutralizing antibodies in a patient receiving subcutaneous recombinant and natural interleukin-2.
Hodgkin's disease in association with human immunodeficiency virus infection. Pathologic and immunologic features.
DNA ploidy in the primary tumor from patients with nonseminomatous testicular germ cell tumors clinical stage I.
A multifaced DNA ploidy analysis to determine ovarian carcinoma aggressiveness.
MIC2 is a specific marker for Ewing's sarcoma and peripheral primitive neuroectodermal tumors. Evidence for a common histogenesis of Ewing's sarcoma and peripheral primitive neuroectodermal tumors from MIC2 expression and specific chromosome aberration.
An unusual organoid tumor. Alveolar soft part sarcoma or paraganglioma?
Meningeal involvement in Bence Jones multiple myeloma.
Prognostic indices for tumor relapse and tumor mortality in follicular thyroid carcinoma.
Relationship between lung asbestos fiber type and concentration and relative risk of mesothelioma. A case-control study.
Flow cytometric DNA index in the prognosis of colorectal cancer.
Clostridial bacteremia in cancer patients. A 12-year experience.
Extramedullary blast crisis in a patient with Philadelphia chromosome-positive chronic myelogenous leukemia in complete cytogenetic remission.
Late relapse with nodular lymphoma after treatment for diffuse non-Hodgkin's lymphoma.
Weight gain with breast cancer adjuvant treatment.
Status of sex steroid hormone receptors in large bowel cancer.
Clear cell adenocarcinoma of the vagina and cervix. A report of the Central Netherlands Registry with emphasis on early detection and prognosis.
Isolated calcaneal metastasis in a patient with endometrial adenocarcinoma.
Attributes and survival patterns of multiple primary cutaneous malignant melanoma.
Second cancers following non-Hodgkin's lymphoma.
Mammography and age: are we targeting the wrong women? A community survey of women and physicians.
Extracolonic malignancies in inflammatory bowel disease.
Cisplatin and 5-fluorouracil for advanced locoregional and metastatic squamous cell carcinoma of the skin.
Treatment of squamous cell carcinoma of the anal canal.
Postoperative radiation therapy for rectal cancer. An interim analysis of a prospective, randomized multicenter trial in The Netherlands.
Extragonadal and poor risk nonseminomatous germ cell tumors. Survival and prognostic features.
Hemiparesis and ischemic changes of the white matter after intrathecal therapy for children with acute lymphocytic leukemia.
Acute tumor lysis syndrome after intrathecal methotrexate administration.
Magnetic resonance imaging of cardiac rhabdomyosarcoma. Quantifying the response to chemotherapy.
Lymphocyte subset distribution after radiation therapy for cancer of the uterine cervix. Possible prognostic implications and correlation with disease course.
Factors affecting recurrence in lumpectomy without irradiation for breast cancer.
Is local recurrence of minor importance for metastases in soft tissue sarcoma?
Bladder cancer. Human leukocyte antigen II, interleukin-6, and interleukin-6 receptor expression determined by the polymerase chain reaction.
Effect of hyperthermia in vitro and in vivo on adenine and pyridine nucleotide pools in human peripheral lymphocytes.
A T-cell neoplasia showing clinicopathologic features of malignant histiocytosis with novel chromosomal abnormalities and N-ras mutation.
Deceptive bizarre stromal cells in polyps and ulcers of the gastrointestinal tract.
Prostatic duct adenocarcinoma. Findings at radical prostatectomy.
Survival of children and adolescents with acute lymphoid leukemia. A study of American Indians and Hispanic and non-Hispanic whites treated in New Mexico (1969 to 1986).
Congenital angiotropic lymphoma (intravascular lymphomatosis) of the T-cell type.
Evaluation of the fine needle aspiration biopsy in the preoperative selection of cold thyroid nodules.
Comparative investigation of c-erbB2/neu expression in head and neck tumors and mammary cancer.
Aspiration biopsy cytology of occult breast lesions by use of the "scouting needle". A prospective study of 261 cases.
Adenoid cystic carcinoma of the esophagus. A clinicopathologic study of three cases.
Primary adenocarcinoma of the urinary bladder. A clinicopathologic analysis of 72 cases.
Clear cell sarcomas and metastatic soft tissue melanomas. A flow cytometric comparison and prognostic implications.
Soluble interleukin-2 receptors in patients with nasopharyngeal carcinoma.
Differentiated thyroid carcinomas in children and adolescents.
Hyperfunctioning metastatic follicular thyroid carcinoma in Pendred's syndrome.
Cerebral metastases from ovarian carcinoma.
Tumor lysis syndrome in a patient with metastatic Merkel cell carcinoma.
Exposure histories in acute nonlymphocytic leukemia patients with a prior preleukemic condition.
Obesity, body fat distribution, and sex hormones in breast cancer patients.
Incidence and survival rates of children and young adults with osteogenic sarcoma.
Presence of identical mitochondrial proteins in unstimulated constitutive steroid-producing R2C rat Leydig tumor and stimulated nonconstitutive steroid-producing MA-10 mouse Leydig tumor cells.
Immunological identification and distribution of parathyroid hormone-like protein polypeptides in normal and malignant tissues.
Inhibition of pyroglutamyl peptidase II synthesis by phorbol ester in the Y-79 retinoblastoma cell.
Role of laparoscopy in the evaluation of patients with suspected hepatic or peritoneal malignancy.
Percutaneous cholangioscopic or transpapillary insertion of self-expanding biliary metal stents.
The potential and limitations of laser photoablation of colorectal adenomas.
Deficient counterregulatory hormone responses during hypoglycemia in a patient with insulinoma.
Prognosis and treatment of advanced squamous cell carcinoma secondary to epidermodysplasia verruciformis: a worldwide analysis of 11 patients.
Pseudocyst of the auricle: successful treatment with intracartilaginous trichloroacetic acid and button bolsters.
"Pinch modification" used to repair a large surgical defect on the scalp: other proposed uses.
Power drills to fenestrate exposed bone to stimulate wound healing.
Disposable attachments in cryosurgery: a useful adjunct in the treatment of HIV-associated neoplasms.
A modified rhombic transposition flap and its application in dermatology.
Proliferating trichilemmal tumor: report of a case and review of the literature.
Invasive squamous cell carcinoma in a patient with epidermodysplasia verruciformis.
Antigen-presenting activity of draining lymph node cells from mice painted with a contact allergen during ultraviolet carcinogenesis.
Differential effects of the stimulation of complement receptors CR1 (CD35) and CR2 (CD21) on cell proliferation and intracellular Ca2+ mobilization of chronic lymphocytic leukemia B cells.
Expression of the human papillomavirus E7 oncogene during cell transformation is sufficient to induce susceptibility to lysis by activated macrophages.
trans-Activation of genes encoding activation-associated human T lymphocyte surface proteins by murine retroviral sequences.
Genetic construction and characterization of a fusion protein consisting of a chimeric F(ab') with specificity for carcinomas and human IL-2.
Enhanced modulation of antibodies coating guinea pig leukemic cells in vitro and in vivo. The role of Fc gamma R expressing cells.
Mechanism of nonresponsiveness to AKR/Gross leukemia virus in AKR.H-2b:Fv-1b mice. An analysis of precursor cytotoxic T lymphocyte frequencies in young versus moderately aged mice.
Technetium-99m-HMPAO brain SPECT in medically intractable temporal lobe epilepsy: a postoperative evaluation.
Thyroglobulin level as a predictive factor of tumoral recurrence in differentiated thyroid cancer.
Thallium-201 scintigraphy in differentiated thyroid cancer: comparison with radioiodine scintigraphy and serum thyroglobulin determinations.
Cellular internalization, transport, and esterification of iodine-125-NP59 by MA-10 Leydig tumor cells.
The central (intraosseous) calcifying odontogenic cyst: an analysis of 215 cases.
Bilateral papillary cystadenoma lymphomatosum of the parotid gland without accumulation of technetium 99m pertechnetate: report of a case and review of the literature.
Comparison of levels of several human microsomal cytochrome P-450 enzymes and epoxide hydrolase in normal and disease states using immunochemical analysis of surgical liver samples.
Different patterns of gene expression in ras-resistant and ras-sensitive cells.
Suppression of mouse mammary tumorigenesis by long-term tamoxifen therapy.
Modulation of N-nitrosomethylurea-induced mammary tumor promotion by dietary fiber and fat.
Socioeconomic factors and cancer incidence among blacks and whites
Increased DNA synthesis and repair-enzyme expression in lymphocytes from patients with chronic lymphocytic leukemia resistant to nitrogen mustards.
Computed tomographic density of metastatic lymph nodes as a treatment-related prognostic factor in advanced head and neck cancer.
Prospective randomized comparison of intravesical with percutaneous bacillus Calmette-Guerin versus intravesical bacillus Calmette-Guerin in superficial bladder cancer.
Systemic preoperative chemotherapy with cisplatin, methotrexate and vinblastine for locally advanced bladder cancer: local tumor response and early followup results.
Prostate specific antigen in patients with clinical stage C prostate cancer: relation to lymph node status and grade.
Prostate specific antigen in hormonally treated stage D2 prostate cancer: is it always an accurate indicator of disease status?
Extramedullary plasmacytoma of the urethra: a case report.
Elevated serum tumor markers in patients with testicular cancer after induction chemotherapy due to a reservoir of markers in cystic differentiated mature teratoma.
Osteosarcoma of the spermatic cord.
Spinal coning after lumbar puncture in prostate cancer with asymptomatic vertebral metastasis: a case report.
A randomized, controlled trial of prophylactic ganciclovir for cytomegalovirus pulmonary infection in recipients of allogeneic bone marrow transplants; The City of Hope-Stanford-Syntex CMV Study Group
Detection of circulating candida enolase by immunoassay in patients with cancer and invasive candidiasis
Numb chin syndrome secondary to Burkitt's cell acute leukemia.
Retinal vasculitis as a complication of rheumatoid arthritis.
Comparative ophthalmologic studies on children and adults with craniopharyngiomas.
Occurrence of uveal melanoma in contact with a chorioretinal cryocoagulation scar.
New insights into the causes of cancer.
Principles of treatment of pediatric solid tumors.
The genetics of retinoblastoma. Relevance to the patient.
Osteosarcoma. Clinical features and evolving surgical and chemotherapeutic strategies.
Rhabdomyosarcoma. From the laboratory to the clinic.
Ewing's sarcoma. Radiotherapy versus surgery for local control.
Tumors of the central nervous system. Improvement in outcome through a multimodality approach.
Treatment of high-risk solid tumors of childhood with intensive therapy and autologous bone marrow transplantation.
Immunotherapy. Neuroblastoma as a model.
The child with recurrent solid tumor.
The survivors of childhood solid tumors.
Incorporation of 12-methoxydodecanoate into the human immunodeficiency virus 1 gag polyprotein precursor inhibits its proteolytic processing and virus production in a chronically infected human lymphoid cell line.
Unexpected, spontaneous conversion of a family of rats, from low-leukemic to high-leukemic inbred line.
Different mRNAs code for dopa decarboxylase in tissues of neuronal and nonneuronal origin.
Reconstitution of high-affinity opioid agonist binding in brain membranes.
A retinoic acid response element is part of a pleiotropic domain in the phosphoenolpyruvate carboxykinase gene.
Transforming function of proto-ras genes depends on heterologous promoters and is enhanced by specific point mutations [published erratum appears in Proc Natl Acad Sci U S A 1991 May 1;88(9):4059]
An enhancer variant of Moloney murine leukemia virus defective in leukemogenesis does not generate detectable mink cell focus-inducing virus in vivo [published erratum appears in Proc Natl Acad Sci U S A 1991 Jun 1;88(11):5066]
Mechanisms associated with the generation of biologically active human immunodeficiency virus type 1 particles from defective proviruses.
Normal and leukemic hematopoietic cells manifest differential sensitivity to inhibitory effects of c-myb antisense oligodeoxynucleotides: an in vitro study relevant to bone marrow purging.
A self-assembling protein kinase C inhibitor.
Murine erythroleukemia cell line GM979 contains factors that can activate silent chromosomal human gamma-globin genes.
Erythropoietin receptors induced by dimethyl sulfoxide exhibit positive cooperativity associated with an amplified biologic response.
Corporate-sponsored breast cancer screening at the work site: results of a statewide program.
Calcifications in breast biopsy specimens: discrepancies in radiologic-pathologic identification.
P-31 spectroscopy study of response of superficial human tumors to therapy.
Supraclavicular lymph node metastases in carcinoma of the esophagus and gastroesophageal junction: assessment with CT, US, and US-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy.
Colorectal carcinoma: preoperative TNM classification with endosonography.
Early carcinoma of the gallbladder: macroscopic features and US findings.
Diffuse esophageal leiomyomatosis in a patient with Alport syndrome: CT demonstration.
Orbit, skull base, and pharynx: contrast-enhanced fat suppression MR imaging.
Identification of pre- and postcentral gyri on CT and MR images on the basis of the medullary pattern of cerebral white matter.
Comparison of STIR and spin-echo MR imaging at 1.5 T in 45 suspected extremity tumors: lesion conspicuity and extent.
Stage A adenocarcinoma of the prostate: transrectal US and sonographic-pathologic correlation.
Inflammatory pseudosarcoma (pseudotumor) of the bladder.
Cadherin cell adhesion receptors as a morphogenetic regulator.
Survival with regional and distant metastases from cutaneous malignant melanoma.
The role of aspiration cytologic examination in the diagnosis of carcinoma of the breast.
Complications associated with needle localization biopsy of the breast.
Changes in the relative frequency of gastric adenocarcinoma in southern California.
Brain tumors.
Serum cholesterol levels and survival in elderly hypertensive patients: analysis of data from the European Working Party on High Blood Pressure in the Elderly.
Pheochromocytoma with electrocardiographic change mimicking angina pectoris, and cyclic change in direct arterial pressure--a case report.
Strabismus caused by melanoma metastatic to an extraocular muscle.
Partial laryngectomy after irradiation failure.
Terminal duct adenocarcinomas of salivary tissues.
Spontaneous regression in Merkel cell (neuroendocrine) carcinoma of the skin.
Human papillomavirus type 1-associated squamous cell carcinoma in a heart transplant recipient.
Mortality among aerial pesticide applicators and flight instructors: a reprint [corrected and republished article originally printed in Arch Environ Health 1990 Sep-Oct;45(5):295-302]
Leukemia and non-Hodgkin's lymphoma and residential proximity to industrial plants.
Cancer incidence among foundry workers in Denmark.
Radionuclide imaging in otolaryngology-head and neck surgery.
Fibrosarcoma of the head and neck. The UCLA experience.
Ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration biopsy of neck nodes.
Laryngeal myxoma.
Primary adenocarcinoma of the temporal bone. A case with 40-year follow-up.
A phase I study including pharmacokinetics of polyethylene glycol conjugated interleukin-2.
Local recurrence following abdominoperineal excision and anterior resection for rectal carcinoma.
The risk of lymph node metastasis in colorectal polyps with invasive adenocarcinoma.
What affects continence after anterior resection of the rectum?
Squamous cell carcinoma of the anus and HIV infection.
Colorectal adenocarcinoma in patients less than 40 years of age.
Use of omeprazole in patients with Zollinger-Ellison syndrome.
Metastatic carcinoma of the gallbladder from renal cancer presenting as intraluminal polypoid mass.
Giant hemangioma of the liver with pain, fever, and abnormal liver tests. Report of two cases.
Kaposi's sarcoma of the colon in a young HIV-negative woman with Crohn's disease.
Biology of basal cell carcinoma (Part II).
Primary neuroendocrine carcinoma of the skin. Clinicopathologic study of 18 cases.
Mycosis fungoides-like lesions associated with phenytoin and carbamazepine therapy.
Treatment of cutaneous T cell lymphoma with a combination of low-dose interferon alfa-2b and retinoids.
Bowenoid papulosis.
Who is being screened for melanoma/skin cancer? Characteristics of persons screened in Massachusetts.
Tanning salons: an area survey of proprietors' knowledge of risks and precautions.
Esophageal verrucous carcinoma: histologically a low-grade malignancy but clinically a fatal disease.
Is preoperative ultrasound cancer survey necessary in patients with normal liver function tests?
Pancreatic involvement in human immunodeficiency virus infection.
Effect of dietary calcium on colon carcinogenesis induced by a single injection of 1,2-dimethylhydrazine in rats.
Partial reversibility of cisplatin nephrotoxicity in children.
AIDS-associated polyclonal lymphoma: identification of a new HIV-associated disease process.
Duplex ultrasonography for persistent gestational trophoblastic tumor.
Pathologic features of sharp curettings in complete hydatidiform mole. Predictors of persistent gestational trophoblastic disease.
Reproductive experience after complete and partial molar pregnancy and gestational trophoblastic tumors.
Gestational trophoblastic disease of the fallopian tube.
Adenomatous polyp of the fallopian tube. A case report.
High-risk factors in metastatic gestational trophoblastic neoplasia.
A meta-analysis of the effect of estrogen replacement therapy on the risk of breast cancer [published erratum appears in JAMA 1991 Sep 11;266(10):1362]
Primary carcinoma of the gallbladder.
Prognosticators of second-look laparotomy findings in patients with epithelial ovarian cancer.
Lugol stain for intraoperative determination of the proximal surgical margin of the esophagus.
Intraoperative fine needle aspiration cytology of pancreatic lesions.
Chordoma: a 20-year clinicopathologic review of the experience at Groote Schuur Hospital, Cape Town.
Primary lymphoma of bone: a clinicopathologic study of 25 cases reported over 10 years.
Endobronchial carcinoid and mucoepidermoid carcinoma in children.
Primary renal lymphoma.
Expression of blood-group antigen A--a favorable prognostic factor in non-small-cell lung cancer.
Risk factors for metastases in patients with retinoblastoma.
Fingernail deformities secondary to ganglions of the distal interphalangeal joint (mucous cysts).
Partial duplication of the face: case report and review.
A case of multiple pilar tumors and pilar cysts involving the scalp and back.
Needle aspiration and pressure sutures for auricular pseudocyst.
Ganglioglioma: a clinical study with long-term follow-up.
Spinal cord decompression via a modified costotransversectomy approach combined with posterior instrumentation for management of metastatic neoplasms of the thoracic spine.
Fungal brain abscesses (aspergillosis/mucormycosis) in two immunosuppressed patients.
Use of gadolinium-enhanced magnetic resonance imaging in the diagnosis and management of posterior fossa hemangioblastomas.
Intramedullary spinal ependymal cyst: case report.
Flow cytometric DNA analysis of hepatocellular carcinoma: preliminary report.
The effect of graded doses of insulin on peripheral glucose uptake and lactate release in cancer cachexia.
Surgical indication and significance of portal vein resection in biliary and pancreatic cancer.
Giant benign mesenchymoma of the breast.
The significance of gastrinomas found in peripancreatic lymph nodes.
In vitro evaluation of bleomycin-induced cell lethality from plastic and glass containers.
DNA analysis of neoplasia: an introduction for the family physician.
Genital human papillomavirus infection
Heffalumps, jagulars, and cheshire cats. A commentary on cytokeratins and soft tissue sarcomas.
Interphase cytogenetic analysis in the diagnosis and study of neoplastic disorders.
Nuclear grading of breast carcinoma by image analysis. Classification by multivariate and neural network analysis.
Lung cancer histology in Jews and Arabs in Israel, 1962-1982.
Capillary hemangioma of the right main bronchus treated by sleeve resection in infancy.
Critical analysis of neoadjuvant therapy for Stage IIIa non-small cell lung cancer [corrected] [published erratum appears in Am Rev Respir Dis 1991 Jun;143(6):1473]
The fetus as a patient. Surgical considerations.
Have changing treatment patterns affected outcome for operable breast cancer? Ten-year follow-up in 1288 patients, 1965 to 1978.
Surgical prophylaxis of malignant melanoma.
Early gastric cancer. Twenty-eight-year experience.
Rehabilitation of physically disabled dentists: a model for a vocationally specific rehabilitation program.
Radiation therapy for intraductal carcinoma. Is it an equal alternative?
Local-regional breast cancer recurrence following mastectomy.
Treatment of human melanoma hepatic metastases in nude mice with human cytotoxic T lymphocytes.
Narrow excision (1-cm margin). A safe procedure for thin cutaneous melanoma.
Suppressive effects of visceral tumor on the generation of antitumor T cells for adoptive immunotherapy.
A cytotoxic T-lymphocyte clone derived from mice with progressively growing tumors.
Effect of morphine on growth of metastatic colon cancer in vivo.
Recurrent or metastatic disease in select patients with adrenocortical carcinoma. Aggressive resection vs chemotherapy.
Ubiquitin hybrid protein gene expression during human colon cancer progression.
Differential effects of sodium butyrate and hexamethylene bisacetamide on growth and secretion of cultured human endocrine tumor cells.
Lymphokine-activated killer cell suppressor factor in malignant effusions.
Localization of malignant melanoma using monoclonal antibodies.
The importance of anatomic site in prognosis in patients with cutaneous melanoma.
Touch preparation cytology of breast lumpectomy margins with histologic correlation.
RAR-alpha gene rearrangements as a genetic marker for diagnosis and monitoring in acute promyelocytic leukemia.
Increased risk of leukemia relapse with high-dose cyclosporine A after allogeneic marrow transplantation for acute leukemia.
Inhibition by 1,25 dihydroxyvitamin D3 of chemically induced erythroid differentiation of K562 leukemia cells.
Interleukin-5 is a human basophilopoietin: induction of histamine content and basophilic differentiation of HL-60 cells and of peripheral blood basophil-eosinophil progenitors.
T-lymphocytic leukemia expresses complex, branched O-linked oligosaccharides on a major sialoglycoprotein, leukosialin.
Growth factor requirements of childhood acute T-lymphoblastic leukemia: correlation between presence of chromosomal abnormalities and ability to grow permanently in vitro.
Stages of T-cell receptor protein expression in T-cell acute lymphoblastic leukemia.
Two distinct loci on the short arm of chromosome 16 are involved in myeloid leukemia.
Oncogene rearrangements in chronic B-cell leukemia.
Autologous bone marrow transplantation for high-grade lymphoid malignancy using melphalan/irradiation conditioning without marrow purging or cryopreservation. The Northern Regional Bone Marrow Transplant Group.
Amplification by the polymerase chain reaction of hypervariable regions of the human genome for evaluation of chimerism after bone marrow transplantation.
Intraosseous lipoma within the femoral head. A case report.
Healing of a large nonossifying fibroma after grafting with bone matrix and marrow. A case report.
Familial incidence of Paget's disease and secondary osteogenic sarcoma. A report of three cases from a single family.
Pulmonary hypertension five years after left pneumonectomy for adenoid cystic carcinoma.
Chylothorax as presenting manifestation of adenocarcinoma with probable gastric primary.
Treatment of malignant pleural effusions with doxorubicin hydrochloride-containing poly(L-lactic acid) microspheres.
Tumor cell heterogeneity and subpopulations with metastatic ability in differentiated adenocarcinoma of the lung. Histologic and cytofluorometric DNA analyses.
Suggestive evidence that pelvic endometriosis is a progressive disease, whereas deeply infiltrating endometriosis is associated with pelvic pain.
Expression of insulin-like growth factor II, alpha-fetoprotein and hepatitis B virus transcripts in human primary liver cancer.
Urinary excretion of bile acid glucosides and glucuronides in extrahepatic cholestasis.
Characterization of liver-associated natural killer cells in patients with liver tumors.
Hepatocellular carcinoma presenting with pyrexia and leukocytosis: report of five cases.
Extracranial metastases of medulloblastoma in adults: literature review.
Medulloblastoma: a population-based study of 532 cases.
Quantifying the potential benefit of CA 125 screening for ovarian cancer.
Lung cancer risk associated with cancer in relatives.
Cervical screening with cervicography and the Papanicolaou smear in women with genital condylomata.
Evaluating cervical cone biopsy specimens with frozen sections at hysterectomy.
State III squamous cell carcinoma of the vulva. Results of a Swedish study.
Subclinical vulvar papillomavirus infection.
Inflammatory atypia on cervical smears. A diagnostic dilemma for the gynecologist.
Cervicography for evaluating the "atypical" Papanicolaou smear.
Human papillomavirus screening for women with atypical Papanicolaou smears.
Recurrent intracaval renal cell carcinoma: the role of intravascular ultrasonography.
Carcinoma of the extrahepatic bile ducts.
Prognostic value of DNA flow cytometry in paragangliomas of the carotid body.
Results of multiple pulmonary resections for metastatic osteogenic sarcoma after two decades.
Hormonal receptors in locally advanced breast cancer: change with response to neoadjuvant chemotherapy?
Long-term vascular access via the inferior vena cava.
Effect of selective elimination of the oral flora on mucositis in irradiated head and neck cancer patients.
Primary undifferentiated small cell carcinoma of the esophagus: clinicopathological and flow cytometric evaluation of eight cases.
Serum trace elements and Cu/Zn ratio in breast cancer patients.
Endometrial carcinoma: a pathologic evaluation of 142 cases with and without associated endometrial hyperplasia.
Correlation between estrogen receptor status and histological malignancy in human breast cancer.
Wound healing complications in soft tissue sarcoma management: comparison of three treatment protocols.
Significance of surgical adjuvant chemotherapy for gastric cancer.
Biliary and pancreatic metastases of breast carcinoma: is surgical palliation indicated?
The neuroradiology of visual disturbances.
Optic nerve gliomas and meningiomas.
Efficacy and complications of radiotherapy of anterior visual pathway tumors.
Survival and quality of life among patients receiving unproven as compared with conventional cancer therapy.
Mutational hotspot in the p53 gene in human hepatocellular carcinomas
Selective G to T mutations of p53 gene in hepatocellular carcinoma from southern Africa
Intracranial tumor in infants: characteristics, management, and outcome of a contemporary series.
Treatment of spinal cord compression by epidural malignancy in childhood.
Surrogate receptor-mediated cellular cytotoxicity against malignant human glioma cells.
Peritumoral blood flow in intracranial meningiomas.
Results of transsphenoidal extirpation of craniopharyngiomas and Rathke's cysts.
Syringomyelia as a postoperative sequela of the resection of a chordoma of the clivus: case report.
Acoustic schwannoma and epidermoid cyst occurring as a single cerebellopontine angle mass.
Gonadotroph adenoma of the pituitary mimicking a prolactinoma.
Association between neuroepithelial tumor and multiple intestinal polyposis (Turcot's syndrome): report of a case and critical analysis of the literature.
Enterogenous cyst of the cerebellopontine angle cistern: case report.
'Locked-in syndrome' for 27 years following a viral illness: clinical and pathologic findings.
Diagnosis of thymoma in myasthenics using anti-striated muscle antibodies: predictive value and gain in diagnostic certainty.
Participation of serotonergic mechanisms in the pathophysiology of experimental neoplastic spinal cord compression.
Herniation of the antral membrane through an extraction site. Report of a case.
The effects of sucralfate suspension and diphenhydramine syrup plus kaolin-pectin on radiotherapy-induced mucositis.
Xeroderma pigmentosum: review and report of a case.
Tuberous sclerosis.
Anchorage-independent growth and the expression of cellular proto-oncogenes in normal human epidermal keratinocytes and in human squamous cell carcinoma cell lines.
Fibromatous epulis in dogs and peripheral odontogenic fibroma in human beings: two equivalent lesions.
An electron and optical microscopic study of juxtaposed odontogenic keratocyst and carcinoma.
A multifocal schwannoma of the masseteric nerve causing hemicrania.
Nerve growth factor stimulates protein tyrosine phosphorylation in PC-12 pheochromocytoma cells.
Positive selection of candidate tumor-suppressor genes by subtractive hybridization.
Cloning and expression of cDNAs for two distinct murine tumor necrosis factor receptors demonstrate one receptor is species specific.
Secreted or nonsecreted forms of acidic fibroblast growth factor produced by transfected epithelial cells influence cell morphology, motility, and invasive potential.
In vitro and in vivo consequences of VLA-2 expression on rhabdomyosarcoma cells.
Protective role of vitamin E in biological systems.
Dietary fats and cancer.
Oncolytic effects of fatty acids in mice and rats.
Introduction: nutritional aspects of palm oil.
The prevalence of Helicobacter pylori infection in the Peoples Republic of China.
Hepatocellular carcinoma: comparison of clinical features among ethnic groups in an area of low prevalence.
Boronate affinity chromatography of gamma-glutamyltransferase in patients with hepatocellular carcinoma.
Delayed subcapsular hematoma after percutaneous liver biopsy as a manifestation of warfarin toxicity.
Pneumocystis carinii pneumonia complicating somatostatin therapy of Cushing's syndrome in a patient with metastatic pancreatic islet cell carcinoma and Zollinger-Ellison syndrome.
Inflammatory pseudotumor of intra-abdominal lymph nodes manifesting as recurrent fever of unknown origin: a case report.
Synergism of ara-C-imuvert combination in aborting the development of transplanted chloroleukemia in the rat.
Enhanced expression of oncogene-encoded mRNA in a rat model of colon cancer.
Continuous 5-fluorouracil infusion and alpha interferon in advanced cancers: a report of initial treatment results.
Microcystic adnexal carcinoma following radiotherapy in childhood.
Traffic of peripheral B and T lymphocytes to hyperplastic, preneoplastic thymuses of AKR mice.
Hepatocyte growth factor in human placenta and trophoblastic disease.
Cingulin, a specific protein component of tight junctions, is expressed in normal and neoplastic human epithelial tissues.
Immunohistochemical detection of P-glycoprotein in endometrial adenocarcinoma.
p53 expression in colorectal tumors.
The rapid detection of clonal T-cell proliferations in patients with lymphoid disorders.
Oncogene amplification in breast cancer.
Coexpression of galanin and adrenocorticotropic hormone in human pituitary and pituitary adenomas.
HLA class II antigens and DNA restriction fragment length polymorphism in myasthenia gravis in Japan.
Loss of chromosome 22 alleles in human sporadic spinal schwannomas.
Continuous muscle fiber activity, peripheral neuropathy, and thymoma.
Prospective, randomized trial of palliative treatment for unresectable cancer of the esophagus.
Intraoperative pleural lavage cytology in lung cancer patients.
Pleuroperitoneal shunting for intractable pleural effusions.
Intrapericardial pheochromocytoma.
Squamous cell carcinoma arising in a sternotomy scar.

